VOL. I. 2
CHAPTER I.
HISTORICAL SUMMARY.THE SWAMP RETREAT.
The
colonies of North America, united in resistance to
the mother country, had now closed the fifth year of their
war of independence. The scene of conflict was now
almost wholly transferred from the northern to the southern
colonies. The former were permitted a partial repose,
while the latter, as if to compensate for a three years'
respite
,
were subjected to the worst aspects and usages of
war. Georgia and South Carolina were supposed by
the British commanders to be entirely recovered to the
sway of their master. They suffered, in consequence, the
usual fortune of the vanquished. But the very suffering
proved that they lived, and the struggle for freedom was
continued. Her battles,
Once begun,
Bequeathed from bleeding sire to son,
Though often lost,
were never considered by her friends in Carolina to be
utterly hopeless. Still, they had frequent occasion to
despair
.
Gates, the successful commander at Saratoga, upon
whose great renown and feeble army the hopes of the
south, for a season, appeared wholly to depend, had
suffered
a terrible defeat at Camdenhis militia scattered to
the four winds of Heavenhis regulars almost annihilated
in a conflict with thrice their number, which, for fierce
encounter and determined resolution, has never been
surpassed
;while
he, himself, a fugitive, covered with shame
and disappointment, vainly hung out his tattered banner in
the wilds of North Carolinaa colony sunk into an apathy
which as effectually paralysed her exertions, as did the
presence of superior power paralyse those of her more
suffering sisters. Conscious of indiscretion and a most
fatal presumptionthe punishment of which had been as
sudden as it was severethe defeated general suffered far
less from apprehension of his foes, than of his country.
He had madly risked her strength, at a perilous moment,
in a pitched battle, for which he had made no preparation
in which he had shown neither resolution nor ability.
The laurels of his old renown withered in an instanthis
reputation was stained with doubt, if not with dishonour.
He stood, anxious and desponding, awaiting, with whatever
moral strength he could command, the summons to that
tribunal of his peers, upon which depended all the
remaining
honours of his venerable head.
General Greene succeeded to the command of the
miserable
remnant of the southern army. Cool, prudent and
resolute, this able soldier came to his task with a noble
determination to rescue South Carolina from the grasp of
the invader, or to perish in the attempt. Bold as was the
resolution which he entertained and expressed, it was yet
unaccompanied by any rashness of movement or design.
Greene was very soon made conscious that, with the mere
fragments of an armyand such an army!naked men,
undrilled militia, few in number, disheartened by defeat,
unprovided with armshe could hope for nothing but
disaster
,
unless through the exercise of that ever watchful
thought, and rigorous prudence, by which, almost wholly,
the great captain is distinguished. His wariness formed an
essential part of his resolution, and quite as much as his
valour, contributed to effect his object. If he did not always
beat, he at length succeeded in finally baffling, his
opponents
.
He avoided the conflict which the more
presumptuous
Gates had too rashly invited. To baffle the invader,
he well knew, was the best policy by which to conquer
him. The fatigue of forced marches and frequent alarms
to the soldier, in an unknown and hostile country, is more
discouraging than the actual fight with a superior foe.
Every hour of delay added to the army of Greene while it
diminished that of the British. The militia recovered
breath and courage, and once more rallied around the
continental standard. Small but select bodies of troops
came to her aid from the neighbouring states. North
Carolina began to arouse and shake herself free from her
slumbers. Her yeomen began to feel the shame of previous
flight and inaction. Virginia, though scarcely so active as
her own safety and sense of duty should have made her,
was not altogether indifferent to the earnest entreaties for
assistance of the general of the south;and from
Maryland
and Delaware came a band, few but fearless, and
surpassed
by none of all the troops that were ever raised in
America. The tried and tough natives of the mountains
and the swamps emerged once more from their hiding
places under their ancient leaders; more resolute in the
cause of liberty, and more vigorous in their labours for its
attainment, from the shame and the sorrow which followed
their previous and frequent disappointments.
The countenance of the British commander became
troubled as he surveyed the gathering aspects of evil
in that horizon, from which he fondly fancied that he had
banished every cloud. His troops were summoned to
arms and to renewed activity; and Greene was no longer
in a condition to elude the arms of his adversary. Nor
did he now so much desire it. The accessions of force
which his army had received, and which drew upon him
the regards of Lord Cornwallis, had necessarily encouraged
the American general, and inspirited his purposes. His
policy, though still properly cautious, lost something of its
seeming timidity; and he boldly penetrated, in the face of
the foe, into the state which he came to deliver. A series
of small and indecisive, but briliant adventures, which
followed
the dispersion of his light troops over the country,
contributed equally to enliven the hopes of the commander
and the courage of his men. The battle of King's
Mountain
had been fought, in which the British force under
Ferguson was annihilated. Tarleton, hitherto invincible,
was beaten by Morgan at the Cowpens, with a vastly
inferior
army; while Marion, smiting the tories, hip and
thigh, in the swamps below;and Sumter, in a
succession
of brilliant and rapid actions, in the middle country;
had paralysed the activity and impaired seriously the
strength of those smaller parties of the British, which
were employed to overawe the inhabitants and secure the
conquests which had been already made. In an
inconceivably
short space of time, the aspect of things in South
Carolina underwent a change. The panic which followed
the defeat of Gates, had worn off. Disaffection so
effectually
showed itself in every section of the state, that the
British power was found active and operative only in those
portions where they held strong garrisons. Greene,
however
,
while these events were passing, was kept sufficiently
employed by the able captains who opposed him. Brought
to action at Guilford, he was forced, rather than beaten,
from the field; and a few days enabled him to turn upon
his pursuer, and to dog his flight from the state which he
could not keep, to that in which he became a captive.
But, in leaving Carolina, Cornwallis left the interests of
his master in the custody of no inferior representative.
Lord Rawdon, afterwards the Earl of Moira, succeeded
him in the command. He was unquestionably one of the
ablest general officers of the British army; and through a
protracted trial of strength with his opponent, he sustained
the duties of his trust with equal skill, vigilance and valour.
The descent of Greene into South Carolina, brought him
into that same neighbourhood which had proved so fatal to
Gates. His appearance was followed by the sharp action
of Hobkirk's Hill, in which Rawdon displayed many of
those essential qualities of conduct which entitle him to the
name of an able soldier. The field remained with the
British, but it yielded them none but barren fruits. It gave
them the triumph, but not the success. The victory was
only not with Greene. It must have been, but for a
misapprehension
of his orders, on the part of one of his best
officers, having command of a favourite regiment.
Our story opens at this period. The battle of Hobkirk's
Hill was productive of effects upon both of the contending
parties, which brought about an equal crisis in their
fortunes
.
The losses of the two armies, on that occasion,
were nearly the same. But, in the case of Rawdon, the
country offered but few resources against any external
pressure, and immediate and utter ruin must have followed
2*
his defeat. He had exhausted the means, ravaged the
fields, trampled upon the feelings, and mocked the
entreaties
of the surrounding inhabitants. Despair had taught
them a spirit of defiance, and the appearance of an
American
army which was able to maintain its ground even
after defeat, encouraged them to give to that feeling its
proper
utterance. Cornwallis had long before complained to
the British ministry that he was surrounded by timid
friends and inveterate foes; and the diminution of British
strength and courage which necessarily followed the flight
of that commander into Virginia, together with the defeats
sustained at Cowpens and King's Mountain, naturally
enough increased the timidity of the one, and the
inveteracy
of the other party. That atrocious and reckless
warfare
between the whigs and tories, which had deluged the
fair plains of Carolina with native blood, was now at its
height. The parties, in the language of General Greene,
pursued each other like wild beasts. Pity seemed utterly
banished
from their bosoms. Neither sex nor age was secure.
Murder lurked upon the threshold, and conflagration lighted
up, with the blazing fires of ruin, the still, dark hours of
midnight. The reckless brutality of the invader furnished
a sufficient example and provocation to these atrocities:
and the experience of ages has shown that hate never yet
takes a form so hellish, as when it displays itself in the
strifes of kindred. It does not need that we should inquire,
at this late day, what were the causes that led to this
division
among a people, in that hour so unseasonably chosen
for civil strifethe hour of foreign invasion. It is sufficient
for our present purpose that the fact, however lamentable,
is equally unquestionable and well known. Our narrative
seeks to illustrate some of the events which grew out of,
and characterized, this warfare. We shall be compelled to
display, along with its virtues of courage, patriotism and
endurance, some of its crimes and horrors! Yet vainly,
as unwisely, would we desire to depict, in human language,
its measureless atrocities. The heart would sicken, the
mind revolt with loathing, at those hideous details, in which
the actors seem to have studiously set themselves free from
all the restraints of humanity. To burn and slay were not
the simple performances of this reckless period and ravaged
country. To burn in wantonness, and to murder in cold
blood, and by the cruellest tortures, were the familiar
achievements of the time;and the criminal was too
frequently
found to exult over his evil deeds, with the
sanguinary
enthusiasm of the Mohawk warrior, even though
the avenging retribution stood beside him with warning
finger and uplifted knife. The face of the country was
overrun by outlaws. Detached bands of ruffians, formed
upon the frontiers of Georgia, and in the wilds of Florida,
availed themselves of the absence of civil authority, to
effect a lodgment in the swamps, the forests and the
mountains. These, mounted on fleet horses, traversed
the state with the wind; now here, now there; one
moment
operating on the Savannah, the next on the Peedee.
Sometimes descending within sight of the smokes of the
metropolis; and anon, building their own fires on the lofty
summits of Apalachia and the Ridge. Harassed by the
predatory inroads of these outlawed squadrons, stung by
their insults, and maddened by their enormities, the more
civil and suffering inhabitants, gathered in little bands for
their overthrow; and South Carolina, at the period of our
narrative, presented the terrible spectacle of an entire
people
in arms, and hourly engaging in the most sanguinary
conflicts. The district of country called Ninety-Six, in
the neighbourhood of which our story will chiefly lie, is
estimated
to have had within its borders, at the close of the
revolution
,
no less than fifteen hundred widows and orphans,
made so during its progress. Despair seems to have
blinded the one party as effectually to the atrocity of their
deeds, as that drunkenness of heart, which follows upon
long continued success, had made insensible the other;
and as that hour is said to be the darkest which more
immediately precedes the dawn, so was that the bloodiest
in the fortunes of Carolina which ushered in the bright
day of her deliverance. We now proceed with our
narrative
.
The dusky shadows of evening were approaching fast.
Clouds, black with storm, that threatened momently to
discharge
their torrents, depended gloomily above the bosom
of the Wateree. A deathlike stillness overhung the scene.
The very breezes that had swayed the tops of the tall
cypresses, and sported capriciously with the purple berries
of the green vines that decorated them, had at length folded
themselves up to slumber on the dark surface of the
sluggish
swamps below. No voice of bird or beast, no word of
man, denoted, in that ghostlike region, the presence of any
form of life. Nothing in its aspects, certainly, could
persuade
the casual wayfarer to suspect that a single human
heart beat within those wild and dark recesses. Gloomy, and
dense, and dim, at all seasons, the very tribute of the spring
in thisthe generous gifts of flowers and fruitageonly
served to increase the depth of its shadow in the rank
exuberance
of its vegetable life. The vines, and shrubs, and
briars, massed themselves together in an almost solid wall
upon its edge, and forbade to penetrate; and even where,
through temporary vistas, the eye obtained a passage
beyond
this formidable barrier, the dismal lakes which it
encountered
still
and blackfilled with the decayed trunks
of past centuries, and surmounted by towering ranks yet
in the vigour of their growth, defied the examination of the
curious, and seemed to rebuke, with frowning and
threatening
shadows, even the presumption of a search.
But in the perilous times of our history, these seeming
discouragements served the kindly purposes of security
and shelter. The swamps of Carolina furnished a place
of refuge to the patriot and fugitive, when the dwelling and
the temple yielded none. The more dense the wall of
briars upon the edge of the swamp, the more dismal the
avenues within, the more acceptable to those who,
preferring
liberty over all things, could there build her altars and
tend her sacred fires, without being betrayed by their
smokes. The scene to which our eyes have been
addressed
,
still and deathlike as it appears, was full of life,
of hearts that beat with hope, and spirits that burned with
animation; and sudden, even as we gaze, the sluggish
waters of the lake are rippling into tiny waves that betray
the onward motion of some unwonted burden. In the
moment of its deepest silence, a rustling is heard among
the green vines and crowding foliage. A gentle strife takes
place between the broken waters and the rude trunks of
the cypresses; and the prow of an Indian bark shoots
suddenly through the tangled masses, toward the
unsuspicious
shore. A single person stands upright in the centre
of the little vessel and guides it in its forward progress
through the still lagunes. Yet no dip of oar, no stroke of
paddle betrays his efforts, and impairs the solemn silence
of the scene. It speeds along as noiselessly and with as
little effort, as did that fairy bark of Phdria which carried
Sir Guyon over the Idle Lake to the Enchanted Island:
Withouten oare or pilot it to guide,
Or winged canvass with the wind to fly.
The navigator of our little canoe is indebted for her
progress
to no magical pin, such as impelled the vessel of
Phdria and obeyed the least touch of that laughing
enchantress
.
Still, the instrument which he employed, if less
magical in its origin, was quite as simple in its use. It
called for almost as little exertion of his arm. His wand
of power was an ordinary cane, nearly twenty feet in
length, the vigorous growth of the swamp around him, to
the slender extremity of which, a crotchet, cut from the
forked branches of some stubborn hickory, was tightly
fastened; one prong of the fork being left free, and
presenting
the appearance of a curved finger. Grasping this
instrument at the base, he employed the hook at its
extremity
,
with equal dexterity and ease, to the overhanging
limbs of the trees, or the scattered links of the thousand
vines which swung above him in the air; and by this
process
impelled his vessel in any direction. The yellow
waters of the swamp parted before his prow at the slightest
touch of this simple agent; and the obedient fabric which
it impelled with a corresponding flexibility, yielding itself
readily, shot from side to side, through the sinuous
avenues
of the swamp;as if endued with a consciousness and
impulse of its own, pressing along in silence and in shadow;
now darting freely forward where the stream widened into
little lakelets; now buried in masses of the thicket, so
dense and low, that the steersman was scarcely suffered
time to sink upon his knee, in seeking to pass beneath the
green umbrageous arches. In such a progress the scene
was not without its romance. Picturesque as was this
mode of journeying, it had its concomitants by which it
was rendered yet more so. The instrument which impelled
the vessel, drew down to the hand of the steersman the
massy vines of the thousand varieties of wild grape with
which the middle country of Carolina is literally covered.
These fling themselves with the wind in which they swing
and sport, arching themselves from tree to tree, and
interlacing
their green tresses until the earth below becomes a
stranger to the sun. Their blue clusters droop to the hand,
and hang around the brows of the fainting and feeble
partisan
,
returning from the conflict. He forgets the cruelties
of his fellow man, in solacing himself with the grateful
tributes which are yielded him by the bounteous nature.
Their fruits relieve his hunger and quench his thirsttheir
green leaves refresh his eyetheir shadows protect him
from the burning sun-beams, and conceal him from the
pursuit of the foe. Dark, wild, and unlovely as the
entrance
of the swamp might seem, still, to the musing heart
and contemplative spirit it had its aspects of beauty, if not
of brightness; and, regarded through the moral medium as
a place of refuge to the virtuous and the good, when
lovelier
spots afforded none, it rises at once before the mind,
into an object of sacred and serene delight. Its mysterious
outlets, its Druid-like nooks, its little islands of repose, its
solemn groves, and their adorning parasites, which clamber
up and cling to its slender columns an hundred feet in air,
flinging abroad their tendrils, laden with flaunting blossoms,
and purple berries; presented a picture of strange but
harmonious
combination, to which the youthful steersman
who guides our little bark was evidently not insensible.
He paused at moments in favourite spots, and his large
blue eye seemed to dilate, as, looking upward, he caught,
at moments, far, foreign glimpses of the heavens through
the ragged tops of the forest. Were the features of the
face sure indices of the human character, his might well be
assumed to be one in which the passion for the picturesque
entered largely, without conflicting, however, with the
more necessary qualities of decision of mind, and
directness
of aim and performance. It would not, indeed, be
altogether safe to say, that, when he paused in his progress
through the swamp, it was not because of some more
serious purpose than belonged to a desire to contemplate
the picturesque in its aspects. A just caution, the result of
that severe experience which the Carolinians had suffered
in the beginning of their conflict with the mother country,
may have prompted him to wait, and watch, and listen,
long before he approached the land. His movements were
all marked by the vigilance of one who was fully conscious
of the near neighbourhood of danger. Before his vessel
could emerge from the covert, and when a single moment
would have thrust her against the shore, he grasped with
his hook a swinging vine which he had already left behind
him, and arrested her motion. His boat swung lightly upon
her centre, and remained stationary for a brief instant, while,
drawing from his vest a small instrument of cane, he uttered
a clear merry sound, which went, waking up an hundred
echoes, through the still recesses of the swamp. His
whistle, thrice repeated, brought him as many faint
responses
from the foot of the hills to which he was
approaching
;
and with a single farther effort our steersman
threw himself flat in the bottom of his little vessel, which
passed under a mass of foliage that drooped down upon the
water, and in another moment her shallow prow darted
upward
upon the shore. The youth, having fastened her
securely amidst the umbrage that grew upon the banks,
now made his way toward the hills, where stood one who
seemed to have been for some time, but not impatiently,
awaiting his approach.
CHAPTER II.
THE FRIENDS.A CONFERENCE.
The
stranger, as he leaped upon the solid earth, appeared
of a noble and commanding presence. In shape he was
symmetrically and vigorously made. Tall, erect and
muscular
,
his person was that of one who had been long
accustomed to hardy and active exercises. In his
movements
there was a confident easethe result equally of a
fearless spirit and a noble formwhich tallied well with a
certain military exactness of carriage; commending his
well-finished limbs to the eye, while conveying to the
mind of the observer an impression, not less favourable, of
the noble and firm character of their proprietor. Nor
were the features of his countenance wanting in any thing
which might support this impression. His face was full
but not fleshy; the skin, a clear red and white, which the
summer sun had simply darkened into manliness. His
eye, of a lively and intelligent blue, might have denoted
a rather preponderating playfulness of temper, but for the
sterner expression of his mouth, the lines of which were
more angular than round, the lips being too thin for
softness
,
and when compressed, indicating a severe directness
of purpose, which the gentler expression of his other
features
failed entirely to qualify. He had a lofty forehead,
broad, intellectual, and contemplative. His hair, which
was of a dark brown colour, was long, and, like his beard,
had been suffered to remain untrimmed, possibly as much
in compliance with the laws of necessity as of taste. We
have already intimated that the stranger was youthful. He
had probably beheld some twenty-five or thirty summers,
though it may be that premature toils and trials had
anticipated
the work of time, and made him seem somewhat
older than he really was. He had, in the
tout ensemble
of his face, the appearance of one who had just arrived at
the equal maturity of mind and body.
His dress was simple, and characterized by as little
pretension
as could possibly be found in one who was not
only young, but evidently in the military. In its material
and make, it corresponded with that of the ordinary
woodmen
of the country. His pantaloons consisted of a dark
blue homespun, the legs being wrapped in leggings of a
somewhat coarser texture and darker hue. From these
the original dye had been obliterated in blotches, here and
there; or so obscured by stains from the yellow waters of
the swamp, with which the wearer had been so recently
familiar, that it would require a very discriminating eye to
determine at a glance of what colour they originally were.
A hunting-shirt of a deeper blue than that of his under
clothes, and perhaps of better material, which reached
midway between his hips and knees, completed the
essential parts of his costume. This portion of the dress
was evidently made with some regard to the shape,
and, possibly, the tastes of the wearer; a matter not so
certainly clear in the case of the pantaloons. It fitted
closely, without a wrinkle, and displayed the symmetry
and muscle of his form to the greatest possible advantage.
It had been ornamented, it would seem, in better days,
with a deep fringe of a complexion somewhat more showy
than that of the garment, but of this only a few occasional
traces now remained, to testify, much more effectually, to
the trials through which it had passed, than its own former
brightness and integrity. The little cape which
surmounted
the coat, and fell back upon the shoulders, had fared
rather more fortunately than the rest of the garment, and
formed no unseemly finish to the general fitness of the
costume; particularly as the wearer, with a better taste
than prevailed then, or has prevailed since, had freed his
neck from all the buckram restraints of gorget, cravat, or
stockbandagings which fetter the movements of the
head, without increasing its dignity or comfort. Enough
of the broad sun-burned bosom was revealed by the open
shirt before, to display that classic superiority of air
of which modern fashions almost wholly deprive the
noblest aspect. Upon his head, without shading his brow,
rested a cap of otter-skin, rude and ample in its make, the
work, most probably, of some favourite slave. A small
yellow crescent, serving the purpose of a button, looped
VOL. I. 3
up one of the sides in the centre, and might on occasion
have sustained a feather. Plain mocasins of buckskin, the
original yellow of which had been entirely lost in the more
doubtful colours acquired in the swamp, completed the
externals
of his dress. It may be added that he wore no
visible armour; but once, as he stooped to fasten his skiff
beside the shore, the butt of a heavy pistol might have
been seen protruding from beneath the thick folds of his
hunting-shirt. From the unnatural fulness of the opposite
breast, it would not be rash to conjecture that this weapon
of war was not without its fellow.
The stranger ascended from the banks and made his way
towards the foot of the heights, that, skirting the northern
edges of the Wateree, conduct the eye of the spectator to
tke lofty summits of the Santee hills beyond. Here he
was joined by another, who had evidently been for some
time expecting him. This was a man of middle size,
stout, well-made, coarse in feature, strong of limb, active
of movement, apparently without the refining influences
of society and education, and evidently from the lower
orders of the people. Let not this phrase, however, be
understood to signify any thing base or unbecoming.
Though a poor man, our new acquaintance was not the
work of one of nature's journeymen, fashioned when the
master hand was weary. With head and feet equally
bare, he carried the one with a virtuous erectness that
could not be well misunderstood; while the other were
set down with the freedom and fearlessness of a man
conscious
that he walked the soil of his native land in the
full performance of the equal duties of the patriot and
warrior
.
In his hand he grasped a rifle of immoderate length,
the fractured stock of which, lashed together with
buckskin
thongs, bore tokens of hard usage in more respects
than one. The unquestionable poverty of this man's
condition
which,
indeed, was that of the whole American
armydid not seem to have any effect upon his
deportment
or to give him any uneasiness. He seemed not to
know that his garments suffered from any peculiar
deficiencies
;
and never did the language of a light heart
declare itself with so little reservation from a blue eye and
a good-natured physiognomy. The slight cloud of anxiety
which hung at moments above his brow, and which
gathered
there in consequence of cares of no ordinary kind,
could not long, at any time, withstand the buoyant action
of the cheerful spirit within. This constantly shone out
from his face, and spoke aloud in the clear, ringing tones
of his manly yet not unmusical accents. Drawing nigh
to our first acquaintance, he grasped his hand with the
joyous look and warm manner of one who felt, in the
meeting with his comrade, something of a sentiment far
stronger than that which governs the ordinary friendships
among men. Nor was the manner of his comrade less
equivocal, though, perhaps, more quiet and subdued. The
behaviour of the twain was that of an intimacy unbroken
from boyhood, and made mutually confident by the
exercise
of trusts which had been kept equally sacred by both
the parties.
Well, Clarence, I'm glad you've come. I've been
waiting for you a'most two hours. And how goes it in
the swampand did you git the letters?
I did: all's well with uspretty much as when you
left. But how with you, Jack? What news do you
bring? Is the coast clearare the light troops gone in?
Well, I reckon I may say yes. Greene's drawed off
from Camden sence the brush at Hobkirk's, and there's no
telling jest now which way he's going. As for Marion,
you know its never easy to say where to look for him.
Lee's gone down on the s'arch somewhere below, and
we're all to be up and busy at short notice. I hear tell of
great things to do. Our ginral, Sumter, is in motion, and
picking up stragglers along the Catawba. I reckon he'll
soon be down, and then gallop's the word. Something
too I hear of Colonel Tom Taylor at Granby, and
Enough, enough, Jack; but you say nothing of Butler
and his men? Are they out of the wayare they off? If
you know nothing about him
Well, I reckon they're at Granby by this time.
They've given up the hunt as a bad job. I saw Joe
Clinch, one of his troop, only two days ago, and gin him
a sort of hint that the chap they were after was more like
to be found above the Congaree than in these parts. `For
what's to save him,' I said to Joe, `down here in this
neighbourhood, where we're all true blue, and he a
fire-hot
tory?' That was a good reason for Clinch and all
his troop, I reckon. They tuk it for one, and by peep of
dawn, they were streaking it along the river road. They've
got to `Ninety-Six,' by this time, and even if they ha'nt,
it's all the same to us. They're out of your way.
But you did wrong, John Bannister, in saying that
Edward Conway was a tory. He himself denies it.
Well, Clarence, that's true, but I don't see that his
denying it makes much difference. It's natural enough
that a man should say he's no tory when he's in a whig
camp. The vartue of a whole skin depends upon it.
There's a chance of broken bones if he says otherwise,
which Ned Conway aint a going to resk.
At least, for my sake, John Bannister, give Edward
Conway the benefit of your doubts, replied the other,
with an expression of grave displeasure on his countenance.
We do not know that he is a tory, and the best of men
have been the victims of unjust suspicion. I must repeat
that you did wrong, if you loved me, in calling him by
such a name.
Ah, Clarence, he's your half-brother, and that's the
reason you aint willing to believe any thing agin him; but
I'm dub'ous I said nothing worse than the truth when I
told Clinch he was a tory. I'm sure the proofs agin him
would have hung many a tall chap like himself.
No more, Bannisterno more, said the other,
gloomily. It is enough that he is my brother. I am
not willing to examine his demerits. I know, and
acknowledge
to you, that many things in his conduct look
suspicious; still I prefer to believe his wordhis solemn
oathagainst all idle reportsreports, which are half the
time slanders, and which have destroyed, I verily believe,
many lives and characters as worthy as our own. You
know that I have no reason to love Edward Conway. We
have never been friends, and I have no partialities in his
favour. Still, he is the son of my father, and I am bound
to defend him while I remain unconvinced of his treachery.
I am only afraid that I am too willing to believe what is
said in his prejudice. But this I will not believe so long
as I can help it. He solemnly assures me he has never
joined the tories. He would scarcely swear to a
falsehood
.
Well, that's the same question, Clarence, only in
another
language. The man that would act a lie, wouldn't
stop very long to swear to one. Now, if Edward Conway
didn't join the tories, who did he join? He didn't join
us, did he? Did he swear to that, Clarence?
No! no! Would to God he could!
Well, then, what is it that he does say? I'm
a-thinking
that it's good doctrine to believe, in times like these,
that the man that aint with us is agin us. Let him show
what he did with himself sence the fall of Charlestown.
He warn't there. You don't see his name on the list of
prisonersyou don't hear of his parole, and you know
he's never been exchanged. It mought be that he went
in the British regiments to the West Indies, where they
carried a smart chance of our people, that wouldn't ha'
got any worse character by taking to the swamps as we
did. Does he say that he went there?
He does nothe declines giving any account of
himself
,
but still denies, most solemnly, that he ever joined
the tories.
I'm mightily afeard, Clarencenow, don't be angry
at what I'm going to saybut I'm mightily afeard Edward
Conway aint telling you the truth. I wouldn't let him
go freeI'd hold him as a sort of prisoner and keep
watch upon him. You've saved him when he didn't
desarve
to be saved by any body, and least of all by you;
and you have a sort of substantial right to do with him
jest as you think right and reasonable. I'm for your
keeping him, like any other prisoner, and counting him in
at the next exchange. He'll go for somebody that'll pull
trigger for his country.
Impossible! How can you give me such counsel?
No, no, Jack, let him be all that you think him, the tory
and the traitor, still he comes from my father's loins, and
though another mother gave us suck, yet I feel that I
should defend him as a brother, though he may not be
altogether one. He shall suffer no harm at hands of
mine.
Well, I'm sure I don't say he ought. To keep him
under a strong thumb and fore-fingerto keep him, as
I may say, out of mischief and out of danger till the
time of exchange comes round, won't be to do him
3*
any harm. It's only one way of feeding a mouth that,
mought be, couldn't feed itself so well in these tough
times; and taking a little Jamaica from other mouths that
mought like it jest as well, and desarve it a great deal
better.
What, Jack, do you begrudge Edward Conway the
pitiful fare which we can give him in the swamp? You
are strangely altered, Jack, towards him. You were once
his playmate in boyhood as well as mine.
Yes, Clarence, and 'twas then, so far back as them
same days of our boyhoodand they were mighty sweet
days, I tell youthat I found him out, and l'arned to
mistrust
him. God knows, Clarence, and you ought to know
too, that Jack Bannister would like, if he could, all the
flesh and blood in this world that was ever a kin of your'n.
I tried mighty hard to love Ned Conway as I loved you,
but it was like fighting agin natur'. I tried my best, but
couldn't make it out with all my trying; and when I
caught him in that business of the dock-tailed horse
Do not remind me of these matters now, Jack; I am
afraid I remember them too well already.
You're only too good for him, Clarence. I somehow
almost think he aint naturally even a half-brother of your'n
any how. You don't look like him; neither eye nor
mouth, nor nose nor chin, nor hair nor foreheadall's
different
as if you had come from any two families that lived
at opposite eends of the river, and never seed one another.
But, as you say, I won't 'mind you of any matters that
you don't want to hear about. Them days is over with
me and him, and so I'll shut up on that subject. As for
begrudging him the bread and bacon, and the drop of
Jamaica, such as we git in the swamp yonder,well, I
won't say nothing, because, you see, I can't somehow
think you meant to say what you did. All that I do say,
Clarence, is, that I wish I had enough to give him that
would persuade him to show clean hands to his friends
and blood-kin, and come out for his country, like every
man that has a man's love for the airth that raised him.
I know you mean him no wrong, Jack, and me no
pain, when you advise me thus; but my word is pledged
to Edward Conway, and I will keep it, though I perish.
And don't I tell you to keep it, Clarence? You
promised
to save him from Butler's men, that was a-hunting
him, and what better way than to keep him close from
sight; for, if he once gits a-going agin, and they find his
tracks, it won't be your boldness or my quickness that'll git
him into the swamp so easily. If Butler's men hadn't
been up-countrymen, that didn't onderstand swamp
edication
,
no how, he wouldn't have had such a quiet time of
it where we put him. Well, you've done what you
promised
,
and what, I reckon, every man was bound to do
by his blood-kin. You've saved him from his enemies;
but there's no need you should give him your best nag
that he may gallop full-speed into their pastures. Now,
that's what you're a-thinking to do. And why should
you? If he aint a tory, and hasn't been one, why
shouldn't he be a whig? Why shouldn't he do what he
ought to ha' done five years agojoin Sumter's men, or
Marion's men, or Pickens' men, or any men that's up for
the countryand run his bullets with a tory's name to
each. I don't think Ned Conway a coward, no how, and
when he won't come out for his country at a pushing time
like this, I can't help considering him a mighty suspicious
friend.
Enough, Jack; the more you speak, and I think, of
this matter, the more unhappy it makes me, replied the
other. If I dared to think, I should probably come to
more serious conclusions than yourself on the subject of
my brother's conduct; which, I confess is altogether
inscrutable
.
I have only one course before me, and that is
to set him free, even as he desires, and let him choose his
own route henceforward. I have not spared argument to
persuade him to our ranks, and he holds out some hopes
to me, that when he has finished certain private business
he will do so.
Private business! Lord ha' mercy upon us! How
can a body talk of private business, when even
throat-cutting
is so public?when there's a sort of Injin bounty
for sculps, and it takes more than a man's two hands to
keep his own skin and teeth from going off, where they
are worth their weight in gold? Private business! Look
you, Clarence, did you think to ask him when he had last
seen Flora Middleton?
No, I did not, returned the other, abruptly, and with
some impatience in his manner. Why should I ask him
that? I had no reason to suppose that he had any
particular
reason for seeing her at this, or at any other time.
Now, Clarence, you needn't be telling me that, when
I know so much better. I know that if he hasn't a reason
for seeing her, he's always had a mighty strong wish that
way; and as for your own feelings, Lord bless you,
Clarence, it's no fault of your'n, if every second man in
the regiment don't know the soft place in the colonel's
heart by this time, and can't put his finger on it whenever
he pleases. If you love Flora Middleton there's no harm
in it; and if Edward Conway loves her too
He paused, and looked at his companion with the air of
one who is doubtful of the effect of that which he has
already said.
Well! What then? demanded the other.
Why, only, there's no harm, perhaps, in that either.
Ay, but there is, John Bannister, and you know it;
cried the other, almost fiercely. Edward Conway knew
that I loved Flora Middleton long before he had ever seen
her.
Very true; but that's no good reason why he shouldn't
love her when he did see her, Clarence.
But it is good reason why he should not seek her
with his love.
I reckon, Clarence, he don't much stand upon such a
reason. There's nothing brotherly in love matters, Clarence;
and even if there was, Ned Conway is about the last
person
to make much count of it.
He doeshe shall! Nay, on this point I have his
assurance. He tells me that he has not sought herhe
has not seen her for months.
And did Edward Conway really tell you so, Clarence?
He didit was almost his last assurance when I left
him.
Then he told you a most crooked and abominable lie.
He has seen her within the last three weeks.
Ha! how know you?
From little Joe, the blacksmith, that was down by
Watson's before it was taken from the British. Little Joe
went with him to Briar Park, and saw him and Miss Flora
in the piazza together.
The young man clutched the butt of the pistol in his
bosom with a convulsive grasp, but soon relaxed it. He
struck his forehead, the next moment, with his open palm,
then strode away from his companion, as if to conceal the
emotion which he could not so easily overcome.
Well, he exclaimed, returning, I had a strange fear
I know not whythat there was something insincere in
his assurance. He made it voluntarily,we had not
named her,and even as he spoke, there was a
something
in his face which troubled me, and made me
doubtful
of his truth. But he will go too farhe will try the
force of blood beyond its patience.
There's nothing, Clarence, in the shape of licking
that sich a person don't desarve. I followed out more of
his crooks than one, years ago, when there was no war;
and he had all the tricks of a tory even then.
That he should basely lie to me, and at such a
moment
!
When I had risked life to save him!When!
but let me not grow foolish. Enough, that I know him
and suspect him. He shall find that I know him. He
shall see that he cannot again cheat me with loving
language
and a Judas kiss.
Ah, Clarence, but you can cheat yourself. He knows
how quick you are to believe; and when he puts on them
sweet looks, and talks so many smooth words, and makes
b'lieve he's all humility, and how sorry he is for what he's
done, and how willing he is to do betterand all he wants
is a little timeas if ever a man wanted time to get honest
in! Look you, Clarence, you're my colonel, and what's
more, I'm your friendyou know I love you, Clarence,
better than one man ever loved another, and jest as well as
Jonathan ever loved David, as we read in the good book;
but, with all my love for you, Clarence, dn my splinters,
if you let Ned Conway cheat you any longer with his
sweet words and sugar promises, I'll cut loose from you
with a jerk that'll tear every j'int out of the socket. I
won't be the friend of no man that lets himself be cheated.
As for hating Ned Conway, as you sometimes say I do,
there, I say, you're clean mistaken. I don't hate himI
mistrust him. I've tried mighty hard to love him, but he
wouldn't let me. You know how much I've done to save
him from Butler's men; but I saved him on your account,
and not because I think he desarves to be saved. I'm
dub'ous that he is a tory, and a rank tory too, if the truth
was known, jest as they charge it upon him. I'm dub'ous
he'll join the British as soon as he can git a chance; and
I'm more than dub'ous, that, if you don't git before him to
your mother's plantation, and run the niggers into the
swamp out of his reach, he'll not leave you the hair of one
he'll have 'em off to Charlestown by some of his fellows,
and then to the West Indies, before you can say Jack
Robinson, or what's a'most as easy, Jack Bannister.
There's another person I think you ought to see about,
and that's Miss Flora. Either you love her or you don't
love her. Now, if you love her, up and at her at once,
with all your teeth set, as if you had said it with an oath;
for though I know this aint no time to be a-wiving and
a-courting, yet, when the varmints is a-prowling about the
poultry-yard, it's no more than sense to look after the
speckled hen. Take a fool's wisdom for once, and have
an eye to both eends of the road. Go over to the
plantation
,
and when you're there, you can steal a chance to
cross over to Middleton's. It's my notion you'll find Ned
Conway at one place or t'other.
I'll think of it, said Conway, in subdued tones;
meantime, do you take the canoe back to the island and
bring him out. The horses are in readiness?
Yes, behind the hill. I'll bring him out if you say
so, Clarence, but it's not too late to think better of it. He's
safe, for all parties, where he is.
No, no, Jack, I've promised him. I'll keep my
promise
.
Let him go. I fear that he has deceived me. I
fear that he will still deceive me. Still I will save him
from his enemies, and suppress my own suspicions. It
will be only the worse for him if he does me wrong
hereafter
.
Clarence, if he turns out to be a tory, what'll our men
say to hear you harboured him?
Say!perhaps, that I am no better.
No, no! they can't say thatthey shan't say it, when
Jack Bannister is nigh enough to hear, and to send his
hammer into the long jaws that talk such foolishness; but
they'll think it mighty strange, Clarence.
Hardly, Jack, when they recollect that he is my
father's son.
Ah, Lord, there's mighty few of us got brothers in
these times in Carolina. A man's best brother now-a-days
is the thing he fights with. His best friend is his rifle.
You may call his jackknife a first-cousin, and his two
pistols
his eldest sons; and even then, there's no telling
which of them all is going to fail him first, or whether
any one among 'em will stick by him till the scratch is
over. Edward Conway, to my thinking, Clarence, was
never a brother of your'n, if `brother' has any meaning of
`friend' in it.
Enough, enough, Jack. Leave me now and bring
him forth. I will do what I promised, whatever may be
my doubts. I will guide him on his way, and with this
night's work acquit myself of all obligations to him.
When we next meet, it shall be on such terms as shall
for ever clear up the shadows that stand between us.
Away, now!it will be dark in two hours, and we have
little time to waste. The storm which threatens us will
be favourable to his flight.
CHAPTER III.
THE RETROSPECT.THE FUGITIVE.
The
dialogue between the two friends, which has just
been given, will convey to the mind of the reader some
idea of the situation of the parties. We have not aimed to
describe the manner of this dialogue, preferring infinitely
that the interlocutors should speak entirely for themselves.
It may be stated in this place, however, that, throughout
the interview, the sturdy counsellor, whose honest
character
and warm friendship constituted his perfect claim to
speak unreservedly to his superior, betrayed a dogged
determination
not to be satisfied with the disposition which
the latter had resolved to make of one whom he was
pleased to consider in some sort a prisoner. On the other
hand, the younger of the two, whom we have known by
the name of Clarence Conway, and who held a colonel's
command over one of those roving bodies of whig militia,
which were to be found at this period in every district of
the state,though resolute to release his brother from the
honourable custody in which circumstances had placed
him, still seemed to regret the necessity by which he was
prompted to this proceeding. There were various feelings
conflicting for mastery in his bosom. While he did not
believe in the charges of political treachery by which his
half-brother was stigmatized, he was yet any thing but
satisfied that his purposes were politically honest or
honourable
.
Equally dubious with his companion on the
subject of Edward Conway's principles, he was yet not
prepared to believe in the imputation which had been cast
upon his performances. He suspected him, not of
fighting
for the enemy, but of the meaner and less daring
employment
,
of speculating in the necessities of the country;
and, in some way or other, of craftily availing himself of
its miseries and wants, to realize that wealth, the passion
for which constituted, he well knew, a leading and greedy
appetite in the character of his kinsman.
Clarence Conway was the younger son of a gentleman
who came from the West Indies, bringing with him an
only childthen an infantthe fruit of a first marriage
with a lady of Barbadoes, who died in bringing it into the
world. The graceful form, pleasing manners, and varied
intelligence of this gentleman, gained him the favour of a
young lady of the Congaree, who became his wife. One
son, our hero, was born to this union; and his eyes had
scarcely opened upon the light, when his father fell a
victim
to fever, which he caught in consequence of some rash
exposure among the swamps of the low country. The infant,
Clarence, became the favourite of his grandparents, by
whom he was finally adopted. He thus became the heir of
possessions of a vastness and value infinitely beyond those
which by the laws of primogeniture, necessarily accrued
to his half-brother. The anxiety of Edward Conway to
be the actual possessor of his rights, became so obvious to
all eyes, that Mrs. Conway yielded him early possession,
soon after her husband's death, and retired to one of the
plantations which had descended from her father to her
son. Edward Conway did not long retain the estate left
him by his father. He was sagacious or fortunate enough
to sell it, and realize its value in money, before the strifes
of the Revolution became inevitable. With the conquest
of Carolina by the British, he almost disappeared from
sight; but not until himself and half-brother had already
come into conflict on grounds which did not involve any
reference to the politics of the country. This collision
between them was of such a naturealready hinted at in
the previous chapteras to bring into active exercise
the anger of the one, and the dissimulation of the other.
To Clarence Conway, therefore, the unfrequent
appearance
of Edward afforded but little discontent. The late
return of the latter, under circumstances of suspicion
under imputations of political treachery, and accusations
of crime,now bewildered the more frank and passionate
youth, who lamented nothing half so much as to be
compelled
to call him kinsman. He knew the wilfulness of
heart which characterized him, and dreaded lest he should
VOL. I. 4
abuse, in a respect purely personal, the freedom which he
was about to confer upon him. His own ability to follow,
and to watch the object of his suspicions, was very limited
at this period. His movements were governed by his
military position, by prudence, and certain other relations
of a more private nature, which shall be considered as we
proceed. With no such restraints as these, and once more
safe from the dangers which had compelled him to seek
shelter at the hands of his brother in the swamp, the future
conduct of Edward Conway filled the mind of Clarence
with many apprehensions; the more strongly felt, since
his falsehood in a particular respect, had been revealed by
his companion. There was, as the latter had phrased it,
a weak or tender spot in the bosom of Clarence Conway,
which led him to apprehend every thing of evil should
Edward prove false to certain pledges which he had
voluntarily
made, and proceed to a dishonourable use of his
liberty. But it was a point of honour with him not to
recede
from his own pledges, nor to forbear, because of a
revival of old suspicions, the performances to which they
had bound him. Yet, in the brief hour that followed the
departure of Jack Bannister, how much would his young
commander have given, could he have taken his counsel
could he have kept, as a prisoner, that person whose
passions
he well knew, and whose dissimulation he feared.
He thus nearly argued himself into the convictionnot a
difficult one at that periodthat it was his public duty to
arrest and arraign, as a criminal to his country, the person
against whom the proofs were so strikingly presumptive.
As he reflected upon this subject, it seemed to astonish
even himself at the degree of criminality which he was
now willing to attach to his kinsman's conduct. How was
it that he had become so generally suspected? How easy,
if he were able, to prove his fidelity! Why was he absent
from the field? Where had he been? Though proof was
wanting to show that he had been active in the British
cause, yet none was necessary to show that he had been
wholly inactive for the American. More than once, in the
interval which followed from the first futile, to the final
and successful invasion of the enemy, had Clarence sought
him, to stimulate his patriotism, and urge him to the field.
All their conferences were devoted to this object; the
younger brother sometimes assuming a language in the
controversy, which nothing but the purity of his patriotism
and his own obvious disinterestedness, could have justified
from the lips of a younger brother. But his exhortations
fell upon unheeding earshis arguments in barren places.
There were no fruits. Edward Conway contrived with
no small degree of art to conceal his real sentiments, at a
time when the great body of the people were only too
glad to declare themselves, either on one side or the other.
Subsequently, when the metropolis had fallen, the same
adroitness was exercised to enable him to escape from the
consequences of committal to either. How this was done
by what evasions, or in what mannerClarence
Conway
was at a loss to understand. As the war proceeded,
and the invasion of the colony became general, the active
events of the conflict, the disorders of the country, the
necessity
of rapid flight, from point to point, of all persons
needing concealment, served to prevent the frequent
meeting
of the kinsmen;and circumstances, to which we have
already adverted, not to speak of the equivocal political
position of the elder brother, contributed to take from such
meetings what little gratification they might have possessed
for either party. Whenever they did meet, the efforts of
Clarence were invariably made, not to find out the mode
of life which the other pursued, but simply to assure
himself
that it was right and honourable. To this general
object all his counsels were addressed; but he was still
compelled to be content with a general but vague
assurance
from the other, that it was so. Still there was one
charge which Edward Conway could not escape. This
was the omission of that duty to his country, which, in a
season of invasion, cannot be withheld without
dishonouring
either the manhood or the fidelity of the citizen.
Clarence
was not willing to ascribe to treachery this inaction;
yet he could not, whenever he gave any thought to the
subject, attribute it to any other cause. He knew that
Edward was no phlegmatic; he knew that he was
possessed
of couragenor courage merely; he knew that a
large portion of audacity and impulse entered into his
character
.
That he was active in some cause, and constantly
engaged in some business, Edward Conway did not
himself
seek to deny. What that business was, however,
neither the prayers nor the exhortations of Clarence and
his friends could persuade him to declare; while the
discovery
of a circumstance, by the latter, which led him to
apprehend the interference of the former in another field
than that of war, contributed still farther to estrange them
from each other. Enough now has been said to render
the future narrative easy of comprehension.
While, with vexing and bitter thoughts, Clarence
Conway
awaited the progress of his companion, with the
fugitive whom he had given into his charge, Supple Jack
(for that was the
nom de guerre
conferred by his
comrades
upon the worthy woodman, in compliment to certain
qualities of muscle which made his feats sometimes
remarkable
in the course of their forest adventures)
penetrated
into the recesses of the swamp, with a degree of
diligence which by no means betokened his own
disposition
of mind in regard to the particular business upon
which he went. But Supple Jack was superior to all that
sullenness which goes frowardly to the task, because it
happens to disapprove it. As a friend, he counselled
without
fear; as a soldier, he obeyed without reluctance. He
soon reached the little island on the edge of the Wateree
river, where Clarence Conway had concealed his kinsman
from the hot hunt which had pursued him to that
neighbourhood
.
So suddenly and silently did he send his canoe
forward, that her prow struck the roots of the tree, at
whose base the fugitive reclined, before he was conscious
of her approach. The latter started hastily to his feet, and
the suspicious mood of Supple Jack was by no means
lessened
,
when he beheld him thrust into his bosom a paper
upon which he had evidently been writing. To the
passing
spectator Edward Conway might have seemed to
resemble
his half-brother. They were not unlike in general
height, in muscle, and in size. The air of Clarence may
have been more lofty; but that of Edward was equally
firm. But the close observer would have concurred with
the woodman, that they were, as kinsmen, utterly unlike in
almost every other respect. The aspect of Clarence
Conway
was bright and open, like that of an unclouded sky;
that of Edward was dark, reserved, and lowering. There
was a shyness and a suspiciousness of manner in his
glance and movement; and, while he spoke, the sentences
were prolonged, as if to permit as much premeditation as
possible between every syllable. His smile had in it a
something sinister, which failed to invite or soothe the
spectator. It was not the unforced expression of a mind
at ease,of good-humour,of a heart showing its clear
depths to the glances of the sun. It was rather the
insidious
lure of the enchanter, who aims to dazzle and
beguile
.
As such only did our woodman seem to understand it.
The strained and excessive cordiality of Edward Conway,
as he bounded up at his approach,the hearty grasp of
the hand which he extended,met with little answering
warmth on the part of the former. His eye encountered
the glance of the fugitive without fear, but with cold
reserve
;
his hand was quickly withdrawn from the close
clutch which received it; and the words with which he
acknowledged and answered the other's salutation were as
few, and such only, as were unavoidable. The fugitive
saw the suspicion, and felt the coldness with which he
was encountered. Without seeming offended, he made it
the subject of immediate remark.
Ha, Jack, how is this? Friendsold friendsshould
not meet after such a fashion. Wherefore are you so cold?
Do you forget me? Have you forgotten that we were boys
together, Jack,playmates for so many happy years?
No, no! I hain't forgotten any thing, Edward
Conway
,
that a plain man ought to remember; replied the
woodman, taking literally the reproach of his companion.
But we ain't boys and playmates any longer, Edward
Conway. We are men now, and these are no times for
play of any sort; and there's a precious few among us
that know with whom we can play safely, nowadays,
without finding our fingers in the cat's mouth.
True enough, Jack; but what's true of other people
needn't be true of us. Times change; but they shouldn't
change friends. We are the same, I trust, that we have
ever been to one another.
This was said with an eager insinuating manner, and
the hand of Conway was a second time extended to take
that of the other. But without regarding the movement,
Supple Jack replied with a blunt resoluteness of
demeanour
,
4*
which would most effectually have rebuffed any less
flexible spirit:
I reckon we aint, Edward Conway, and it's of no use
to beat about the bush to find out what to say. Times
change and we change, and it's onnatural to expect to keep
the same in all weathers. I know there's a mighty great
change in me, and I'm thinking there's the same sort of
change going on in a'most every body. I used to be a
quiet peaceable sort of person, that wouldn't hurt a kitten;
and now I'm wolfish more than once a week, and mighty
apt to do mischief when I feel so. I used to believe that
whatever a pair of smooth lips said to me was true, and
now I suspicions every smooth speaker I meet, as if he
was no better than a snake in the grass. 'Taint in my
natur to keep the same always any more than the weather,
and I tell you plainly I'm quite another sort of person from
the boy that used to play with you, and Clarence Conway,
long time ago.
Ah, Jack, but you hav'n't changed to himyou are
the same to Clarence Conway as ever.
Yes, bless God for all his marcies, that made me love
the boy when he was a boy, and kept the same heart in
me after he came to be a man. I aint ashamed to say that
I love Clarence the same as ever, since he never once, in
all my dealings with him, boy and man, ever gave me
reason to mistrust him. He's mighty like an oak in two
wayshe's got the heart of one, and there's no more bend
in him than in an oak.
The cheek of the fugitive was flushed as he listened to
this simple and direct language. He was indiscreet enough
to press the matter farther.
But why should you distrust me, Jack Bannister.
You have known me quite as long as you have known
Clarence, we have played as much together
Ay! exclaimed the other abruptly, and with a startling
energy. But we hav'n't fou't together, and bled together,
and slept together, and starved together, Edward Conway.
You hav'nt been so ready as Clarence to come out for your
country. Now I've starved in his company, and run, and
fou't, and been with him in all sorts of danger, and he's
never been the first to run, and he's always been the last
to feel that he was afraid, and to show that he was hungry.
For nine months we had but one blanket between us, and
that was half burnt up from sleeping too close to the ashes
one cold night last Christmas. It's these things that made
us friends from the beginning, and it's these things that
keep us friends till now. You don't seem altogether to
remember, that you and me were never friends, Edward
Conway, even when we were playmates; and the reason
was I always mistrusted you. Don't think I mean to hurt
your feelings by telling you the truth. You're a sort of
prisoner, you see, and it would be mighty ongenteel for me
to say any thing that mought give offence, and I ax pardon
if I does; but as I tell you, I mistrusted you from the
beginning
,
and I can't help telling you that I mistrust you to
the end. You ha'n't got the sort o' ways I like, and when
that's the case, it's no use to strain one's natur' to make a
liking between feelings that don't seem to fit. Besides,
you have a bad standing in the country. These men of
Butler's swear agin you by another name, and it looks
mighty suspicious when we come to consider that none of
the whigs have any thing to say in your behalf.
One thing is certain, John Bannister, replied the
fugitive composedly; you at least preserve your ancient
bluntness. You speak out your mind as plainly as ever.
I reckon its always best, was the answer.
Perhaps so, though you do me injustice, and your
suspicions are ungenerous. It is unfortunate for me that,
for some little time longer I must submit to be distrusted.
The time will come, however, and I hope very soon, when
you will cease to regard me with doubt or suspicion.
Well, I j'in my hope to your'n in that matter; but till
that time comes round, Edward Conway, I mought as well
say to you that we are not friends, and I don't think it 'ill
make us any nearer even if you was to prove that you're
no tory. For why,I know that you're no friend to
Clarence
,
for all he's done for you.
Ha, Bannisterhowwhat know you?
Enough to make me say what I'm saying. Now, you
hear me, jest once, for the first and last time that I may
ever have a chance of letting you see my mind. I know
enough to know that you've been a-working agin Clarence,
and I suspicions you ha'n't done working agin him. Now,
this is to let you onderstand that Jack Bannister has ne'er
an eye in his head that do'n't watch for his friend and agin
his enemy: and I tell you, all in good natur', and without
meaning any malice, that, whatever harm you do to him,
that same harm I'll double and treble to you, though I wait
'till the worst weather, and walk on bloody stumps, to do
it. I suspicions you, Edward Conway, and I give you fair
warning, I'll be at your heels, like a dog that never barks
to let the world know which way he's running.
A fair warning enough, Bannister, replied the fugitive
with recovered composure, and a moderate show of dignity.
To resent your language, at this time, would be almost
as foolish as to endeavour to prove that your suspicions
of me are groundless. I shall not feel myself less manly
or less innocent by forbearing to do either.
Well, that's jest as you think proper, Edward
Conway
;
I must ax your pardon ag'in for saying rough things
to a man that's a sort of prisoner, but I'm thinking it's
always the cleanest play to speak the truth when you're
forced to it. You've been talking at me ever since the
time I helped Clarence to git you into the swamp, as
if I had been some old friend of your'n, and it went
agin me to stand quiet and hear you all the time, and
not set you right on that matter. Now, as the thing's
done, with your leave we'll say no more about it. My
orders from the colonel are to carry you out of the swamp,
so you'll make ready as soon as you can, for there's
precious
little of daylight left for a mighty dark sort of
navigation
.
And where is hewhere do you take me? demanded
the fugitive.
Well, it's not in my orders to let you know any more
than I've told you: only I may say you don't go out
exactly
where you came in.
Enough, sir. I presume that my brother's commands
will ensure me a safe guidance? I am ready to go with
you.
This was said with that air of resentment which amply
proved to the woodman that his blunt freedoms had been
sensibly felt. He smiled only at the distrust which the
words of the fugitive seemed to betray, and the
haughtiness
of his manner appeared rather to awaken in the
woodman
a pleasurable emotion.
Well, he muttered half aloud as he prepared to throw
the boat off from her fastenings; well, it's not
onreasonable
that he should be angry. I don't know but I should
like him the better if he would throw off his coat and
back all his sly doings at the muzzle of the pistol. But
I have no patience with any thing that looks like a sneak.
It's bad enough to be dodging with an enemy, but to
dodge when a friend's looking after you, is a sort of
sport I consider mighty onbecoming in a white man.
It's nigger natur', and don't shame a black skin, but
well, you're ready, Mr. Edward? Jest take your seat in
the bottom, and keep steady. It's a ticklish sort of
navigation
we've got before us, and our dug-out aint much more
heavier than a good sized calabash. She'll swim if we're
steady, but if you dodge about we'll sp'il our leggins, and
mought be, have to swim for it. Steady, so. Are you
right, sir?
Steadyall right! was the calm, low response of the
fugitive, as the canoe darted through the lagune.
CHAPTER IV.
THE KINSMEN.
The
boat, under the adroit management of Supple Jack,
soon reached the shore where Clarence Conway awaited
them. Standing side by side, there was little obvious
difference
between the persons of the kinsmen. They were
both equally tall, strongly made, and symmetricaleach
had the same general cast of countenancethe hair was
not unlike; the complexion of Edward was darker than
that of Clarence. The difference between them,
physically
,
if not so obvious, was yet singularly marked and
substantial. There was that in the expression of their
several faces, which, to the nice physiognomical critic,
did not inaptly illustrate the vital differences in the two
characters as they will be found to display themselves in
the progress of this narrative. The forehead and chin of
the former were much smaller than those of the younger.
The cheek-bones were higher; the lips, which in
Clarence
Conway were usually compressed, giving an air of
decision to his mouth which approached severity, were, in
the case of Edward, parted into smiles, which were only
too readily and too easily evoked, not, sometimes, to
awaken doubts of their sincerity in the mind of the
spectator
.
Some well-defined lines about the upper lip and
corners of the mouth, which signified cares and anxieties,
tended still more to make doubtful the prompt smile of the
wearer. The difference of five yearsfor that period of
time lay between their several ageshad added a few
wrinkles to the cheeks and brow of the elder, which no
where appeared upon the face of the younger. A
conscience
free from reproach, had probably saved him from
tokens which are quite as frequently the proofs of an
ill-ordered
life as of age and suffering. Some other leading
differences between the two might be traced out by a close
observer, and not the least prominent of these, exhibited
itself at the moment of their present meeting in the
over-acted
kindness and extreme courtesy of the fugitive
kinsman
.
His sweet soft tones of conciliation, his studied
gentleness
of accent, and the extreme humility of his gesture
all appeared in large contrast with the simple, unaffected
demeanour of the younger. His feelings were all too
earnest for mannerism of any sort; and motioning Jack
Bannister aside, he met his half-brother with an air full of
direct purpose, and a keenly awakened consciousness of
the dark doubts renewed in his mind upon that mystery
which rose up like a wall between them. It was difficult
to say, while Edward Conway was approaching him,
whether sorrow or anger predominated in his countenance.
The face of the fugitive beamed with smiles, and his hand
was extended. His hand remained untaken, however, and
his eye shrunk from the encounter with that searching
glance which awaited him in the eye of Clarence. A
slight suffusion passed over his cheek, and there was a
tremor in his voice as he spoke, which might be natural to
the resentment which he must have felt, but which he
showed no other disposition to declare.
So cold to me, Clarence? What now should awaken
your displeasure? You have behaved nobly in this
business
do
not send me from you in anger!
I have behaved only as a brother, Edward Conway.
Would that you could feel like one! You have again
deceived
me! was the stern, accusing answer.
Deceived you! was the reply, and the eye of the
speaker wandered from the strong glance of his kinsman,
and his lips whitened as he spoke; how, Clarencehow
have I deceived you?
But this day you assured me, on your honour, that
you had not sought Flora Middleton since my last
conference
with you on the subject. I now know that you
have been at Briar Park within the last three weeks.
The practised cunning of the worldling came to the
relief of the accused, and Edward Conway availed himself
of one of those petty evasions to which none but the mean
spirit is ever willing to resort.
Very true, Clarence, but I did not seek Flora in going
there. I happened to be in the neighbourhood at nightfall,
and saw no good reason for avoiding a good supper and a
comfortable bed, which I knew the hospitalities of Briar
Park would always afford me. I did go therethat is
truesaw Flora and all the familybut it is nevertheless
equally true, that in going there I did not seek her.
But you withheld the fact of your being there, Edward
Conway, and left the impression on my mind that you had
not seen her.
I did not seek to convey such an impression, Clarence;
I simply spoke to the point, and spoke with literal
exactitude
.
You have a legal proficiency in language; was the
sarcastic comment. But for this I should probably have
heard the whole truth. What good reason was there why
you should be so partial in your revelations? Why did
you not tell me all?
To answer you frankly, Clarence, replied the other
with the air of a man unbuttoning his bosom to the
examination
of the worldI found you jealous and suspicious
on this subjectin just the mood to convert the least
important
circumstance into a cause of doubt and
dissatisfaction
;
and, therefore, I withheld from you a fact which,
however innocent in itself, and unworthy of consideration,
I was yet well aware, in your tone of mind, would assume
an importance and character which justly it could not
merit. Besides, Clarence, there were so many subjects of
far more interest to my mind, of which we had no speech,
that I did not care to dwell upon the matter longer than
was necessary. You forget, Clarence, that I had not seen
you for months before this meeting.
The suspicions of the younger were in no respect
disarmed
or lessened by this explanation. Edward Conway
had somewhat overshot his mark when he spoke so
slightingly
of a subject to which Clarence attached so high an
importance. The latter could not believe in the
indifference
which the other expressed in reference to one so
dear to himself as Flora Middleton; and, in due degree as
he felt the probability that so much merit as he esteemed
that maiden to possess, could not fail to awaken the tender
passion in all who beheld her, so was he now inclined to
consider the declaration of his kinsman as an hypocrisy
equally gross and shallow. He resolved, internally, that
he should neither deceive his judgment nor disarm his
watchfulness; that, while he himself forbore reproaches
of every sort, which, indeed, at that moment would have
seemed ungenerous and ungracious, he would endeavour
to maintain a
surveillance
over his rival's movements,
which would at least defeat such of his machinations as
might otherwise tend to beguile from himself the
affections
of the beloved object. The closing words of Edward
Conway suggested a natural change of the subject, of
which Clarence quickly availed himself.
You remind me, Edward Conway, that though we
have spoken of various and interesting subjects, you have
not yet given me the information which I sought, on any.
The one most important to both of us, Edward Conway
to our father's family, to the name we bear, and the position
we should equally sustain, as well to the past as to the
future, in the eye of our countryis that of your present
public course. On that subject you have told me nothing.
Of your position in this conflict I know nothing; and
what little reaches my ears from the lips of others, is
painfully unfavourable. Nay, more, Edward Conway, I
am constrained to think, and I say it in bitterness and
sadness
,
that what you have said, in reply to my frequent and
earnest inquiries, on this point, has seemed to me intended
rather to evade than to answer my demands. I cannot
divest myself of the conviction that you have spoken on
this subject with as careful a suppression of the whole
truth, as this morning when you gave me the assurance
with regard to Flora Middleton.
A heavy cloud darkened, though for a moment only, the
face of the elder Conway.
There are some very strong prejudices against me
in your mind, Clarence, or it would not be difficult for
you to understand, how I might very naturally have
secrets
which should not be revealed, and yet be engaged
in no practices which would either hurt my own, or the
honour of my family.
This I do not deny, Edward, however suspicious it
may seem that such secrets should be withheld from an
only brother, whose faith you have never yet found reason
VOL. I. 5
to suspect; whose prudence you have never found
occasion
to distrust. But I do not ask for any of your
secrets. I should scorn myself for ever did I feel a
single desire to know that which you have any good
reason to withhold from me. It is only that I may
defend you from injusticefrom slanderfrom the
suspicions
of the true and the worthy,that I would be
fortified by a just knowledge of your objects and
pursuits
.
Surely, there can be no good reason to withhold
this knowledge, if what you do is sanctioned by
propriety
and the cause for which we are all in arms.
It is sanctioned by the cause for which we are in
arms; replied the other, hastily. Have I not assured
you that I am no traitorthat my fidelity to my country
is not less pure and perfect than your own? The
slanderer
will defame and the credulous will believe, let us
labour as we may. I take no heed of theseI waste no
thought on such profitless matters; and you, Clarence,
will save yourself much pain, and me much annoying
conjecture, if you will resolve to scorn their
consideration
with myself, and cast them from your mind. Give
them no concern. Believe me to be strangely and
awkwardly placed; but not criminalnot wilfully and
perversely bent on evil. Is not this enough? What
more shall I say? Would you have meyour elder
brotherbearing the same name with yourselfdeclare
to you, in words, that I am not the black-hearted,
blood-thirsty
,
reckless monster, which these wide-mouthed
creatures, these blind mouths and bitter enemies,
proclaim
me?
But why are these men of Butler
your
enemies?
They are not the enemies of your country.
I know not that, said the other hastily.
Your doubt does them gross injustice; replied
Clarence Conway, with increased earnestness; they
are known mentried and trueand whatever may be
their excesses and violence, these are owing entirely to
the monstrous provocation they have received. How
can it be, Edward, that you have roused these men to
such a degree of hostility against yourself. They bear
to you no ordinary hatethey speak of you in no
ordinary
language of denunciation
My dear Clarence, said the other, you seem to
forget all the while, that they never spoke of me at all
certainly not by name. They know me notthey have
most assuredly confounded me with another. Even if I
were indeed the person whom they hate, to answer your
questions would be no easy matter. As well might I
undertake to show why there are crime and injustice in
the world, as why there are slander and suspicion.
These are plants that will grow, like joint-grass, in every
soil, weed and work at them as you may.
It is nevertheless exceedingly strange, Edward, was
the musing answer of the still unsatisfied Clarence; it
is strange how any set of men should make such a
mistake
.
The strangest thing of all is, that my own brother
should think it so. Why should you?
Should I not?
Wherefore?You cannot believe that I am, indeed,
what they allege me to bethe chief of the Black
Ridersthat dreaded monsterhalf man, half dragon
who slays the men, swallows the children, and flies off
with the damsels. Ha! ha! ha! Really, Clarence, I
am afraid you are as credulous now at twenty-five as
you were at five.
It is not
that
I believe, Edward Conway. If I did,
the name of my father, which you bear, had not saved
your life. But, why, again, are you suspected?
Suspicion
follows no actions that are not doubtfulit dogs
no footsteps which are straightforwardit haunts no
character, the course of which has been direct and
unequivocal
?
My unhappiness is that you have made
yourself liable to be confounded with the criminal,
because you have not been seen with the innocent.
You are not with us, and the natural presumption is that
you are with our enemies.
I should not care much for the idle gabble of these
country geese, Clarence, but that you should echo their
slandersthat you should join in the hiss.
I do notall I demand of you is that confidence
which would enable me to silence it.
As well attempt to silence the storm. The attempt
would be idle; and, if made, where should we begin?
What suspicion must I first dissipate? Whose
poisonous
breath must I first encounter? This story of the
Black Riders, for exampledo you really believe,
Clarence, in the alleged existence of this banditti?
I do!I cannot believe otherwise.
Impossible! I doubt it wholly. These dastardly
fellows of Butler, have fancied half the terrors they
describe
.
Their fears have magnified their foes, and I
make no question they have slandered as civil a set of
enemies as ever had a professional sanction for
throat-cutting
.
Really, Clarence, the very extravagance of
these stories should save you from belief; and I must
say, if you do believe, that a little more of the brotherly
love which you profess, should keep you from supposing
me to be the savage monster of whom they give such
horrid traits in the chief of this Black banditti. My very
appearancein our youth, Clarence, considered not very
much unlike your ownshould save me from these
suspicions
.
See!my skin is rather fair than dark; and as
for the mass of hair which is said to decorate the chin,
and the black shock which surrounds the face of the
formidable outlawnone who looks at my visage will
fancy that Essau could ever claim me for his kinsman.
My vanity, indeed, is somewhat touched, Clarence, that
my smooth visage should suffer such cruel
misrepresentation
.
And as the speaker concluded this rhapsody, his eye
suddenly wandered from that of the person he addressed,
and rested upon the belt which encircled his own body
a belt of plain black leather, secured by an ordinary iron
buckle, painted of the same colour, and freshly varnished.
An uneasy upward glance, at this moment, encountered
that of his kinsman, whose eyes had evidently followed
his own, to the examination of the same object. In this
single glance and instant, it seemed that the moral chasm
which had always existed between their souls, had
yawed
wider and spread farther than before. There was a
mutual instinct where there was no mutual sympathy.
The disquiet of the one, and the doubts of the other, were
re-awakened; and though neither spoke, yet both
understood
the sudden difficulties of farther speech between
them. Another voice, at this moment, broke the silence,
which it did not however relieve of any of that painful
pressure which the interview possessed over both the
interested parties. The impatience of the worthy
woodman
had brought him sufficiently nigh to hear some of
the last words of the elder kinsman.
Well, said he, bluntly, if long talking can make
any case cl'ar, then it's pretty sartin, Edward Conway,
that they've mightily belied you. What you say is very
true about skin, and face, and complexion, and all that.
Naterally, you han't no great deal of beard, and your
shock, as it stands, wouldn't be a sarcumstance alongside
of the colonel's or my own. But I've hearn of
contrivances
to help natur in sich a matter. I've hearn of
livin' men, and livin' women too, that dressed themselves
up in the sculps of dead persons, and made a mighty
pretty figure of hair for themselves, when, naterally, they
had none. Now, they do say, that the Black Riders
does the same thing. Nobody that I've ever hearn speak
of them, ever said that the sculps was nateral that they
had on; and the beards, too, would come and go, jist
according to the company they want to keep. It's only
a matter of ten days agothe time you may remember
by a mighty ugly run you had of it from these same boys
of Butlerthat I was a-going over the same ground,
when, what should I happen to see in the broad track
but one of these same movable sculpsthe sculp for
the head and the sculp for the chin, and another sculp
that don't look altogether so nateral, that must ha' gone
somewhere about the mouth, though it must ha' been
mighty onpleasant a-tickling of the nostrils; for you see,
if I knows any thing of human natur, or beast natur, this
sculp come, at first, from the upper side of a five year old
fox-squirrel, one of the rankest in all the Santee country.
I know by the feel somewhat, and a little more by the
5*
smell. Now, Mr. Edward Conway, if you'll jist look at
these here fixin's, you won't find it so hard to believe
that a fair skinned man mout wear a black sculp and a
mighty dark complexion underneath, if so be the notion
takes him. Seein's believing. I used to think, before
we went out, that it was all an old woman's story, but as
sure as a gun, I found these sarcumstances, jist as you
see 'em, on the broad path down to the Wateree; and I
reckon that's a strong sarcumstance in itself, to make me
think they was made for something, and for somebody
to wear. But that's only my notion. I reckon it's easy
enough, in these times, for every man to find a different
way of thinking when he likes to.
The articles described by the woodman were drawn
from his bosom as he spoke, and displayed before the
kinsmen. The keen eyes of Clarence, now doubly
sharpened by suspicion, seemed disposed to pierce into
the very soul of Edward Conway. He, however,
withstood
the analysis with all the calm fortitude of a martyr.
He examined the several articles with the manner of
one to whom they were entirely new and strange; and
when he had done, he quietly remarked to the deliberate
woodman, that he had certainly produced sufficient
evidence
to satisfy him, if indeed he were not satisfied
before, that a man, disposed to adopt a plan of
concealment
and disguise, could readily find, or make, the
materials
to do so.
But this, Clarence, said he, turning to his kinsman,
this has nothing to do with what I was saying of
myself
.
It does not impair the assurance which I made
you
Clarence Conway, who had been closely examining
the articles, without heeding his brother, demanded of
the woodman why he had not shown them to him
before.
Well, colonel, you see I didn't find them ontil the
second day after the chase, when you sent me on the
scout along the hills.
Enough!Bring up the horses.
Both? asked the woodman, with some anxiety.
Yes! I will ride a little way with my brother.
The horses were brought in a few moments from the
mouth of a gorge which ran between the hills at the foot
of which they stood. The promptness of the
woodman's
movements prevented any conversation,
meanwhile
,
between the kinsmen; nor did either of them
appear to desire it. The soul of Clarence was full of a
new source of disquiet and dread; while the
apprehensions
of Edward Conway, if entirely of another sort,
were yet too active to permit of his very ready speech.
As the kinsmen were preparing to mount, Supple Jack
interposed, and drew his superior aside.
Well, what's the matter now? demanded Clarence
impatiently. Speak quickly, Jackthe storm is at
handthe rain is already falling.
Yes, and that's another reason for your taking to
the swamp ag'in. In three hours the hills will tell a
story of every step that your horse is taking.
Well, what of that?
Why, matter enough, if the tories are on the look
out for us, which I'm dub'ous is pretty much the case.
I didn't altogether like the signs I fell in with on the
last scout, and if so be that Edward Conway is one of
these Black Riders, then it's good reason to believe
they'll be looking after him where they lost him.
Pshaw, no more of this; said the other angrily.
Well, Clarence, you may `pshaw' it to me as much
as you please, only I'm mighty sartain, in your secret
heart, you don't `pshaw' it to yourself. It's a strange
business enough, and it's not onreasonable in me to
think soseeing what I have seen, and knowing what
I know. Now that Butler's boys are gone upwards,
these fellows will swarm thick as grasshoppers in all
this country; and it's my notion, if you will go, that
you should keep a sharp eye in your head, and let your
dogs bark at the first wink of danger. I'm dub'ous
you're running a mighty great risk on this side of the
Wateree. There's no telling where Marion is jist at
this time; and there's a rumour that Watson's on the
road to j'in Rawdon. Some say that Rawdon's going
to leave Camden, and call in his people from Ninety-Six
and Augusta; and if so, this is the very part of the
country where there's the best chance of meeting him
and all of them. I wouldn't ride far, Clarence; and I'd
ride fast; and I'd git back as soon as horseflesh could
bring me. Sorrel is in full blood now, and he'll show
the cleanest heels in the country, at the civillest axing of
the spur.
You are getting as timid, Jack, as you are
suspicious
,
said the youth kindly, and with an effort at
composure, which was not successful. Age is coming
upon you, and I fear, before the campaign is over, you'll
be expecting to be counted among the non-combatants.
Don't fear for me, Jack; I will return before midnight.
Keep up your scout, and get a stouter heart at work
you couldn't have a better one.
That's to say, Clarry, that I'm a darn'd good-natered
fool for my pains. I understand you The rest was
lost to the ears of Clarence Conway, in the rush of his
own and the steed of his companion. But, fool or not,
I'll look after you, as many a fool before has looked
after a wiser man, and been in time to save him
when he couldn't save himself. As for you, Ned
Conway
,
he continued in brief soliloquy, and with a lifted
finger, you may draw your skirts over the eyes of
Clarence, but it'll take thicker skirts than yourn to blind
Jack Bannister. You couldn't do it altogether when I
was a boyit'll be a mighty onbecoming thing to me,
now that I'm a man, if I should let you be any more
successful. Well, here we stand. The thing's to be
done; the game's to be played out; and the stakes.
Ned Conway, must be my head agin yourn. The
game's a fair one enough, and the head desarves to lose
it, that can't keep its place on the shoulders where God
put it.
With this conclusive philosophy, the scout tightened
his belt about his waist, threw up his rifle, the flint and
priming of which he carefully examined, then,
disappearing
among the stunted bushes that grew beside the
swamp thicket, he soon after emerged, leading a stout
Choctaw pony, which had been contentedly ruminating
among the cane-tops. Mounting this animal, which was
active and sure-footed, he set off in a smart canter in the
track pursued by his late companions, just as the
rainstorm
,
which had been for some time threatening, began
to discharge the hoarded torrents of several weeks upon
the parched and thirsting earth.
CHAPTER V.
THE BLACK RIDERS.
While
the kinsmen were about to leave the banks of
the Wateree, for the Santee hills beyond, there were
other parties among those hills, but a few miles distant,
preparing to move down, on the same road, towards the
Wateree. The eye of the skulking woodman may have
seen, towards nightfall, a motley and strange group of
horsemen, some sixty or seventy in number, winding
slowly adown the narrow gorges, with a degree of
cautious
watchfulness, sufficient to make them objects of
suspicion
,
even if the times were not of themselves enough
to render all things so. The unwonted costume of these
horsemen was equally strange and discouraging. They
were dressed in complete blackeach carried
broadsword
and pistols, and all the usual equipments of the
well-mounted dragoon. The belt around the waist, the
cap which hung loosely upon the brow; the gloves, the
sashall were distinguished by the same gloomy aspect.
Their horses alone, various in size and colour, impaired
the effect of this otherwise general uniformity. Silently
they kept upon their way, like the shadows of some
devoted band of the olden time, destined to reappear, and
to reoccupy, at certain periods of the night, the scenes
in which they fought and suffered. Their dark, bronzed
visages, at a nearer approach, in no wise served to
diminish
the general severity of their appearance. Huge,
bushy beards, hung from every chin, in masses almost
weighty enough to rival the dense forests which are seen
at the present day, in the same region, by a more pacific
people. The moustache ran luxuriant above the mouth,
while a tuft below, like that which decorates the turkey,
emulated the thickness, if not the extent, of this imperial
treasure, in that pompous bird. Some of these
decorations
were, doubtlessly, like those which became the spoil
of our worthy woodman in a previous chapter, of
artificial
origin; but an equal number were due to the
bounteous
indulgence of Dame Nature herself. Of the troop
in question, and their aspects, something more might be
said. They had evidently, most of them, seen service
in the imminent deadly breach. Ugly scars were
conspicuous on sundry faces, in spite of the extensive
foliage of beard, which storve vainly to conceal them;
and the practised ease of their horsemanship, the veteran
coolness which marked their deliberate and watchful
movements, sufficiently declared the habitual and
well-appointed
soldier.
Still, there was not so much of that air of military
subordination among them which denotes the regular
school of warlike exercises. They seemed to be men,
to whom something of discipline was relaxed in
consideration
of other more valuable qualities of valour and
forward enterprise, for which they might be esteemed.
Though duly observant not to do any thing which might
yield advantage to an enemy, prowling in the
neighbourhood
,
still, this caution was not so much the result of
respect for their leader, as the natural consequence of
their own experience, and the individual conviction of
each of what was due to the general safety. They were
not altogether silent as they rode, and when they
addressed
their superiors, there was none of that nice and
blind deference upon which military etiquette, among all
well-ordered bodies of men, so imperatively insists. The
quip and crack were freely indulged inthe ribald jest
was spoken; and, if the ribald song remained unsung, it
was simply because of a becoming apprehension that its
melodies might reach other ears than their own.
Their leader, if he might be so considered, to whom
they turned for the small amount of guidance which they
seemed to need, was scarcely one of the most attractive
among their number. He was a short, thick set,
dark-looking
person, whose stern and inflexible features were
never lightened unless by gleams of anger and ferocity.
He rode at their head, heard in silence the most that was
said by those immediately about him, and if he gave any
reply, it was uttered usually in a cold, conclusive
monosyllable
.
His dark eye was turned as frequently upward
to the lowering skies as along the path he travelled.
Sometimes he looked back upon his troopand
occasionally
halted at the foot of the hill till the last of his
band had appeared in sight above. His disposition to
taciturnity was not offensive to those to whom he
permitted
a free use of that speech in which he did not
himself
indulge; and without heeding his phlegm, his free
companions went on without any other restraint than
arose from their own sense of what was due to caution
in an enemy's country. Beside the leader, at moments,
rode one who seemed to be something of a favourite with
him, and who did not scruple, at all times, to challenge
the punctual attention of his superior. He was one
perhaps, the very youngest of the partywhose quick,
active movements, keen eyes, and glib utterance,
declared
him to belong to the class of subtler spirits who
delight to manage the more direct, plodding, and less
ready of their race. It is not improbable that he
possessed
some such influence over the person whom we
have briefly described, of which the latter was himself
totally unconscious. Nothing in the deportment of the
former would have challenged a suspicion of this sort.
Though he spoke freely and familiarly, yet his manner,
if any thing, was much more respectful than that
generally
of his companions. A close observer, the unquiet
glances of his superior, had not escaped his observation.
He rode up, carefully restraining his steed a quarter in
the rear, and with a short broken cough, obviously
intended
to preface the comment which he meant to offer,
he thus remarked on the unfailing topic.
We are like to have the storm on our backs,
lieutenant
,
before we can get to a place of shelter; and I'm
thinking if we don't look out for quarters before it comes
down in real earnest, there'll be small chance of our
finding our way afterward. The night will be here in two
hours, and a mighty dark one it will be, I'm thinking.
The lieutenant looked forward, and upward, and around
him, and a slight grunt, which was half a sigh, seemed
to acknowledge the truth of the other's observations.
I doubt, continued the first speaker, if our drive
to-day will be any more lucky than before. I'm afraid
it's all over with the captain.
Another grunt in the affirmative; and the subordinate
proceeded with something more of confidence.
But there's no need that we should keep up the hunt
in such a storm as is coming on. Indeed, there's but
little chance of finding any body abroad but ourselves in
such weather. I'm thinking, lieutenant, that it wouldn't
be a bad notion to turn our heads and canter off to old
Muggs' at once.
Old Muggs! why how far d'ye think he's off?
Not three miles, as I reckon. We've gone about
seven from Cantey's, he's only eight to the right, and if
we take a short cut that lies somewhere in this quarter
I reckon I can find it soonwe'll be there in a short half
hour.
Well! you're rightwe'll ride to Muggs'. There's
no use keeping up this cursed hunt and no fun in it.
Yes, and I reckon we can soon make up our minds
to get another captain.
A smirk of the lips, which accompanied this sentence,
was intended to convey no unpleasant signification to the
ears of his superior.
How, Darcyhow is ithave you sounded them?
What do they say now? demanded the latter with
sudden
earnestness.
Well, lieutenant, I reckon we can manage it pretty
much as we please. That's my notion.
You think so? Some of them have a strange liking
for Morton.
Yes, but not many, and they can be cured of that.
Enough, then, till we get to Muggs'. Then we can
talk it over. But beware of what you say to
him
. Muggs
is no friend of mine, you know.
Nor is he likely to be, so long as he wears that scar
on his face in token that your hand is as heavy as your
temper is passionate. He remembers that blow!
VOL. I. 6
It isn't that altogether; replied the otherbut
the truth is that we English are not favourites here, even
among the most loyal of this people. There's a leaning
to their own folks, that always gets them the preference
when we oppose them; and old Muggs has never been
slow to show us that he has no love to spare for any
king's man across the water. I only wonder, knowing
their dislikes as I do, that there's a single loyalist in the
colony. These fellows that ride behind us, merciless as
they have ever shown themselves in a conflict with the
rebels, yet, there's not one of them, who, in a pitched
battle between one of us and one of them, wouldn't be
more apt to halloo for him than for us. Nothing, indeed,
has secured them to the king's side but the foolish
violence
of the rebels, which wouldn't suffer the thing to
work its own way; and began tarring and feathering and
flogging at the beginning of the squabble. Had they left
it to time, there wouldn't have been one old Muggs from
Cape Fear to St. Catharine's. We shouldn't have had
such a troop as that which follows us now, nor would I,
this day, be hunting, as lieutenant of dragoons, after a
leader, who
Whom we shall not find in a hurry, and whom we
no longer need, said the subordinate, concluding the
sentence which the other had partly suppressed.
Policy! policy! exclaimed the lieutenant. That
was Rawdon's pretext for refusing me the commission;
and conferring it upon Morton. He belonged to some
great family on the Congaree, and must have it
therefore
but,
now, he can scarcely refuse it, if it be as we
suspect. If Morton be laid by the heels, even as a
prisoner
,
he is dead to us. The rebels will never suffer
him to live if they have taken him: and of this there can
be little question. What follows if the men agree?
And they do agree, or what is pretty much the same
thing, the command naturally falls into your hands
without
a word said. We'll see to that to-night at Muggs'.
Do so:but take the lead, Darcy, and find out this
short cut. The storm thickens, and these drops grow
bigger every moment. I'll hurry the men forward at a
canter; and even that will barely enable us to save our
distance.
It matters little for the wetting, lieutenant, to those
who gain.
Gain! yes! that's something!but The
sentence
was finished in low tones unheard by the
subordinate
,
who rode forward at a brisk pace and was shortly
out of sight. True, the gain is something. Power is
always precious. But the prize is freedom. If Morton
is down, I lose that presence which I hatedwhich I
feared. Let me not deceive myselfthough I may blind
these. Edward Morton was one in whose presence I
shrunk to less than my full proportions. That single
actthat act of shame and basenessmade me his slave.
He, alone, knows the guilt and the meanness of that
wretched moment of my life. God! what would I not
give to have that memory obliterated in him who did,
and him who beheld, the deed of that moment. I feel my
heart tremble at his approachmy muscles wither
beneath
his glance; and I, who fear not the foe, and shrink
not from the danger, and whom men call bravebrave
to desperationI dare not lift my eyes to the encounter
with those of another having limbs and a person neither
stronger nor nobler than my own. He down, and his
lips for ever closed, and I am free. I can then breathe
in confidence, and look around me without dreading the
glances of another eye.But, even should he live
should he have escaped this dangerwhy should I
continue
to draw my breath in fear, when a single stroke
may make my safety certainmay rid me of every doubt
every apprehension? It must be so. Edward Morton,
it is sworn. In your life my shame lives, and while
your lips have power of speech, I am no moment safe
from dishonour. Your doom is written, surely and soon,
if it be not already executed.
These words were only so many indistinct mutterings,
inaudible to those who followed him. He commanded
them to approach, quickened their speed, and the whole
troop, following his example, set off on a smart canter
in the track which Darcy had taken. Meanwhile, the
storm which before had only threatened, began to pour
down its torrents, and ere they reached the promised
shelter at Muggs'a rude cabin of pine logs to which
all direct approach was impossible, and which none but
an initiate could have found, so closely was it buried
among the dense groves that skirted the river swamp,
and may have formed a portion of its primitive domain.
Here the party came to a full halt, but the object at which
they aimed appeared to be less their own than their
horses and equipments. These were conducted into yet
deeper recesses, where, in close woods and shrubbery,
in which art had slightly assisted nature, they were so
bestowed, as to suffer only slightly from the storm. The
greater portion of the troop took shelter in the cabin of
Muggs, while a small squad still kept in motion around
the neighbourhood, heedless of the weather, and quite as
watchful from long habit, as if totally unconscious of any
annoyances.
The establishment of Muggs was one, in fact,
belonging
to the party. Muggs, himself, was a retired trooper,
whom a wound in the right arm had so disabled that
amputation became necessary. Useless to the troop in
actual conflict, he was yet not without his uses in the
position which he held, and the new duties he had
undertaken. He was a blunt, fearless old soldier, a
native of the neighbourhood, who, being maimed, was
tolerated by the whigs as no longer capable of harm;
and suffered to remain in a region in which it was
thought, even if disposed to do mischief, his
opportunities
were too few to make his doings of very serious
importance. He sold good liquor also, and as he made
no distinction between his customers, and provided
whigs and tories at the same prices, there was no good
reason to expel him from his present position by way of
punishing him for a course of conduct to which so
heavy a penalty seemed already to have been attached.
He was prudent enough, though he did not withhold his
opinions, to express them without warmth or venom;
and, as it was well known to the patriots that he had
never been a savage or blood-thirsty enemy, there was a
very general disposition among them to grant him every
indulgence. Perhaps, however, all these reasons would
have been unavailing in his behalf, at the sanguinary
period of which we write, but for the excellence of his
liquors, and the certainty of his supply. His relation
with the British enabled him always to provide himself
at Charleston, and every public convoy replenished his
private stores. It should be also understood that none
of the whigs, at any moment, suspected the worthy
landlord
of a previous or present connexion with a band so
notoriously odious as that of the Black Riders. The
appearance of these desperadoes was only a signal to
Muggs to take additional precautions. As we have
already stated, a portion of the band were sent out to
patrol the surrounding country, and their number, on
the present occasion, was, by the earnest entreaty of
the host, made twice as large as their captain thought
there was any occasion for. But the former insisted
with characteristic stubbornness, and with a degree of
sullenness in his manner which was foreign to his usual
custom.
I'm not over pleased to see you here at all, this
time, lieutenant, though I reckon you've a good reason
enough for coming. There's a bright stir among the
rebels all along the Wateree, and down on the Santee,
there's no telling you how far. As for the Congaree,
it's a swarm, in spite of all Bill Cunningham can do,
and he's twice as spry as ever. Here, only two days
ago, has been that creeping critter, Supple Jack; that
come in, as I may say, over my shoulder, like the old
Satan himself. At first I did think it was the old Satan,
till he laughed at my scare, and I then know'd him by
his laugh. Now it's not so easy to cheat Supple Jack,
and he knows all about your last coming. He's willing
to befriend me, though he give me fair warning, last time
he was here, that I was suspicioned for loving you too
well. Now, split my cedars, men, I've got mighty little
reason to love youyou know thatand I'm thinking,
for your sake and mine both, the sooner you draw spur
for the mountains, the smoother will be the skin you
keep. I don't want to see the ugly face of one of you
for a month of Sundays.
Why, Muggsold Muggsgetting scared in the
6*
very beginning of the season? How's thiswhat's
come over you? was the demand of half a dozen.
I've reason to be scared, when I know that hemp's
growing for every man that keeps bad company. Such
rapscallions as you, if you come too often, would break
up the best `mug' in the country.
The landlord's pun was innocent enough, and seemed
an old one. It awakened no more smile on his lips than
upon those of his guests. It was spoken in serious
earnest. He continued to belabour them with half
playful
abuse, mingled with not a few well-intended
reproaches
,
while providing, with true landlord
consideration
,
for their several demands. The Jamaica rum was
put in frequent requisitiona choice supply of lemons
was produced from a box beneath the floor, and the band
was soon broken up into little groups that huddled about,
each after its own fashion, in the several corners of the
wigwam. The rain meanwhile beat upon, and, in some
places, through the roofthe rush of the wind, the
weight of the torrent, and the general darkness of the
scene, led naturally to a considerable relaxation even of
that small degree of discipline which usually existed
among the troop. Deep draughts were swallowed, loud
talking ensued, frequent oaths, and occasionally a sharp
dispute, qualified by an equally sharp snatch of song
from an opposite quarter, proved all parties to be at ease,
and each busy to his own satisfaction.
The lieutenant of the troop, whom we have just seen
acting in command, was perhaps the least satisfied of
any of the party. Not that he had less in possession,
but that he had more in hope. He suffered the jibe and
the song to pass; the oath roused him not, nor did he
seem to hear the thousand and one petty disputes that
gave excitement to the scene. He seemed disposed
and this may have been a part of his policyto release
his men from all the restraints, few though they were,
which belonged to his command. But his policy was
incomplete. It was not enough that he should confer
licentious privileges upon his followersto secure their
sympathies, he should have made himself one of them.
He should have given himself a portion of that license
which he had accorded to them. But the was too much
of the Englishman for that. He could not divest
himself
of that haughty bearing which was so habitual in the
carriage of the Englishman in all his dealings with the
provincial, and which, we suspect, was, though unde
clared, one of the most active influences to provoke the
high-spirited people of the south to that violent severing
of their connexion with the mother country, which was
scarcely so necessary in their case as in that of the
northern colonies. The lieutenant, whose name was
Stockton, made sundry, but not very successful efforts,
to blend himself with his comrades. He shared their
draughts, he sometimes yielded his ears where the
dialogue seemed earnestsometimes he spoke, and his
words were sufficiently indulgent; but he lacked utterly
that ease of carriage, that simplicity of manner, which
alone could prove that his condescension was not the
result
of effort, and against the desires of his mind. His
agent, Darcy, was more supple as he was more subile.
He was not deficient in those arts which, among the
ignorant, will aways secure the low. He drank with
them, as if he could not well have drunk without themthrew himself among their ranks, as if he could not have
disposed his limbs easily any where else; and did for
his superior, what the latter could never have done for
himself. He operated sufficinetly on the minds of
several
to secure a faction in his favour, and thus
strengthened
,
he availed himself of the moment when the Jamaica
had proved some portion of its potency, to broach openly
the subject which had hitherto been only discussed in
private.
Of the entreaties, the arguments, or the promises made
by Ensign Darcy to persuade the troop into his way of
thinking, we shall nothing. It will be sufficient for
our purpose that we show the condition of things at this
particular juncture. Considerable progress had now
been made with the subject. It had, in fact, become the
one subject of discussion. The person whom it more
immediately concerned, had, prudentlyu, if not modestly,
withdrawn himself from the apartment, though in doing
so, he necessarily exposed himself to some encounter
with the pitiless storn. The various groups had
mingled
themselves into one. The different smaller topies
which before excited them, had given way before the
magnitude of this, and each trooper began to feel his
increased importances as his voice seemed necessary in
the creation of so great a person as his captain. So far,
Darcy had no reason to be dissatisfied with his
performances
.
Assisted by the Jamaica, his arguments had
sunk deep into their souls. One after another had
become
a convert to his view, and he was just about to
flatter himself with the conviction that he should soon
be rejoiced by the unanimous shout which should
declare
the nominaion of their new captain, when another
party, who before had said not a single word, now joined
in the discussion after a manner of his own. This was
no less important a personage than Muggs, the
landlord
.
Counting scupls before you take 'em! I wonder
where the dickens you was brought up, Ensign Darcy.
Here now you're for making a new cappin, afore you
know what's come of the old. You reckon Ned
Mbrton's
dead, do you? I reckon he's alive and kicking.
I don't say so, mind me. I wouldn't wear sich a thing
on Scripture book, but I'm so night sure of it, that I'd be
willinhg to swear never agen to touch a drop of the stuff
if so be he is not alive.
But, Muggsif he's alive where is he?
Gog's wounds! that's easier asked than answered: but if we go to count for dead every chap that's missing,
I'd have to go in mourning mighty often for the whole
troop of you, my chickens. It's more reasonable that
he's alive jist because we don't hear of him. We'd ha' hearn of him soon enough if the rebels had a got him.
We'd ha' seen his hide upon a drum-head, and his own
head upon a stump, and there wouldn't ha' been a dark
corner on the Wateree that wouldn't ha' been ringing
with the uproar about it. I tell you, my lads, that day
that sees the death of New Morton, won't be a quiet day
in these parts. There'll be more of a storm in these
woods than is galloping through 'em now. If you don't
cry that day, the rebets will; and let them lose what
they may in the skrimmage, they'll have a gain when they flatten him on his back!
Ah, Muggs! exclaimed Darcy, I'm afraid you let
your wishes blind you to the truth. I suppose you
don't know that we got the captain's horse, and he all
bloody?
Don't I know, and don't I think, for that very reason
too, that he's safe and sound, and will soon be among
you. You found his horse, but not him. The horse
was bloody. Well! If the blood had been his and vital blood, don't you think you'd ha' found the rider as
well as the horse? But, perhaps, you didn't stay long
enough for the hunt. Folks say you all rode well
enough that day. But if the cappin was mortal hurt and
you didn't find him, the rebels would, and then what a
`halloo-balloo' we should have had. No, to my
thinking
,
the cappin lost the horse a-purpose when he found
he couldn't lose the rebels. The whole troop of Butler
was upon him, swearing death again him at every jump.
Be sure now, Ned Morton left the critter to answer for
him, and tuk to the swamp like a brown bear in
September
.
I can't feel as if he was dead; and, if he was,
Ensign Darcy, I, for one, wouldn't help in making a
cappin out of any butr one that comes out of the airth.
I'm for country born, if any.
Well, Muggs, what objection do you find to the
lieutenant?
He's not country born, I tell you.
But he's a good officerthere's not a better in the
country than Lieutenant Stockton.
That mout be, and then, agin, it moutn't. I'm
a-thinking Ben Williams is about as good a man as you
could choose for your cappin, if so be Ned Morton's
slipped hiss wind for sartin. I don't see Ben here to-nightat this presentbut look at him when he comes
in, and you'll say that's the man to be a cappin. He's a
dragoon, now, amog a thousand, and then, agin, he's
country born.
But Muggs, I don't see that your argument goes for
much. An American born is a king's man, and a British
born is the same, and its natural, when they're fighting
on the same side, that a Brish born should have
command
just the same as the American.
I don't see that it's natural, and I don't believe it.
There's a mightly difference between 'em to my
thinking
.
As for your king's men and British men. I'm one
that wishes you had let us alone to fight it out among
ourselves, rebel and loyal, jist as we stand. It was a
sort of family quarred, and would he' been soon over, if you hadn't dipped a long spoon into our dish. They'd
ha' licked us or we'd ha' licked them, and which ever
way it went, we'd all ha' been quiet long afore this.
But here you come, with your Irishmen, and your
Yagers, your Scotchmen and your Jarmans, and you've
made the matter worse without helping yourselves. For,
where are you? As you what? No, by the powers!
You say Rawdon's licked Greene. It's well enough to
say so. But where's Greene and where's Rawdon?
IF you aint hearn, I can tell you.
Well? from half a dozen. Let's heat! The
news! The news!
Well! It's not wellnot well for you, at least;
and the sooner you're gone from these parts the better.
Rawdon that licked Greene is about to run from Greene
that he licked. I have it from Scrub Heriotlittle Scrub,
you knowthat they've had secret council in Camden,
and all's in a mist therethe people half scared to death,
for they say that they can't get becon or beans, and
Rawdon's going to vackyate, and swearns, if he had to do
so, he'll make Camden such a blaze that it'll light his
way all down to Charlestown. I'm looking out for the
burst every night. That's not all. There's as fresh a
gathering of the rebels along the Santee and Pedee under
Marion, as if every fellow you had ever killed had got
his sculp back again, and was jest as ready to kick as ever.
Well, Tom Taylor's brushing like a little breeze about
Granby, and who but Sumter rides the road now from
Ninety-Six to Augusta? Who but he? Cunningham
darsn't show his teeth along the track for fear they'll be
drawed through the back of his head. Well, if this is
enough to make you feel scarey, aint it enough to make
Ned Morton keep close and hold in his breath till he
finds a clean country before him. Don't you think of
making a new cappin till you're sartin what's come of
the old; and if it's all over with him, then I say look
out for another man among you that comes out of the
airth. Ben Williams for me, lads, before any other.
Hurrah for Ben Williams! was the maudlin ery of
half a dozen. The lieutenant at this moment reappeared.
His glance was frowningly fixed upon the landlord, in a
way to convince Muggs that he had not remained
uninformed
as to the particular course which the latter had
taken. But it was clearly not his policy to show his
anger in any more decided manner, and the cudgels were
taken up for him by Darcy, who, during the various long
speeches of the landlord had contrived to maintain a
running
fire among the men. He plied punch and
persuasion
strong
argument and strong drinkwith equal
indusry; and the generous tendencies of the party
began
every where to overflow. He felt his increasing
strength, and proceecded to carry the attack into the
enemy's
country.
The truthy is, Muggs, you have a grude at the
lieutenant ever since you had that brush together. You
can't so readily forget that ugly mark on your muzzle.
Look you, Ensign Darcy, there's something in that
you say that a leetle turns upon my stomach; for you
see it's not the truth. I have no more grudge again
Lieutenant Stockton than I have again you. As for the
mark you speak of, I do say, it did him nho great credit
to make such a mark on a one-armed man; though I'd
ha' paid him off with a side-wipe that would he' made
him 'spectful enough to the one I had left, if so be that
Ben Williams hadn't put in to save him. That was the
only onfriendly thing that Ben ever done to me to my
knowing. No! I han't no grudges, thank God for all
his blessings, but that's no reason why I shouldn't say
what I do say, that Cappin Ned Morton'ss the man for
my money; and, thouhg I can't have much to say in the
business, seeing I aint no longer of the troop, yet if'twas
the last word I had to reticulate, I'd cry it for him.
Here's to Ned Morton, boys, living or dead.
And here's to Lieutenant Stockton, boys, and may
he soon be Captain of the Black Riders.
Hurrah for Stockton! Hurrah! was the now
almost unanimous cry, and Stockton, advancing, was
about the speak, when the faint sounds of a whistle broke
upon the night, imparting a drearier accent to the
melancholy
soughing of the wind without. The note, again
repeated, brought every trooper to his feet. The cups
were set down hastilyswords buckled oncaps donned,
and pistols examinds.
To horse, was the command of Stockton, and his
cool promptitude, shown on this occation, was perhaps
quite enough to justify the choice which the troop had
been about to make of a new captain. To hourse, he
cried, leading the way to the entrance, but ere he reached
it, the door was thrown wide, and the ambitious
lieutenant
recoiled in consternation, as he encountered in the
face of the new comer the stern visage of that very man,
supposed to be dead, whom he equally feared and hated,
and whose post he was so well disposed to fill. The chief
of the Black Riders stood suddenly among his followers,
and the shouts for the new commandard were almost
forgotten
in those which welcomed the old. But let us
retrace our steps for a few moments, and bring our
readers once more within hearing of the kinsmen.
CHAPTER VI.
FIRST FRUITS OF FREEDOM.
It
is not important to our narrative, in returning to
the place and period when and where we left the rival
kinsmen, that we should repeat the arguments which the
younger employed in order to persuade the other to a
more open and manly course of conduct in his political
career. These arguments could be of one character
only. The style in which they were urged, however,
became somewhat different, after the final interview
which they had in the presence of the sturdy woodman.
The display which Supple Jack had made of the
disguises
which he had found upon the very road over
which Edward Conway had fled, and about the very
time when he had taken shelter in the swamp from the
pursuit of Butler's men, would, to any mind not
absolutely
anxious not to believe, have been conclusive of
his guilt. Edward Conway felt it to be so in his own
case, and readily concluded that Clarence would esteem
it so. The few reflections, therefore, which time
permitted
him to make, were neither pleasant nor
satisfactory
;
and when he galloped off with his younger brother,
he had half a doubt whether the latter did not meditate
his sudden execution, as soon as they should be fairly
concealed from the sight of the woodman. He knew
enough of the character of Clarence to know that he
would as soon destroy his own brother for treachery
nay, soonerthan an open enemy; and the silence which
he maintained, the stern, rigid expression of his features,
and the reckless speed at which he seemed resolved to
ride, contributed in no small degree to increase his
apprehensions
.
VOL. I. 7
For a brief space that ready wit and prompt
subterfuge, which had enabled him hitherto to play a
various and very complicated game in life, with singular
adroitness and success, seemed about to fail. He felt his
elasticity lessening fasthis confidence in himself
declining
;
his brain was heavy, his tongue flattened and
thick. He was weaponless. There was no chance of
success in any conflict, unless from his enemy's
generosity
;
and upon that, in those days, the partisan who
fought on either side made but few calculations. A club,
the rudest mace, the roughest limb of the lithe hickory,
became an object of desire to the mind of the conscious
traitor at this moment. But he did not truly understand
the nature of that mind and those principles, to which
his own bore so little likeness. He little knew how
strong and active were those doubtsthe children of his
wishwhich were working in the bosom of Clarence
Conway in his behalf.
At length the latter drew up his steed, and exhibited a
wish to stop. The rain, which by this time had become
an incessant stream, had hitherto been almost unfelt by
either. The anxiety and sorrow of the one, and the
apprehensions of the other, had rendered them equally
insensible to the storm without.
Edward Conway, said the younger, let us alight
here. Here we must separate; and here I would speak
to you, perhaps for the last time, as my father's son.
Somewhat reassured, Edward Conway followed the
example of his kinsman, and the two alighted among
a group of hills, on the eastern side of which they
found a partial protection from the storm, which was
blowing from the west. But little did either need at
that moment of shelter from its violence. Brief
preparation
sufficed to fasten their steeds beneath a close
clump of foliage, and then followed the parting words of
the younger, which had been so solemnly prefaced.
Now, Edward Conway, my pledges to you are all
fulfilledmy duties, too. I have done even more than
was required at my hands by any of the ties of blood.
I have been to you a brother, and you are now free.
You do not repent of it, Clarence?
Of that, it is fitting that I say nothing rashly. Time
will show. But I need not say to you, Edward Conway,
that the discovery of these disguises, under circumstances
such as Jack Bannister detailed before you, has revived,
in all their force my old suspicions. God knows how
much I have striven to set my soul against these
suspicions
.
God only knows how much I would give could I
be sure that they were groundless. I dare not for my
father's sake believe themI dare not for my own. And
this dread to believe, Edward Conway, is, I fear, the only
thing that has saved, and still saves you, from my blow.
But for this, kinsman or no kinsman, your blood had been
as freely shed by these hands, as if its sluices were drawn
from the least known and basest puddle in existence.
I am at your mercy, Clarence Conway. I have no
weapons. My arms are folded. I have already spoken
when I should have been silent. I will say no more
nothing, certainly, to prevent your blow. Strike, if you
will: if I cannot convince you that I am true, I can at
least show you that I am fearless.
The wily kinsman knew well the easy mode to
disarm
his brotherto puzzle his judgment, if not to subdue
his suspicions.
I have no such purpose! exclaimed Clarence,
chokingly
.
Would to heaven you would give me no occasion
to advert to the possibility that I ever should have. But
hear me, Edward Conway, ere we part. Do not deceive
yourselfdo not fancy that I am deceived by this show
of boldness. It did not need that you should assure me
of your fearlessness. That I well knew. It is not your
courage, but your candour, of which I am doubtful.
The display of the one quality does not persuade me
any the more of your possession of the other. We are
now to part. You are free from this moment. You are
also safe. Our men are no longer on the Wateree;a
few hours' good riding will bring you, most probably,
within challenge of Watson's sentinels. If you are the
foe to your country, which they declare you, he is your
friend. That you do not seek safety in our ranks, I need
no proof. But, ere we part, let me repeat my warnings.
Believe me, Edward Conway, dear to me as my father's
son, spare me, if you have it in your heart, the pain of
being your foe. Spare me the necessity of strife with
you. If it be that you are a loyalist, let us not meet.
I implore it as the last favour which I shall ever ask at
your hands; and I implore it with a full heart. You
know that we have not always been friends. You know
that there are circumstances, not involving our principles,
on which we have already quarrelled, and which are of
a nature but too well calculated to bring into activity the
wildest anger and the deadliest hate. But, however much
we have been at strifehowever I may have fancied that
you have done me wrongstill, believe me, when I tell
you that I have ever, in my cooler moments, striven to
think of, and to serve, you kindly. Henceforward our
meeting must be on other terms. The cloud which
hangs about your coursethe suspicion which stains
your character in the minds of othershave at last
affected mine. We meet, hereafter, only as friends or
foes. Your course must then be decidedyour
principles
declaredyour purpose known; and then, Edward
Conway, if it be, as men declare, and as I dare not yet
believe, that you are that traitor to your countrythat
you do lead that savage banditti which has left the print
of their horses' hoofs, wherever they have trodden, in
bloodthen must our meeting be one of blood only;
and then, as surely as I shall feel all the shame of such
a connexion in my soul, shall I seek, by a strife without
remorse, to atone equally to my father and to my
country
for the crime and folly of his son. Fondly do I
implore you, Edward Conway, to spare me this trial.
Let our parting at this moment be final, unless we are to
meet on terms more satisfactory to both.
The elder of the kinsmen, at this appeal, displayed
more emotion, real or affected, than he had shown at
any time during the interview. He strode to and fro
among the tall trees, with hands clasped behind, eyes
cast down upon the earth, and brows contracted. A
single quiver might have been seen at moments among
the muscles of his mouth. Neither of them seemed to
heed the increasing weight of the tempest. Its roar was
unheardits torrents fell without notice around and upon
them. The reply of Edward Conway was at length
spoken. He approached his brother. He had subdued
his emotions, whatever might have been their source.
His words were fewhis utterance composed and calm.
He extended his hand to Clarence as he spoke.
Let us part, Clarence. It does not become me to
make farther assurances. To reply, as I should, to what
you have said, might be, probably, to increase the width
and depth of that chasm which seems to lie between us.
I cannot say that I am satisfied with your tone, your
temper, the position which you assume, and the right
which you claim to direct, and warn, and counsel;and
when you threaten!But enough! Let us part before
any thing be said which shall make you forget any thing
which you should remember, or me that I owe my life
to your assistance. What is said is saidlet it be
forgotten
.
Let us part.
Ay, let us part: but let it not be forgotten, Edward
Conway?
True, true! Let it not be forgotten. It shall not be
forgotten. It cannot be. It would not be easy for me,
Clarence, to forget any thing which has taken place in
the last ten days of my life.
There was a latent signification in what was said by
the speaker to arouse new suspicions in the mind of the
younger of the kinsmen. He saw, or fancied that he
saw, a gleam of ferocity shine out from the eyes of his
brother, and his own inflammable temper was about to
flare up anew.
Do you threaten, Edward Conway? Am I to
understand
you as speaking the language of defiance?
Understand me, Clarence, as speaking nothing which
should not become a man and your brother.
The reply was equivocal. That it was so, was reason
sufficient why Clarence Conway should hesitate to urge
a matter which might only terminate in bringing their
quarrel to a crisis.
The sooner we separate the better, was his only
answer. Here, Edward Conway, is one of my pistols.
You shall not say I sent you forth without weapons to
defend you, into a forest filled, possibly, with foes. The
7*
horse which you ride is a favourite. You have lost
your's. Keep him till you are provided. You can
always
find an opportunity to return him when you are
prepared to do so; and should you not, it will make no
difference. Farewell: God be with you,but
remember
!remember!
The youth grasped the now reluctant hand of the elder
Conway; wrung it with a soldier's graspa pressure in
which mingled feelings, all warm, all conflicting, had
equal utterance;then, springing upon his steed, he
dashed rapidly into the forest, and in a few moments
was hidden from sight in its thickest mazes.
Remember! Yes, Clarence Conway, I will
remember
.
Can I ever forget! Can I ever forget the arrogance
which presumes to counsel, to warn, and to threatento
pry into my privacyto examine my deedsto denounce
them with shame and threaten them with vengeance. I
will rememberto requite! It shall not be always thus.
The game will be in my hands ere many days, and I
will play it as no gamester, with all upon the cast, ever
yet played the game of life before. Without pause or
pityresolved and recklessI will speed on to the
prosecution
of my purposes, until my triumph is complete!
I must beware, must I?I must account for my
incomings
and outgoings? And why, forsooth? Because I
am
your
father's son. For the same reason do you
beware! I were no son of my father if I did not resent
this insolence.
He had extricated his horse from the cover which
concealed him while he was giving utterance to this
soliloquy. The noble animal neighed and whinnied
after his late companion. The plaintive appeal of the
beast seemed to irritate his rider, whose passions,
subjected
to a restraint which he had found no less necessary
than painful, were now seeking that vent which they
had been denied for an unusual season; and under their
influence he struck the animal over the nostril with the
heavy hand of that hate which he fain would have
bestowed
upon his master.
Remember! he muttered, as he leaped upon the
saddle. I need no entreaty to this end, Clarence
Conway
.
I must be a patriot at your bidding, and choose
my side at your suggestion; and forbear the woman of
my heart in obedience to the same royal authority. We
shall see!We shall see!
And, as he spoke, the sheeted tempest driving in his
face the whilehe shook his threatening hand in the
direction which his brother had taken. Turning his
horse's head upon an opposite course, he then proceeded,
though at a less rapid rate, to find that shelter, which he
now, for the first time, began to consider necessary.
It may have been ten minutes after their separation,
when he heard a sound at a little distance which aroused
his flagging attention.
That whistle, said he to himself, is very like our
own. It may be! They should be here, if my safety
were of any importance; and if that reptile Stockton
would suffer them; that fellow is a spy upon me, sworn
doubly to my destruction if he can find the means.
But let me find him tripping, and a shot gives him prompt
dismissal. Again!it is!they are herethe scouts
are around me, and doubtlessly the whole troop is at
Muggs' this moment.
There
, he could do me no harm.
Muggs is sworn my friend against all enemies, and he is
true as any enemy.Again, the signal! They shall have
an echo.
Speaking thus he replied in a sound similar to that
which he heard, and an immediate response, almost at
his elbow, satisfied him of the truth of his first
impression
.
He drew up his steed, repeated the whistle, and
was now answered by the swift tread of approaching
horses. In a few moments, one, and then another
appeared
in sight, and the captain of the Black Riders of
Congaree once more found himself surrounded by his
men.
Their clamours, as soon as he was recognized, attested
his popularity among his troop.
Ha, Irby!Ha, Burnet! Is it you;and you,
Gibbsyou, Fisher: I rejoice to see you. Your hands,
my good fellows. There! There! You are wellall
well.
The confused questions and congratulations, all
together
,
of the troopers, while they gave every pleasure
to their chieftain, as convincing him of their fidelity,
rendered
unnecessary any attempt at answer or explanation.
Nor did Edward Conway allow himself time for this.
His words, though friendly enough, were few; and
devoted
,
seemingly, to the simple business of the troop.
Captain Mortonfor such was the name by which only
he was known to themwith the quickness of a
governing
instinct, derived, from a few brief comprehensive
questions, all that he desired to know in regard to their
interests and position. He ascertained where the main
body would be found, and what had taken place during
his absence; and proceeded instantly to the reassumption
of his command over them.
Enough of this, my good fellows. I will see to all
this at Muggs'. We have no time now for unnecessary
matter. You have work on hand. Burnet, do you take
with you Gibbs, Irby and Fisher. Push your horses
down for the Wateree by the first road running left of
where we now stand. Do you know the route? It leads
by the clay diggings of the old Dutchmanthe brick
burnerwhat's his name?
I know it, sir.
Enough, then. Take that roadput the steel into
your nags, but send them forward. If you are diligent
you will overtake one of our worst enemies:a friend
of Butlera rebelno less than Colonel Conway.
Pursue
and catch him. You cannot fail to overtake him if
you try for it. Take him prisoner, alive, if you can;
I particularly wish that you should have him alivebut,
remember, take him at every hazard. Living or dead, he
must be ours.
The dragoon lingered for farther orders.
If you succeed in taking him, bring him on to
Muggs'. Give the signal before you reach his cabin,
that there may be no surpriseno mistake. Something
depends on your observance of this cautionso, you will
remember. Away, now; and ride for life.
Their obedience was sufficiently prompt. In an
instant
they were on their way, pursuing the track which
Clarence had taken for the Wateree.
Now! exclaimed the outlaw-chief with exultation
now, there is some chance for vengeance. If they
succeed in taking him alive, I will practise upon him to
his utter blindnessI will do him no harm unless a close
lodging house will do him harm. If they kill himwell,
it is only one of those chances of war which he
voluntarily
incurs: it is only the lower cast of the die. Yet, I
trust, it may not be so. I am not yet prepared for that.
He is my father's son.He has stood beside me in
danger
.
He deserves that I should spare him. But, even
for all this he may not be spared, if he is to triumph over
to sway me with his arroganceto achieve all
victories
in love as in war. In love!God, what a strange
nature is this of mine. How feeble am I when I think
of her. And of her I cannot help but thinkher beauty,
her pride of soulay, even her arrogance I can think of
with temper and with love.But hisno! no! He has
spoken too keenly to my soul; and when he forbids that
I should seek and see
her
, he forfeits every claim. Let
them slay him, if they pleaseit can only come to this
at last.
And, with these words, striking with his open palm
upon the neck of his horse, he drove him forward to
Muggs'. His entrance we have already seen and the
wonder it excited.The wonder in allthe
consternation
in one. The troopers, with one voice, cried out
for their ancient captain, and Stockton, confounded and
defeated, could only hoarsely mingle his congratulations
with the rest, in accents more faltering, and withas the
outlaw captain well apprehendedwith far less sineerity.
CHAPTER VII.
FINESSE.CAPTIVITY.
Edward Morton
bestowed upon his second officer
but a single glance, beneath which his eye fell and his
sould became troubled. That glance was one of equal
scorn and suspicion. It led the treacherous subordinate,
with the natural tendency of a guilty conscience, to
apprehend
that all his machinations had been discovered;
that some creature of his trust had proved treacherous,
and that he stood in the presence of one who had come
with the full purpose of vengeance and of punishment.
But, though secure as yet in this respect, Lieutenant
Stockton was not equally so in others, scarcely of less
consequence. He had neglected, even if he had not
betrayed
,
his trust. He had kept aloof from the place of
danger, when his aid was required, and left his captain
to all those risksone of which has been already
intimated
to the readerwhich naturally followed a duty of
great and peculiar exposure, to which the latter had
devoted
himself. Even when this risk had been taken, and
the dangers incurred, he had either forborne that search
after his superior, or had so pursued it, as to render his
efforts almost ineffectual. He had undertaken the toils
of villany without reaping any of its pleasant fruits.
The return of his superior, as it were, from the grave,
left him utterly discomfited. His rewards were as far off
as ever from his hopes; and, to his fears, his
punishments
were at hand. His apprehensions were not wholly
without foundation. So soon as the chief of the Black
Riders could relieve himself from the oppressive
congratulations
which encountered his safe restoration to his
troop, he turned upon the lieutenant, and with an
indignation
more just than prudent declared his
disapprobation
of his conduct.
I know not, Lieutenant Stockton, how you propose
to satisfy Lord Rawdon for your failure to bring your
men to Dukes' as I ordered you; but I shall certainly
report to him your neglect in such language as shall
speak my own opinion of it, however it may influence
his. The consequences of your misconduct are scarcely
to be computed. You involved me individually in an
unnecessary risk of life; and lost a happy opportunity of
striking one of the best blows in the cause of his majesty
which has been stricken this campaign. The whole
troop of the rebel Butler was in our handsthey must
have been annihilated but for your neglecta neglect too,
which is wholly unaccountable, as I myself had prescribed
every step in your progress, and waited for your coming
with every confidence in the result.
I did not know, sir, that there was any prospect of
doing any thing below here, and I heard of a convoy on
the road to General Greene.
Even that will not answer, Lieutenant Stockton.
You were under orders for one duty, and presumed too
greatly on your own judgment when you took the liberty
of making a different disposition of the troop left to your
guidance. You little dream, sir, how nigh you were to
ruin. But a single hour saved you from falling in with
all Sumter's command, and putting an end for ever to
your short-lived authority. And yet, sir, you are
ambitious
of sole command. You have your emissaries among
the troop urging your fitness to lead them; as if such
proofs were ever necessary to those who truly deserve
them. Your emissaries, sir, little know our men. It is
enough for them to know that you left your leader in the
hands of his enemies, at a time when all his risks were
incurred for their safety and your own.
I have no emissaries, sir, for any such purpose;
replied the subordinate sulkily; his temper evidently
rising from the unpleasant exposure which was making
before those who had only recently been so well tutored
in his superior capacities. You do me injustice, sir
you have a prejudice against me. For
Prejudice, and against you, sir! was the scornful
interruption of the chief. No more, sir; I will not
hear you farther. You shall have the privilege of being
heard by those against whom you can urge no such
imputations
.
Your defence shall be made before a court
martial. Yield up your sword, sir, to Mr. Barton.
The eye of the lieutenant, at this mortifying moment,
caught that of the maimed veteran Muggs; and the
exulting
satisfaction which was expressed by the latter was
too much for his firmness. He drew the sword, but
instead of tendering the hilt to the junior officer who had
been commanded to receive it, confronted him with the
point, exclaiming desperately
My life first! I will not be disgraced before the
men!
Your life, then! was the fierce exclamation of
Morton
,
spoken with instant promptness, as he hurled the
pistol with which Clarence Conway had provided him,
full in the face of the insubordinate. At that same
moment
,
the scarcely less rapid movement of Muggs, enabled
him to grasp the offender about the body with his single
arm. The blow of the pistol took effect, and the
lieutenant
would have been as completely prostrated, as he
was stunned by it, had it not been for the supporting
grasp of the landlord, which kept him from instantly
falling. The blood streamed from his mouth and
nostrils
half
conscious only he strove to advance, and his
sword was partially lifted as if to maintain with violence
the desperate position which he had taken, but, by this
time, a dozen ready hands were about him. The
weapon
was wrested from his hold, and the wounded man
thrust down upon the floor of the hovel, where he was
held by the heavy knee of more than one of the dragoons,
while others were found equally prompt to bind his arms.
They were all willing to second the proceedings,
however
fearful, of a chief whose determination of character
they well knew, and against whom they also felt they
had themselves somewhat offended, in the ready
acquiescence
which most of them had given to the persuasive
arguments and entreaties of Darcy. This latter person
had now no reverence to display for the man in whose
cause he had been only too officious. He was one of
those moral vanes which obey the wind of
circumstances
,
and acquire that flexibility of habit, which,
after a little while, leaves it impossible to make them
fixed. He did not, it is true, join in the clamour against
his late ally; but he kept sufficiently aloof from any
display
of sympathy. His own selfish fears counselled him
to forbearance, and he was not ambitious of the crown of
martyrdom in the cause of any principle so purely abstract
as that of friendship. To him, the chief of the Black
Riders gave but a single look, which sufficiently informed
him that his character was known and his conduct more
than suspected. The look of his superior had yet
another
meaning, and that was one of unmitigated contempt.
Unlike the lieutenant, Darcy was sufficiently prudent,
however, not to display by glance, word, or action, the
anger which he felt. He wisely subdued the resentment
in his heart, preferring to leave to time the work of
retribution
.
But he did not, any more than Stockton, forego
his desire for ultimate revenge. He was one of those
who could wait, and whose patience, like that of the long
unsatisfied creditor, served only to increase, by the usual
interest process, the gross amount of satisfaction which
must finally ensue. It was not now for the first time
that he was compelled to experience the scorn of their
mutual superior. It may be stated, in this place, that
the alliance between Stockton and himself was quite as
much the result of their equal sense of injury at the
hands of Morton, as because of any real sympathy
between
the parties.
Take this man hence, was the command of Morton,
turning once more his eyes upon the prostrate Stockton.
Take him hence, Sergeant Fishersee him well
bestowed
have
his wants attended to, but see, above all
things, that he escape not. He has gone too far in his
folly to be trusted much longer with himself, till we are
done with him entirely. This, I trust, will soon be the
case.
This order gave such a degree of satisfaction to the
VOL. I. 8
landlord, Muggs, that he found it impossible to conceal
his delight. A roar of pleasure burst from his lips.
Ho! ho! ho!I thought so.I knew it must
come to this. I thought it a blasted bad sign from the
beginning, when he was so willing to believe the cappin
was turned into small meat, and the choppings not to be
come at. There's more of them sort of hawks in these
parts, cappin, if 'twas worth any white man's while to
look after them.
The last sentence was spoken with particular reference
to Ensign Darcy, and the eyes of the stout landlord were
fixed upon that person with an expression of equal
triumph and threatening, but neither Darcy nor Morton
thought it advisable to perceive the occult signification
of his glance. The occupations of the latter, meanwhile,
did not cease with the act of summary authority which
we have witnessed. He called up to him an individual
from his troop whose form and features somewhat
resembled his ownwhose general intelligence might
easily be conjectured from his features, and whose
promptness seemed to justify the special notice of his
captain. This person he addressed as Ben Williams
a person whom the landlord, Muggs, had designated, in a
previous chapter, as the most fitting to succeed their
missing leader in the event of his loss. That Morton
himself entertained some such opinion, the course of
events will show.
Williams, he said, after the removal of Stockton
had been effectedthere is a game to play in which
you must be chief actor. It is necessary that you
should take my place, and seem for a while to be the
leader of the Black Riders. The motive for this will
be explained to you in time. Nay, more, it is necessary
that I should seem your prisoner. You will probably
soon have a prisoner in fact, in whose sight I would also
occupy the same situation. Do with me then as one.
Hark!That is even now the signal!They will soon
be here. Muggs, bar the entrance for a while, until
every thing is ready. Now, Williams, be quick; pass
your lines about my arms and bind me securely. Let
one or more of your men watch me with pistols cocked,
and show, all of you, the appearance of persons who
have just made an important capture. I will tell you
more hereafter.
The subordinate was too well accustomed to
operations
of the kind suggested, to offer any unnecessary
scruple, or to need more precise directions. The outlaw
was bound accordingly; placed, as he desired, upon a
bulk that stood in a corner of the wigwam, while two
black-faced troopers kept watch beside him. The signal
was repeated from without; the parties, from the sound,
being evidently close at hand. The chief of the outlaws
whispered in the ear of his subordinate such farther
instructions
as were essential to his object.
Keep me in this situation, in connexion with the
prisonershould he be broughtfor the space of an
hour. Let us be left alone for that space of time. Let
us then be separated, while you come to me in private.
We shall then be better able to determine for the
future.
The hurried preparations being completed, the chief,
now seemingly a closely watched and strongly guarded
prisoner, gave orders to throw open the entrance, and
subdued his features to the expression of a well-grounded
dissatisfaction with a situation equally unapprehended
and painful.
The capture of Clarence Conway was not such an
easy matter. It will be remembered that when he
separated
from his brother, under the influence of feelings of
a most exciting nature, he had given his horse a free
spur, and dashed forward at full speed to regain his place
of safety in the swamp. The rapidity of his start, had
he continued at the same pace, would have secured him
against pursuit. But, as his blood cooled, and his
reflective
mood assumed the ascendancy, his speed was
necessarily lessened; and by the time that his
treacherous
kinsman was enabled to send the troopers in pursuit,
his horse was suffered quietly to pick his way forward,
in a gait most suited to his own sense of comfort. The
consequence was inevitable. The pursuers gained
rapidly upon him, and owing to the noise occasioned by
the rain pattering heavily upon the leaves about him, he
did not hear the sound of their horses' feet, until escape
became difficult. At the same moment he discovered a
horseman on either hand, while two others came close
upon him in the rear. Their habits, the intentness of
their pursuit, at once convinced him that they were
enemies
;
and with just enough of the sense of danger to
make him act decisively, the fearless partisan drew forth
his pistol, cocked it without making any unnecessary
display, and, at the same time, drove the rowel into the
flanks of his steed. A keen eye sent forward upon the
path which he was pursuing, enabled him to see that it
was too closely covered with woods to allow him to
continue
much farther his present rate of flight, and, with
characteristic boldness, he resolved to turn his course to
the right, where the path was less covered with
undergrowth
,
and on which his encounter would be with a
single enemy only. The conflict with him he sanguinely
trusted might be ended before the others could come up.
The action, with such a temperament as that of Clarence
Conway, was simultaneous with the thought; and a few
moments brought him upon the one opponent, while his
sudden change of direction, served, for a brief space, to
throw the others out. The trooper, whom he thus singled
out for the struggle, was a man of coolness and courage,
but one scarcely so strong of limb, or so well exercised
in conflict, as the partisan. He readily comprehended
the purpose of the latter, and his own resolution was
taken to avoid the fight, if he could, and yet maintain his
relative position, during the pursuit, with the enemy he
chased. To dash aside from the track, yet to push
forward
at the same time, was his design; at all events, to
keep out of pistol shot himself, yet to be able, at any
moment
,
to bring his opponent within it. Such a policy,
by delaying the flight of the latter, until the whole party
should come up, would render the capture inevitable.
But he was not suffered to pursue this game at his own
pleasure. The moment he swerved from the track,
Conway dashed after him with increased earnestness,
taking particular care to keep himself, meanwhile, between
the individual and his friends. In this way he seemed
to drive the other before him, and, as his own speed was
necessarily increased under these circumstances, the
man thus insulated became anxious about his position,
and desirous to return. In a mutual struggle of this sort,
the event depended upon the comparative ability of the
two horses, and the adroitness, as horsemen, of the
several
riders. In both respects the advantage was with
Conway; and he might have controlled every
movement
of his enemy, but for the proximity of those who
were now pressing on behind him. The moment
became
one of increasing anxiety. They were
approaching
rapidly nigher, and the disparity of force in their
favour was too considerable to leave him a single hope
of a successful issue should he be forced to an actual
encounter. The wits of the partisan were all put into
activity. He soon saw that he must drive the individual
before him entirely out of his path, or be forced to stand
at bay against an attack in which defence was hopeless.
His resolve was instantaneous; and, reasonably
calculating
against the probability of any pistol shot from
either taking effect while under rapid flight, and through
the misty rain then driving into their mutual faces, he
resolved to run down his enemy by the sheer physical
powers of his horse, in defiance of the latter's weapon
and without seeking to use his own. He braced himself
up for this exertion, and timed his movement fortunately,
at a moment when, a dense thicket presenting itself
immediately in the way of the man before him, rendered
necessary a change in the direction of his flight. His
reckless and sudden plunge forward discomposed the
enemy, who found the partisan on his haunches at a time
when to turn his steed became equally necessary and
difficult. To wheel aside from the thicket was the
instinctive movement of the horse himself, who naturally
inclined to the more open path; but just under these
circumstances, in his agitation, the trooper endeavoured
to incline his bridle hand to the opposite side, in order
that he might employ his weapon. The conflict between
8*
his steed's instinct and his own, rendered his aim
ineffectual
.
His pistol was emptied, but in vain; and the rush
of Conway's horse immediately followed. The shock
of conflict with the more powerful animal, precipitated
the trooper, horse and man, to the earth, and the buoyant
partisan went over him with the rapidity of a
wind-current
.
A joyous shout attested his consciousness of
safetythe outpourings of a spirit to which rapid action
was always a delight, and strife itself nothing more than
the exercise of faculties which seemed to have been
expressly
adapted for all its issues of agility and strength.
Secure of safety, Conway dashed onwards, without an
apprehension, and in a moment after had shared the
fortune
of him he had just overthrown. A sudden descent
of one of the Wateree hills was immediately before him,
and in the increasing dimness of the twilight, and under
the rapidity of his flight, he did not observe that its
declivity
of yellow clay had been freshly washed into a
gulley. His horse plunged forward upon the deceptive
and miry surface, and lost his footing. A series of
ineffectual plunges which he made to recover, brought
him to the foot of the hill, where he lay half stunned
and shivering. His girth had broken in the violent
muscular efforts which he made to arrest his fall, and
his rider, in spite of every exertion of skill and strength,
was thrown forwards, and fell, though with little injury,
upon the yellow clay below. He had barely time to
recover his feet, but not his horse, when the pursuers
were upon him. Resistance, under existing
circumstances
,
would have been worse than useless; and with
feelings of mortification, much better imagined than
described
,
he yielded himself, with the best possible grace,
to the hands of his captors.
CHAPTER VIII.
ROUGH USAGE AMONG THE `RIDERS.'
Nothing
could exceed the surprise of Clarence
Conway
when, conducted by his captors into the house of
Muggs, he beheld the condition of his kinsman. His
ardent and unsuspicious nature at once reproached him
with those doubts which he had entertained of the fidelity
of the latter. He now wondered at himself for the ready
credence which he had been disposed to yield, on grounds
so slight and unsatisfactory as they then appeared to
be, to the imputations against one so near to him by
blood; and with the natural rapidity of the generous
nature, he forgot, in his regrets for his own supposed
errors, those of which his brother had, as he well knew,
most certainly been guilty. He forgot that it was not
less a reproach against Edward Conwayeven if he was
misrepresented as friendly to the cause of the invader
that he had forborne to show that he was friendly to that
of his country; and, in that moment of generous
forgetfulness
,
even the suspicious conduct of the fugitive in
relation to his own affair of heart, passed from his
memory
.
Can it be!Is it you, Edward Conway, that I find
in this predicament? were his first words whenthe
speaker being equally securedthey were left alone
together
.
You see me, was the reply. My ill reputation
with the one side does not, it appears, commend me to
any favour with the other.
And these men? said Clarence, inquiringly.
Are, it would seem, no other persons than your
famous Black Riders. I have had a taste of their
discipline
already, and shall probably enjoy something more
before they are done with me. It appears that they have
discovered that I am as rabid a rebel as, by Butler's men,
I was deemed a tory. They charge me with some small
crimessuch as killing king's men and burning their
houses, stabbing women and roasting childrento all of
which charges I have pleaded not guilty, though with
very little chance of being believed. I cannot complain,
however, that they should be as incredulous in my behalf
as my own father's son.
Do not reproach me, Edward. Do me no injustice.
You cannot deny that circumstances were against you,
so strong as almost to justify belief in the mind of your
father himself. If any man ever struggled against
conviction
,
I was that man.
Clarence Conway, you perhaps deceive yourself
with that notion. But the truth is, your jealousy on the
subject of Flora Middleton has made you only too ready
to believe any thing against me. But I will not reproach
you
. NayI have resolved, believe what you may,
hereafter to say nothing in my defence or justification.
I have done something too much of this already for my
own sense of self-respect. Time must do the restI
will do no more.
The generous nature of Clarence deeply felt these
expressions
.
His wily kinsman well understood that nature,
and deliberately practised upon it. He listened to the
explanations and assurances of the former with the
doggedness
of one who feels that he has an advantage, and
shows himself resolute to keep it. Still he was too much
of a proficient in the knowledge of human nature to
over-act
the character. He spoke but few words. He seldom
looked at his brother while he spoke, and an occasional
half-suppressed sigh betokened the pains of a spirit
conscious
of the keenest wrong, yet too proud even to receive
the atonement which reminds him of it. An expression
of sorrow and sadness, but not unkindness, prevailed
over his features. His words, if they did not betoken
despondency, yet conveyed a feeling almost of
indifference
to whatever might betide him. The language of
his look seemed to saySuspected by my best friends,
my father's son among them, it matters little what may
now befall me. Let the enemy do his worst. I care
not for these bonds,I care for nothing that he can do.
Nothing, to the noble heart, is so afflicting as the
consciousness
of having done injustice; and to witness the
suffering of another in consequence of our injustice, is
one of the most excruciating of human miseries to a
nature of this order. Such was the pang at this moment
in the bosom of Clarence Conway. He renewed his
efforts to soothe and to appease the resentments of his
kinsman, with all the solicitude of truth.
Believe me, Edward, I could not well think
otherwise
than I have thought, or do other than I have done.
You surely cannot deny that you placed yourself in a
false position. It would have been wonderful, indeed, if
your course had not incurred suspicion.
True friendship seldom suspects, and is the last to
yield to the current when its course bears against the
breast it loves. But let us say no more on this subject,
Clarence. It has always been a painful one to me; and
just now, passing, as I may say, from one sort of bondage
to another, it is particularly so. It is, perhaps,
unnecessary
,
situated as we are, that we should any longer refer
to it. The doubts of the past may be as nothing to the
dangers of the future. If this banditti be as you have
described them, we shall have little time allowed us to
discuss the past; and, for the future! He paused.
And yet, believe me, Edward, it makes me far
happier
to see you in these bonds, subjected to all the dangers
which they imply, than to suffer from the accursed
suspicion
that you were the leader of this banditti.
I thank youindeed I thank you very muchfor
nothing! It may surprise you to hear me say that your
situation yields me no pleasure. Your sources of
happiness
and congratulation strike me as being very peculiar.
Edward Conway, why will you misunderstand me?
Do I?
Surely. What have I said to make you speak so
bitterly?
Nothing, perhaps;but just now, Clarence, my
thoughts and feelings are rather bitter than sweet, and
may be supposed likely to impart something of their
taste to what I say. But I begged that we might forbear
the subjectall subjectsat this time; for the very
reason that I feared something might be spoken by one
or both which would make us think more unkindly of
each other than beforewhich would increase the gulf
between us.
I think not unkindly of you, Edward. I regret what
I have spoken unkindly, though under circumstances
which, I still insist, might justify the worst suspicion in
the mind of the best of friends. There is no gulf
between
us now, Edward Conway.
Ay, but there is; an impassable one for botha
barrier which we have built up with mutual industry,
and which must stand between us for ever. Know you
Flora Middleton? Ha! Do you understand me now,
Clarence Conway? I see you doyou are silent.
Clarence was, indeed, silent. Painful was the
conviction
that made him so. He felt the truth of what his
brother had spoken. He felt that there was a gulf
between
them; and he felt also that the look and manner
of his kinsman, while he spoke the name, together with
the tone of voice in which it was spoken, had most
unaccountably
,
and most immeasurably, enlarged that gulf.
What could be the meaning of this? What was that
mysterious antipathy of soul which could comprehend
so instantly the instinct hate and bitterness in that of
another. Clarence felt at this moment that, though his
suspicions of Edward Conway, as the chief of the Black
Riders, were all dissipated by the position in which he
found him, yet he loved him still less than before. The
tie of blood was weakened yet more than ever, and its
secret currents were boiling up in either breast, with
suppressed but increasing hostility.
The pause was long and painful which ensued between
them. At length Clarence broke the silence. His
manner
was subdued, but the soul within him was
strengthened
.
The course of his kinsman had not continued to
its close as judicious as it seemed at the beginning. It
had been a wiser policy had he forborne even the
intimation
of reproachhad he assumed an aspect of greater
kindness and love towards his companion in misfortune,
and striven, by a studious display of cheerfulness, to
prove to his brother that he was only apprehensive lest
the situation in which the latter had found him might
tend too much to his own self-reproach. Such would
have been the course of a generous foe. Such should
have been the course of one towards a generous friend.
Forbearance, at such a moment, would have been the
very best proof of the presence of a real kindness. But
it was in this very particular that the mind of Edward
Conway was weak. He was too selfish a man to know
what magnanimity is! He did not sufficiently
comprehend
the nature of the man he addressed; and though
the situation in which the latter found him had its effect,
yet the policy which he subsequently pursued, most
effectually defeated many of the moral advantages which
must have resulted to him, in the mind of his brother,
from a more liberal train of conduct. The reference to
Flora Middleton placed Clarence on his guard. It
reminded
him that there were more grounds of difference
between himself and kinsman than he had been just before
prepared to remember. It reminded him that Edward
Conway had been guilty of a mean evasion, very like a
falsehood, in speaking of this lady; and this remembrance
revived all his former personal distrusts, however hushed
may have been all such as were purely political.
Edward
Conway discovered that he had made a false move
in the game the moment that his brother resumed his
speech. He was sagacious enough to perceive his error,
though he vainly then might have striven to repair it.
Clarence meanwhile proceeded as follows, with a grave
severity of manner, which proved that, on one subject at
least, he could neither be abused nor trifled with.
You have named Flora Middleton, Edward Conway.
With me that name is sacred. I owe it to my own
feelings
,
as well as to her worth, that it should not be spoken
with irreverence. What purpose do you propose by
naming her to me, at this moment, and with such a
suggestion?
The outlaw assumed a bolder tone and a higher
position
than he took when the same subject was discussed
between them in the swamp. There was an air of
defiance
in his manner as he replied, which aroused all the
gall in his brother's bosom.
Am I to tell you now, for the first time, Clarence
Conway, that I love Flora Middleton?
Ha!Is it so?Well!
It is even so! I love Flora Middletonas I long
have loved her.
You are bold, Edward Conway! Am I to
understand
from this that you propose to urge your claims?
One does not usually entertain such feelings without
some hope to gratify them; and I claim to possess all
the ordinary desires and expectations of humanity.
Be it so, then, Edward Conway, replied Clarence,
with a strong effort at composure. But, he added,
if I mistake not, there was an understanding between
us on this subject. You
Ay, ay, to pacify youto avoid strife with my
father's
son, Clarence Conway, I made some foolish
promise
to subdue my own feelings out of respect to yours
some weak and unmanly concessions!
Well! Have you now resolved otherwise.
Why, the truth is, Clarence, it is something
ridiculous
for either of us to be talking of our future purposes,
while in such a predicament as this. Perhaps we had
better be at our prayers, preparing for the worst. If half
be true that is said of these Black Riders, a short shrift
and a sure cord are the most probable of their gifts.
We need not quarrel about a woman on the edge of the
grave.
Were death sure and at hand, Edward Conway, my
principles should be equally certain, and expressed
without
fear. Am I to understand that you have resolved to
disregard my superior claims, and to pursue Flora
Middleton
with your attentions.
Your superior claims, Clarence, replied the other,
consist, simply, if I understand the matter rightly, in
your having seen the lady before myself, and by so many
months only having the start of me in our mutual
admiration
of her charms. I have not learned that she has
given you to suppose that she regards you with more
favour than she does myself.
A warm flush passed over the before pale features of
Clarence Conway. His lip was agitated, and its
quivering
only suppressed by a strong effort.
Enough, sir! he exclaimedwe understand each
other.
There was probably some little mockery in the mood
of Edward Conway as he urged the matter to a farther
point.
But let me know, Clarence. Something of my own
course will certainly dependthat is, if I am ever again
free from the clutches of these The sentence was
left unfinished by the speaker, as if through an
apprehension
that he might have more auditors than the one
he addressed. He renewed the sentence, cautiously
omitting the offensive member:
Something of my course, Clarence, will surely
depend
on my knowledge of your claims. If they are
superior to mine, or to those of a thousand othersif
she has given you to understand that she has a
preference
The flush increased upon the cheek of the younger
kinsman as he replied:
Let me do her justice, sir. It is with some sense
of shame that I speak again of her in a discussion such
as this. Miss Middleton has given me no claimshe
has shown me no preference, such as I could build upon
for an instant. But, my claim was on you, Edward
Conway. You were carried by me to her dwelling.
She was made known to you by me; and, before this
was done, I had declared to you my own deep interest
in her. You saw into the secret and sacred plans of my
VOL. I. 9
heartyou heard from my own lips the extent of my
affection for her; andbut I can speak no more of this
without anger, and anger here is impotence. Take your
course, Edward Conway, and assert your desires as you
may. Henceforward I understand you, and on this
subject
beg to be silent.
The hour had elapsed which, by the previous
instructions
of the outlaw chief, had been accorded to the
interview
between himself and kinsman. The object of this
finesse
had, as he believed, been fully answered; and at
this stage of the interview his counterfeit presentment
made his appearance, with all due terrors of authority,
and put an end to a conference which had become
excessively
irksome to the younger brother. The farce was
not yet finished, however. Clarence Conway was the
curious witness to a long examination to which his fellow
prisoner was subjected, the object of which seemed to
be to establish the fact that Edward Conway was himself
a most inveterate rebel. A part of this examination may
be given.
You do not deny that your name is Conway.
I do not, was the reply.
Colonel Conway, of Sumter's Brigade?
I
am Colonel Conway, of Sumter's Brigade, said
Clarence, interposing.
Time enough to answer for yourself when you are
asked!that story won't go down with us, my good
fellow, sternly exclaimed the acting chief of the banditti.
Shumway, he exclaimed, turning to a subordinate,
why the dl were these dd rebels put together?
They have been cooking up a story between them, and
hanging now will hardly get the truth out of either!
We'll see what Muggs can tell us. He should know
this fellow Conway.
Muggs has gone to bed, sir.
Wake him up and turn him out, at the invitation of
a rope's end. I'm suspicious that Muggs is half a rebel
himself, he's lived so long in this rascally neighbourhood,
and must be looked after.
Shumway disappeared, and the examination proceeded.
Do you still deny that you are Colonel Conway, of
Sumter's brigade? Beware now of your answerwe
have other rebels to confront you.
The question was still addressed to the elder of the
kinsmen. His reply was made with grave composure.
I do. My name is Conway, as I declared to you
before; but I am not of Sumter's brigade, nor of any
brigade. I am not a colonel, and never hope to be made
one.
Indeed! but you hope to get off with that dd pack
of lies, do you, in spite of all the evidence against you?
But you are mistaken. I wouldn't give a continental
copper for the safety of your skin, colonel.
If the commission of Governor Rutledge of South
Carolina will be any evidence to show who is, and who
is not, Colonel Conway, of Sumter's brigade, was the
second interruption of Clarence, that commission will
be found in my pocket.
And what will that prove, you dd rebel, but that
it has been slipped from one to the other as you each
wanted it. Your shifting commissions are well known
make-shifts among you, and we know too well their
value to put much faith in them. But can you guess,
my dear fellow, turning to Clarence, you, who are so
anxious to prove yourself a colonelcan you guess what
it will cost you to establish the fact? Do you know
that a swinging bough will be your first halting-place,
and your first bow shall be made to a halter?
If you think to terrify me by such threats, you are
mistaken in your man, replied Clarence, with features
which amply denoted the wholesale scorn within his
bosom, and if you dare to carry your threats into
execution
,
you as little know the men of Sumter's brigade,
the meanest of whom would promptly peril his own life
to exact fearful and bloody retribution for the deed. I am
Colonel Conway, and, dog of a tory, I defy you. Do
your worst. I know you dare do nothing of the sort
you threaten. I defy and spit upon you.
The face of the outlaw blackened:Clarence rose to
his feet.
Ha! think you so? We shall see. Shumway,
Frink, Gasson!you three are enough to saddle this
fiery rebel to his last horse. Noose him, you slow
moving scoundrels, to the nearest sapling, and let him
grow wiser in the wind. To your work, villains
away!
The hands of more than one of the ruffians were
already on the shoulders of the partisan. Though
shocked at the seeming certainty of a deed which he
had not been willing to believe they would venture to
execute, he yet preserved the fearless aspect which he
had heretofore shown. His lips still uttered the
language
of defiance. He made no concessions, he asked
for no delayhe simply denounced against them the
vengeance of his command, and that of his reckless
commander, whose fiery energy of soul and rapidity of
execution they well knew. His language tended still
farther to exasperate the person who acted in the
capacity
of the outlaw chief. Furiously, as if to second the
subordinates in the awful duty in which they seemed to
him to linger, he grasped the throat of Clarence
Conway
with his own hands, and proceeded to drag him
forward. He did not see the significant gesture of head,
glance of eye and impatient movement of Edward
Conway
,
while he thundered out his commands and curses.
The latter could not, while seeking to preserve the new
character in which he had placed himself, take any more
decided means to make his wishes understood; and it
was with feelings of apprehension and annoyance, new
even to himself, that he beheld the prompt savage, to
whom he had entrusted the temporary command, about
to perform a deed which a secret and mysterious
something
in his soul would not permit him to authorize or
behold, however much he might have been willing to
reap its pleasant fruits when done. There was evidently
no faltering in the fearful purpose of his representative.
Every thing was serious. He was too familiar with
such deeds to make him at all heedful of consequences;
and the proud bearing of the youth; the unmitigated
scorn in his look and language; the hateful words which
he had used, and the threats which he had denounced;
while they exasperated all around, almost maddened the
ruffian in command, to whom such defiance was new,
and with whom the taking of life was a circumstance
equally familiar and unimportant.
Three
minutes for prayer is all the grace I give
him! he cried, hoarsely, as he helped the subordinates
to drag the destined victim towards the door. He
himself
was not suffered
one
. The speech was scarcely
spoken, when he fell prostrate on his face, stricken in
the mouth by a rifle-bullet, which entered through an
aperture in the wall opposite. His blood and brains
bespattered the breast of Clarence Conway, whom his
falling body also bore to the floor of the apartment. A
wild shout from without followed the shot, and rose,
strong and piercing, above all the clamour within. In
that shout Clarence could not doubt that he heard the
manly voice of the faithful Jack Bannister, and the deed
spoke for itself. It could have been the deed of a friend
only.
9*
CHAPTER IX.
A CRISIS.
The
sensation produced on all the parties by this
sudden stroke of retribution was indescribable. The
fate of Clarence Conway was suspended for a while.
The executioners stood aghast. They relaxed their
hold upon the prisoner; all their powers being
seemingly
paralyzed in amazement and alarm. Tacitly,
every eye, with the instinct of an ancient habit, was
turned upon Edward Conway. He, too, had partaken,
to a large degree, of the excitement of the scene. The
old habits of command re-obtained their ascendancy.
He forgot, for the instant, the novel position in which
he stood; the assumed character which he played, and
all the grave mummery of his bondage and disguise.
Starting to his feet, when the first feeling of surprise had
passed, he shouted aloud in the language of authority.
Away, knaves, and follow. Why do you gape and
loiter? Pursue the assassin. Let him not escape you!
Away!
He was obeyed by all the troopers present. They
rushed headlong from the dwelling with a sanguinary
shout. The two brothers, still bound, were left alone
together. The paroxysm of passion in the one was
over. He was recalled to a consciousness of the wily
game he had been playing the moment that he started to
his feet and issued his commands. The pressure of the
tight cords upon his arms, when he would have extended
them to his men, brought back all his memories. In an
instant he felt his error, and apprehended the
consequences
.
His eye naturally turned in search of his
kinsman, who stood erect, a surprised but calm
spectator
.
He had witnessed the action, had seen the
excitement
,
and heard the language of Edward Conway; but
these did not seem to him too extravagant for the temper
of one easily moved, who was yet innocent of any
improper
connexion with the criminals. The circumstances
which had taken place were sufficiently exciting to
account
for these ebullitions, without awakening any
suspicions
of the truth. It is true that the fierce command,
so familiarly addressed to the robbers by their prisoner,
did seem strange enough to the unsuspecting Clarence;
but even this was natural enough. Nor was it less so
that they should so readily obey orders coming from any
lips which, to them, conveyed so correctly the
instructions
to their duty. Besides, the clamour, the uproar,
the confusion and hubbub of the scene, not to speak of
those conflicting emotions under which Clarence
Conway
suffered at a moment so full, seemingly, of the last
peril to himself, served to distract his senses and impair
the just powers of judgment in his mind. He felt that
Edward Conway had acted unexpectedlyhad shown a
singular activity which did not seem exactly called for,
and was scarce due to those in whose behalf it was
displayed
;
but, making due allowance for the different
effects of fright and excitement upon different
temperaments
,
he did not regard his conduct as strange or
unnatural
,
however unnecessary it might seem, and, perhaps,
impolitic. It was the first thought in his mind that
Edward Conway, in his great agitation, did not seem to
recollect that the assassination which had taken place
was probably the only event which could then have
saved his life.
These reflections did not occur to the mind of the
latter. Conscious of equal guilt and indiscretion, the
apprehensions of Edward Conway were all awakened
for his secret. The lowering and suspicious glance
which he watched in the eye of his kinsman, and which
had its origin in a portion of the previous conference
between
them, he was at once ready to ascribe to the
discovery
,
by the latter, of his own criminal connexion with
the outlaws. In his anxiety, he was not aware that he
had not said enough to declare his true characterthat
he had only used the language which any citizen might
employ without censure, on beholding the performance,
by another, of any sudden and atrocious outrage. So
impressed was he with the conviction that he had
betrayed
the whole truth by his imprudence, that the
resolution
in his mind was partly formed to declare himself
boldly and bid defiance to all consequences. What had
he now to fear? was his natural reflection. Why should
he strive longer to keep terms with one with whom he
must inevitably break in the end? Clarence Conway
was his rival, was his enemy, and was in his power.
He had already felt the humiliation resulting from the
unbecoming equivocal position in which he stood to him.
He had bowed to him, when he better felt the mood to
battle with him. He had displayed the smile of
conciliation
,
when, in his heart, he felt all the bitterness of
dislike and hate. Why should he longer seek to
maintain
appearances with one from whom he now had
seemingly nothing to fear? Why not, at once, by a
bold avowal of his course, justify, in the language of
defiance, the hostile position in which he stood equally
to his country and his kinsman? Such a course would
amply account for the past; and, in those arguments by
which the loyalists of that day found a sanction for their
adherence to the mother country, he might well claim
all the rights of position due to one, whatever may be his
errors of judgment, who draws his sword in behalf of his
principles. Such were some of the arguments drawn
from the seeming necessity of the case, which rapidly
passed through the mind of Edward Conway as he
watched the play of mingled surprise and scorn in the
features of his kinsman. But they were not conclusive.
They were still combated by the last lingering
sentiments
of humanity and blood. Clarence Conway was
still his kinsman, and more than that, he owed him a life.
Besides, was the language of his second thoughts, his
myrmidons even now may be around us. Let us first
see the result of this pursuit.
New apprehensions arose from this last reflection.
That the followers of Clarence Conway were not far off
was the very natural reflection of every mind, after the
sudden and fearful death of him who had been the chosen
representative of their chief. That the shot which slew
Williams was meant for the chief of the Black Riders,
was his own reflection; and it counselled continued
prudence for the present. The game which he proposed
in prosecuting his purposes equally with Flora
Middleton
and his brother, was best promoted by his present
forbearanceby his still continuing, at least while in the
presence of Clarence Conway, to preserve his doubtful
position as a prisoner. He sank back, accordingly, upon
the bulk from which he had arisen in the first moment
of the alarm. His efforts were addressed to the task of
composing his features, and assuming the subdued aspect
of one who stands in equal doubt and apprehension of
his fate. Some moments of anxiety elapsed, in which
neither of the kinsmen spoke. Clarence, in the mean
time, had also resumed his seat. He no longer looked
towards his companion. His heart was filled with
apprehension
,
in which his own fate had no concern. He
trembled now for the life of the faithful woodmanfor
he did not doubt that it was hewho had tracked his
footsteps, and so promptly interfered at the hazard of his
own life, to exact that of his enemy. The senses of the
youth were sharpened to an intense keenness. He could
hear the distant clamours of the hunt without. The shouts
and shrieks of rage, breaking, as they rose, far above the
rush of the winds and the monotonous patterings of the
rain. He was roused from an attention at once painful
and unavoidable by the accents of his kinsman.
Clarence! said the latter, this is a terrible affair
the murder of this man!
Scarcely so terrible to me; was the cold reply
it prolonged my lifethe wretch would have murdered
me, and I look upon his corse without horror or regret!
Impossible! His purpose was only to intimidate
he would never have dared the commission of such a
crime.
You are yet to learn the deeds of the Black Riders
you know not how much such outlawed wretches will
dare in the very desperation of their hearts.
That was a dreadful deed, however;so swiftso
suddenI confess it almost unmanned me. I felt
desperate
with terror. I know not what I said.
So I thought, replied Clarence, for you actually
shouted to the wretches to pursue the murderer, and he,
too, that noble fellow, Jack Bannister. He has stood
between me and death before. You, also, Edward
Conway, owe him a life.
Do you think it was he, Clarence?
I have no doubt of it. I am sure of his halloo.
If they catch him!
God forbid that they should!
If they should not, we shall probably pay for his
boldness. They will wreak their fury on our heads, if
they be the bloody wretches that you describe them.
I am prepared for the worst. I am their prisoner, but
I fear nothing. I, at least, Edward Conway, am
somewhat
protected by the rights and usages of warbut
you
Much good did these rights promise you a few
minutes past, said the other sarcastically, unless my
conjecture be the right one. According to your notion,
precious little respect would these men have had for the
usages of war. Their own usages, by your showing,
have long since legitimated hanging and burning, and
such small practices.
I should not have perished unavenged. Nay, you
see already how closely the avenger follows upon the
footsteps of the criminal. For every drop of my blood
shed unlawfully, there would be a fearful drain from the
heart of every prisoner in the hands of Sumter.
That, methinks, were a sorry satisfaction. To me,
I confess, it would afford very little pleasure to be told,
while I am swinging, that some one or more of my
enemies
will share my fate in order that the balance sheet
between the two armies may be struck to their mutual
satisfaction. My manes on the other side of Styx, will
derive small comfort from beholding the ghost of my foe
following close behind me, with a neck having a like
ugly twist with my own, which he admits having
received
on my account.
The jest is a bald one that's born under the gallows,
replied Clarence gravely, with a Whig proverb.
Ay, but I am not there yet, replied the other;
and with God's blessing I hope that the tree and day
are equally far distant which shall witness such an
unhappy
suspension of my limbs and labours.
If I stand in such peril, replied Clarence Conway,
holding as I do a commission from the state
authorities
,
I cannot understand how it can be that you should
escape, having, unhappily, no such sanction, and being
so much more in danger from their suspicion. I
sincerely
trust that you will escape, Edward Conway, but
you see the perilous circumstances in which you are
placed by your unhappy neglect of the proper duties to
your country and yourself.
I am afraid, Clarence, that your commission will
hardly prevail upon them to make any difference in their
treatment of us.
And yet, I wish to Heaven, Edward Conway, that
both of my father's sons were equally well provided.
Do you really wish it, Clarence?
From my soul I do, was the reply. Gladly now,
could I do so, would I place my commission in your
hands.
Indeed! would you do this, Clarence Conway?
Are you serious? demanded the elder kinsman with
looks of considerable interest and surprise.
Serious! Do you know me so little as to make such
an inquiry! Would I trifle at such a moment with any
man?Could I trifle so with a kinsman? No! Bound
as we both are the desire is idle enough, but, could it be
done, Edward Conway, freely would I place the
parchment
in your hands with all the privileges which belong
to it.
And you
Would take my riskwould defy them to the last,
and rely upon their fears of that justice which would
certainly follow any attempt upon my life while I remain
their prisoner.
The chief of the Black Riders rose from the bulk on
which he had been seated, and twice, thrice, he paced
the apartment without speaking. Deep shadows passed
over his countenance, and low muttering sounds, which
were not words, escaped at moments through his closed
teeth. He seemed to be struggling for a space with some
new emotion. At length he stopped short in front of his
kinsman. He had succeeded in composing his features,
which were now mantled with a smile.
Clarence, he exclaimed, you are a very generous
fellow. You always were, even in your boyhood. Your
proffer to me loses nothing of its liberality because it
would be injurious rather than beneficial to me. Your
intention is every thing. But, I cannot accept your gift
it would be to me the shirt of Nessus. It would be my
death, and if you take my counsel you will say nothing
of it. Better by far had you left it in the swamp. Have
you forgotten that I am here, under these very bonds,
charged with no worse offence than that of being Colonel
Clarence Conway. If I could be secure from this
imputation
,
perhaps, I would escape with no worse evil than
the scars they have given me.
True, true! These after matters had driven the
other from my thought. I recollectI had even given
my testimony on that head. If it will serve you, I will
again repeat the truth, though they hew me down the
next instant.
Say nothing rashly, Clarence. You are as
excessively
bold as you are generousevery way an
extravagant
man. Suppress your commission, if you can, for
I'm doubtful if it can do you any good with these people,
and it may do you serious harm. They make little heed,
I fear, of law and parchment. But hark! The shouting
becomes nearer and louder. They are returningthey
have taken the assassin!
God forbid! was the involuntary ejaculation of
Clalence
,
while a cold shudder passed over his frame at the
apprehension.God forbid! Besides, Edward
Conway
,
he is no assassin.
Still generous, if not wise! was the remark of his
companion, who addedPerhaps, Clarence, our only
hope of safety depends upon their having their victim.
I love lifelife is precious to me, said the other,
but it would be a bitterness and a loathing could I feel
that it had been purchased by the sacrifice of that worthy
fellow.
We shall soon see. Here they come. Our trial is
at hand.
No more words were permitted to either speaker.
The uproar of conflicting voices withoutthe
questioning
and counsellingthe cries and clamours, effectually
stunned and silenced the two within. Then came a rush.
The door was thrown open, and in poured the troop,
with fury, vexation and disappointment. They had failed
to track the assassin. The darkness of the night, the
prevalence of the storm, and the absence of every trace
and track of his footstep, which the rain obliterated as
soon as it was set down, served to baffle their efforts and
defeat their aim. They returned in a more savage mood
of fury than before. They were now madmen. The
appetite for blood, provoked by the pursuit, had been
increased by the delay. Ben Williams, the man who
was slain, was a favourite among the troop. They were
prepared to avenge him, and in doing this, to carry out
the cruel penalty which he was about to inflict on the
prisoner in the moment when he was shot down. Led
on by one of the party, by whom Clarence had been
originally
made prisoner, they rushed upon him.
Out with him at once; was the cry of the
infuriate
wretches. To the tree: to the tree!
A rope, Muggs! was the demand of one; and
knives flashed about the eyes of the young partisan in
fearful proximity.
What would you do, boys? demanded Muggs
interposing
.
He alone knew the tie which existed
between
VOL. I. 10
the prisoner and his commander. He also knew,
in part at least, the objects for which the latter had put
on his disguise. Let the prisoner alone to-night, and
give him a fair trial in the morning.
Who talks of fair trial in the morning? Look at
Ben Williams lying at your foot. You're treading in his
blood, and you talking of fair trial to his murderer.
But this man aint his murderer!
Same thingsame thingwa'nt it on his account
that he was shot. Away with him to the tree. Away
with him!
Haul him along, fellows! Here, let me lay hand on
his collar, cried a huge fellow from behind. Give's
a hold on him and you'll soon see him out.
A dozen hands grappled with the youth. A dozen
more contended that they might do so likewise.
Scoundrels, give me but room, and I will follow
you, cried Clarence with a scorn as lofty as he would
have shown in a station of the utmost security, and with
tones as firm as he ever uttered at the head of his
regiment
.
If nothing but my blood can satisfy you for
that which is shed, take it. You shall not see me shrink
from any violence which your ruffian hands may inflict.
Know that I despise and defy you to the last.
Gag himstop his mouth. Shall the rebel flout us
on our own ground.
Bring him forward. The blood of Ben Williams
cries out to us;why do you stand with open mouths
there. Shove him ahead.
Amid such cries as these, coupled with the most
shocking oaths and imprecations, they dragged forward
the youth slowly, for their own numbers and conflicting
violence prevented co-operation. They dragged him on
until, at length, he stood in the blood, and just above the
body, of the murdered man. He did not struggle, but he
shrunk back naturally, with some horror, when he felt
the clammy substance sticking to his feet. He readily
conjectured whence it camefrom what sacred sources
of human life;and, though a fearless soldierone who,
in the heat of battle, had often shed the blood of his
enemyyet the nature within him recoiled at the
conviction
that he stood in a puddle, which, but a little time
before, had beat and bounded, all animation and strength
and passion, in the bosom of a living man. His
shuddering
recoil was mistaken by the crowd for resistance, and
one ruffian, more brutal than the rest, renewing his grasp
with one hand upon the collar of the youth, with the
other struck him in the face. The blow, that last
indignity
and violence to which the man submits, roused the
swelling tides in the bosom of the youth beyond their
wonted bounds. With an effort which seemed rather an
emotion of the soul than a physical endeavour, he put
forth his whole strength, and the cords snapped asunder
which had confined his arms, and with the rapidity of
lightning he retorted the blow with such sufficient interest
as prostrated the assailant at his feet.
Now, scoundrels, if you must have blood, use your
knivesfor no rope shall profane my neck while I have
soul to defy and power to resist you. Dogs, bloodhounds
that you are, I scorn, I spit upon you. Bring forth your
best manyour chief, if you have one to take the place
of this carcass at my feet, that I may revile and defy,
and spit upon him also.
A moment's pause ensued. The noble air of the man
whom they environedthe prodigious strength which he
had shown in snapping asunder the strong cords which
secured his limbs, commanded their admiration. Courage
and strength will always produce this effect, in the minds
of savage men. They beheld him with a momentary
pause of wonder; but shame to be thus baffled by a single
man, lent them new audacity. They rushed upon him.
Without weapons of any kind, for he had been disarmed
when first made a captive, they had no occasion to resort
to that degree of violence in overcoming him, to which
he evidently aimed to provoke them. It was his obvious
desire to goad them on to the use of weapons which
would take life and thus effectually defeat their purpose
of consigning him to the gallows;that degrading form
of death from which the gentle mind shrinks with a
revulsion which the fear of the sudden stroke or the
swift shot, could never occasion. Hence the abusive and
strong language which he employedlanguage otherwise
unfamiliar to his lips. His desire might still have been
gratified. Several of the more violent among the young
men of the party were rushing on him with uplifted
hands, in which the glittering blade was flashing and
conspicuous. But the scornful demand of Clarence, with
which he concluded his contumelious speech, brought a
new party into the field. This was no other than his
kinsman. He had been a looker on for some moments
not longfor the whole scene took far less time for
performance than it now takes for narration. He had
watched its progress with new and rather strange
emotions
.
At one moment, the selfish desires of his heart
grew predominant. He thought of Flora Middleton, and
he sank back and closed his eyes upon the objects around
him, saying, in his secret heartLet them go onlet
him perishwhy should I preserve from destruction the
only obstacle to my desires. At the next moment, a
better spirit prevailed within him. He remembered the
services of Clarence to himself.He owed to him his
life; and but now, had not the generous youth tendered
him for his extrication and sole use that document, which
he fancied would be all powerful in securing his own
safety. The image of their mutual father came, also, to
goad the unworthy son to a sense of his duty, and when
he heard the fierce, proud accents of the youthwhen
he heard him call for their best man, their chief, that
he might defy and spit upon him, he started to his feet.
There was but a moment left him for performance if his
purpose was to save. The knives of the infuriate mob
were already flourishing above their victim, and in their
eyes might be seen that fanatical expression of fury
which is almost beyond human power to arrest. A keen,
quick, meaning glance, he gave to the landlord, Muggs;
whose eyes had all the while been anxiously watchful of
his leader. At the sign the latter made his way behind
him, and, unobserved, with a single stroke of his knife,
separated the cord which bound his arms. In another
instant his voice rose superior to all their clamours.
Hold, on your lives! he exclaimed, leaping in
among the assailants. Back, instantly, fellows, or you
make an enemy of me! Let the prisoner alone!
Gad, I'm so glad! exclaimed Muggs, while the
big drops of perspiration poured down his forehead.
I thought, cappin, you couldn't stand by, and see
them make a finish of it.
10*
CHAPTER X
SHADOWS OF COMING EVENTS.
Hold
, comrades, you have done enough. Leave the
prisoner to me! Colonel Conway, you demanded to
look upon the chief of the Black Riders. He is before
you. He answers, at last, to your defiance.
And with these words, with a form rising into dignity
and height, in becoming correspondence, as it were, with
the novel boldness of his attitude, Edward Conway stood
erect and confronted his kinsman. In the bosom of the
latter a thousand feelings were at conflict. Vexation at the
gross imposition which had been practised upon him
scorn at the baseness of the various forms of subterfuge
which the other had employed in his serpent-like progress;
but, more than all, the keen anguish which followed a
discovery
so humiliating, in the bosom of one so sensible to
the purity of the family name and honourall combined
to confound equally his feelings and his judgment. But
his reply was not the less prompt for all this.
And him, thus known, I doubly scorn, defy and spit
upon!
He had not time for more. Other passions were in
exercise beside his own; and Edward Conway was
taught to know, by what ensued, if the truth were
unknown
to him before, that it is always a far less difficult
task to provoke, than to quiet, frenzyto stimulate, than
to subdue, the ferocity of human passions, when at the
flood. A fool may set the wisest by the ears, but it is
not the wisest always who can restore them to their
former condition of sanity and repose. The
congratulations
of Muggs, the landlord, which, by the way, spoke
something in his behalf, promised for a while to be
without
sufficient reason. The captain of the Black Riders
met with unexpected resistance among his troop.
The
murdered man had been a favourite, and they were not
apt to be scrupulous about avenging the death of such
among their comrades as were. Even at a time when a
moderate degree of reason prevailed among them, it was
not easy to subdue them to placability and forbearance in
regard to a prisoner; the very name of whom, according
to their usual practice, was synonymous with victim.
How much less so, at this juncture, when, with their
blood roused to tiger rage, they had been suffered to
proceed
to the very verge of indulgence, before any effort,
worthy of the name, on the part of an acknowledged
superior, had been made to arrest them! Edward
Morton
felt his error, in delaying his interposition so long.
If his purpose had been to save, his effort should have
been sooner made, and then it might have been effected
without the more serious risk which now threatened
himself, in the probable diminution of his authority. He
estimated his power too highly, and flattered himself that
he could at any moment interpose with effect. He made
no allowance for that momentum of the blood, which, in
the man aroused by passion and goaded to fury, resists
even the desires of the mind accustomed to control it;
even as the wild beast, after he has lashed himself into
rage, forgets the keeper by whom he is fed and
disciplined
,
and rends him with the rest. Edward Morton
stood erect and frowning among those whom he was
accustomed to commandand their obedience was
withheld
!
His orders were received with murmurs by some
with sullenness by all. They still maintained their
positiontheir hands and weapons upliftedtheir eyes
glaring with savage determination;now fixed on their
threatened victim, and now on their commander; and
without much difference in their expression when
surveying
either.
Do ye murmurare ye mutinous? Ha! will ye
have me strike, men; that ye fall not back? Is it you,
Barton, and you, Fisher.You, of all, that stand up in
resistance to my will! Ensign Darcy, it will best
become
you to give me your prompt obedience. I have
not forgotten your connexion with Lieutenant Stockton.
Fall back, sirdo not provoke me to anger: do not any
of you provoke me too far!
The man addressed as Bartona huge fellow who
made himself conspicuous by his clamours from the first
replied in a style which revealed to Morton the full
difficulties of his position.
Look you, Captain Morton, I'm one that is always
for obedience when the thing's reasonable; but here's
a case where it's onreasonable quite. We aint used to
see one of us shot down without so much as drawing
blood for it. Ben Williams was my friend; and, for
that matter, he was a friend with every fellow of the
troop. I, for one, can't stand looking at his blood, right
afore me, and see his enemy standing t'other side,
without so much as a scratch. As for the obedience,
Captain, why there's time enough for that when we've
done hanging the rebel.
It must be now, Mr. Barton. Muggs, that pistol!
Stand by me with your weapon. Men, I make you one
appeal! I am your Captain! All who are still willing
that I should be so, will follow Muggs. Muggsbehind
me. March! By the God of Heaven, Mr. Barton, this
moment tries our strength. You or I must yield. There
is but a straw between us. There is but a moment of
time for either! Lower your weapon, sir, or one of
us, in another instant, lies with Ben Williams.
The huge horseman's pistol which Muggs handed to
his leader at his requisition, had been already cocked
by the landlord. It was lifted while Morton was
speaking
deliberately
liftedand the broad muzzle was
made to rest full against the face of the refractory
subordinate
.
The instant was full of doubt and peril, and
Clarence Conway forgot for the time his own danger
in the contemplation of the issue. But the courage of
the moral man prevailed over the instinct of blood.
Edward Morton saw that he was about to triumph.
The eye of the fierce mutineer sunk beneath his own,
though its angry fires were by no means quenched. It
still gleamed with defiance and rage, but no longer with
resolution. The fellow looked round upon his comrades.
They had shrunk backthey were no longer at his
side, and no small number had followed the landlord
and were now ranged on either side of their Captain.
Of those who had not taken this decided movement, he
saw the irresoluteness, and his own necessarily
increased
.
It is this dependence upon sympathy and
association which constitutes one of the essential
differences
between the vulgar and the educated mind.
Brutal and bold as he was, Barton was not willing to
be left alone. The chief of the Black Riders saw that
the trial was fairly overthe strife had passed. The
evil spirit was laid for the present, and there was no
longer any thing to fear.
Enough! he exclaimed, lowering his weapon, and
acting with a better policy than had altogether governed
his previous movements. Enough! You know me,
Barton, and I think I know you. You are a good
fellow
at certain seasons, but you have your blasts and
your hurricanes, and do not always know when to leave
off the uproar. You will grow wiser, I trust, but
meanwhile
you must make some effort to keep your passions
in order. This rough treatment of your friends, as if
they were foes, won't answer. Beware. You have
your warning.
Yes, growled the ruffian, doggedly, still unwilling
altogether to submit; but when our friends stand up
for our foes, and take sides against us, I think its
reasonable
enough to think there's not much difference
between 'em, as you say. I'm done, but I think it's
mighty hard now-a-days that we can't hang a rebel and
a spy, without being in danger of swallowing a bullet
ourselves. And then, too, poor Ben Williams. Is he
to lie there in his blood, and nothing to be done to his
enemy?
I say not that, Mr. Barton. The prisoner shall
have a trial; and if you find him guilty of connexion
with the man who shot Williams, you may then do as
you please. I have no disposition to deprive you of
your victim; but know from me, that, while I command
you, you shall obey meay, without asking the why
and wherefore! I should be a sorry captainnay, you
would be a sorry troopif I suffered your
insubordination
for an instant. Away, now, and make the circuit
all of you but Shumway and Irby. See to your
powder, that it be kept dry; and let your horses be in
readiness for a start at dawn. This country is too hot
for you already; and with such management as you
have had in my absence, it would become seven times
hotter. Away.
They disappeared, all but the two who were excepted
by name. To these he delivered the prisoner.
Shumway, do you and Irby take charge of the rebel.
Lodge him in the block, and let him be safely kept till I
relieve you. Your lives shall answer for his safety.
Spare none who seek to thwart you. Were he the best
man in the troop who approached you suspiciously,
shoot him down like a dog.
In silence the two led Clarence Conway out of the
house. He followed them in silence. He looked once
toward his kinsman, but Edward Morton was not yet
prepared to meet his glance. His head was averted as
the former was followed by his guards to the entrance.
Clarence was conducted to an out-housea simple, but
close, block-house, of squared logssmall, and of little
use as a prison, except as it was secluded from the
highway. Its value, as a place of safe keeping, consisted
simply in its obscurity. Into this he was thrust
headlong
,
and the door fastened from without upon him.
There let us leave him for a while, to meditate upon the
strange and sorrowful scene which he had witnessed,
and of which he had been a part. His reflections were
not of a nature to permit him to pay much attention to
the accommodations which were afforded him. He found
himself in utter darkness, and the inability to employ
his eyes led necessarily to the greater exercise of his
thoughts. He threw himself upon the floor of his
dungeon
,
which was covered with pine straw, and brooded
over the prospects of that life which had just passed
through an ordeal so narrow. Let us now return to
his kinsman.
Edward Morton had now resumed all the duties of
his station as chief of the Black Riders. In this capacity,
and just at this time, his tasks, as the reader will readily
imagine, were neither few in number nor easy of
performance
.
It required no small amount of firmness,
forethought and adroitness, to keep in subjection, and
govern to advantage, such unruly spirits. But the skill
of their captain was not inconsiderable, and such were
the very spirits whom he could most successfully
command
.
The coarser desires of the mind, and the wilder
passions of the man, he could better comprehend than
any other. With these he was at home. But with
these his capacity was at an end. Beyond these, and
with finer spirits, he was usually at fault. To be the
successful leader of ruffians is, perhaps, a small merit.
It requires cunning rather than wisdom to be able
simply
to discover the passion which it seeks to use, and
this was the chief secret of Edward Morton. He knew
how to make hate, and jealousy, and lust, and fear,
subservient to his purposes, already roused into action.
It is doubtful even whether he possessed the cold-blooded
talent of Iago, to awaken them from their slumbers,
breathe into them the breath of life, and send them
forward
,
commissioned like so many furies, for the
destruction
of their wretched victim. A sample has been given
already of the sort of trial which awaited him in the
control of his comrades. But there were other
difficulties
which tasked his powers to the utmost. The
difficulties
which environed the whole British army were
such as necessarily troubled, in a far greater degree, its
subordinate commands. The duties of these were more
constant, more arduous, and liable to more various risk
and exposure. The unwonted successes of the
American
arms had awakened all the slumbering patriotism
of the people; while the excesses, of which such parties
as that which Morton commanded, had been guilty, in
the hey-day of their reckless career, had roused passions
in the bosom of their foes, which, if better justified, were
equally violent, and far less likely, once awakened, to
relapse into slumber. Revenge was busy with all her
train in search of himself and the gloomily caparisoned
troop which he led. It was her array from which he
so narrowly escaped when he received the timely
succour
of his kinsman in the swamp. An hundred small
bodies like his own had suddenly started into existence
and activity around him, some of which had almost
specially devoted themselves to the destruction of his
troop. The wrongs of lust, and murder, and spoliation,
were about to be redressed; and by night as by day
was he required to keep his troop in motion, if for no
other object than his own safety; though, by this
necessity
,
he was compelled to traverse a country which had
been devastated by the wanton hands of those whom
he commanded. On the same track, and because of
the same provocation, were scattered hundreds of
enemies
,
as active in pursuit and search as he was in
evasion
.
He well knew the fate which awaited him if
caught, and involuntarily shuddered as he thought of it:
death in its most painful formtorture fashioned by
the most capricious exercise of ingenuityscorn,
ignominy
and contumely, the most bitter and degrading,
which stops not even at the gallows, and, as far as it
may, stamps the sign of infamy upon the grave. These
were, in part, the subject of the gloomy meditations of
the outlawed chief when left alone in the wigwam of
Muggs, the landlord. True, he was not without his
resourceshis disguiseshis genius! He had been so
far wonderfully favoured by fortune, and his hope was
an active, inherent principle in his organization. But
the resources of genius avail not always, and even the
sanguine temperament of Edward Morton was disposed
to reserve, while listening to the promises of fortune.
He knew the characteristic caprices in which she was
accustomed to indulge. He was no blind believer in
her books. He was too selfish a man to trust her
implicitly
;
though, hitherto, she had fulfilled every promise
that she had ever made him. The signs of a change
were visible to his senses. He had his doubts and
misgivings
;
he was not without audacityhe could dare
with the boldest; but his daring had usually been shown
at periods, when to dare was to be cautious. He
meditated
even now to distrust the smiles of fortune in
season
to
leave the field of adventure while it was still
possible and safe to do so. His meditations were
interrupted
at this moment, and, perhaps, assisted, by no
less a person than Muggs, the landlord. He made his
appearance, after a brief visit to an inner shantya
place of peculiar privitythe sanctum sanctorum, in
which the landlord wisely put away from sight such
stores as he wished to preserve from that maelstrom,
the common stock. The landlord was one of the few
who knew the secret history of the two Conways; and
though he knew not all, he knew enough to form a
tolerably just idea of the feelings with which the elder
regarded the younger kinsman. He could form a notion,
also, of the sentiments by which they were requited.
In Muggs, Edward Morton had reason to believe
that he had a sure friendone before whom he might
safely venture to unbosom some of his reserves. Still
he was especially careful to show not all, nor the most
importantnone, in fact, the revelation of which could
possibly be productive of any very serious injury or
inconvenience. He, perhaps, did little more than
stimulate
the communicative disposition of mine host,
who, like most persons of his craft, was garrulous by
profession, and fancied that he never ministered
perfectly
to the palates of his guests, unless when he
accompanied
the service by a free exercise of his own
tongue.
Well, cappin, the game of fox and goose is finished
now, I reckon. There's no chance to play possum with
your brother any longer. It's lion and tiger now, if
any thing.
I suppose so, replied the other, with something of
a sigh. The landlord continued:
The question now, I reckonnow, that you've go
him in your clutchesis what you're to do with him
VOL. I. 11
To my thinking, it's jest the sort of question that
bothered
the man when he shook hands with the black
bear round the tree. It was a starve to hold on and a
squeeze to let go, and danger to the mortal ribs which
ever way he took it.
You have described the difficulty, Muggs, said
the other, musingly,what to do with him is the
question.
There's no keeping him here, that's cl'ar.
No. That's impossible!
His friends, I reckon, are nigh enough to get him
out of the logbox, and it's cl'ar they know where to
find him. That shot that tumbled poor Williams was
mighty nigh and mighty sudden, and was sent by a
bold fellow. I'm onsatisfied but there was more than
one.
No,but one, said Morton,but one!
Well, cappin, how do you count? There wa'n't
no track to show a body where to look for him. The
wash made the airth smooth again in five shakes after
the foot left the print.
It's guesswork with me only, Muggs.
And who do you guess t'was, cappin?
Supple Jack!
Well, I reckon you're on the right trail. It's
reasonable
enough. I didn't once think of him. But it's
cl'ar enough to every body that knows the man, that
Supple Jack's jest the lad to take any risk for a person
he loves so well. But, you don't think he come alone?
I'm dub'ous the whole troop aint mighty fur off.
But him, Muggs! He probably came alone. We
left him, only an hour before I came, on the edge of the
Watereea few miles above this. He and Clarence
gave me shelter in the swamp when I was chased by
Butler's men, and when that skulking scoundrel,
Stockton
,
left me to perish. Clarence rode on with me, and
left Supple Jack to return to the swamp, where they
have a first rate hiding place. I suspect he did not
return, but followed us. But of this we may speak
hereafter. The question is, what to do with the prisoner
this bear whom I have by the paws, and whom it is
equally dangerous to keep and to let go.
Well, that's what I call a tight truth; but it's a sort
of satisfaction, cappin, that you've still got the tree
a-tween you; and so you may stop a while to consider.
Now, I aint altogether the person to say what's what,
and how it's to be done; but if so be I can say any
thing to make your mind easy, cappin, you know I'm
ready.
Do, Muggs: let us hear you, was the reply of the
outlaw, with the musing manner of one who listens
with his ears only, and is content to hear every thing,
if not challenged to find answer.
Well, cappin, I'm thinking jest now we're besot all
round with troubles; and there's no telling which is
biggest, closest, and ugliestthey're all big, and close,
and ugly. As for hiding Clarence Conway here, now,
or for a day more, that's unpossible. It's cl'ar he's
got his friends on the track, one, or mout-be, a
hundred
;
and they can soon muster enough to work him
out of the timbers, if it's only by gnawing through with
their teeth. Well, how are you to do then? Send him
under guard to Camden? Why, it's a chance if all
your troop can carry themselves there, without losing
their best buttons by the way. It's a long road, and
the rebels watch it as close as hawks do the farm-yard
in chicken season. That, now, is about the worst sign
for the king's side that I've seed for a long spell of
summers. It shows pretty cl'ar that we aint so strong
as we was a-thinking. The wonder is, where these
troopers come from; and the worst wonder is, where
they get their boldness. Once on a time, when
Tarleton
first begun to ride among us, it was more like a
driving of deer than a fighting of men; but it seems to
me that the rebels have got to be the drivers, and o'
late days they scamper us mightily. I see these things
better than you, cappin, and, perhaps, better than the
rebels themselves; for I aint in the thick, I'm jest like
one that's a-standing on a high hill and looking down
at the fighting when it's a-going on below. I tell you,
cappin, the game's going agen the king's people.
They're a-losing groundthese men's getting fewer
and fewer every day, and jest so fast I hear of a new
gathering among the whigs. I tell you agen, cappin,
you're besot with troubles.
I know it, Muggs. Your account of the case is an
accurate one. We are in a bad way.
By jingo, you may say so, cappin. You are, as I
may say, in a mighty bad waya sort of conflustration,
that it puzzles my old head more than I can tell rightly,
to onbefluster. Then, as for the prisoner
Ay,
that
, Muggs. Speak to
that
. What of him?
let me hear your advice about the prisoner. How is
he to be disposed of?
Well now, cappinthere's a-many ways for doing
that, but which is the right and proper oneand when
it's done, will it sarve the purpose? I'm afeard not
I'm not knowing to any way how to fix it so as to
please you. It's pretty sartain he's your enemy in
war and your enemy in peace; and if all things that's
said be true, about him and Miss Flora, it don't seem
to me that you'd ha' been any worse offif so be your
father had never given you this brother for a
companion
.
The outlaw chief looked up for the first time during
the interview, and his eye full of significance
encountered
that of the landlord.
Ay, Muggs, the gift was a fatal one to me. Better
far betterfor me had he never seen the light; or,
seeing it, that some friendly foe had closed it from his
eyes, while hewhile we were bothin a state of
innocence.
Gad, captain, I was thinking at one time to-night
that black Barton would have done you a service like
that; and I was a-thinking jest then, that you wa'nt
unwilling. You kept so long quiet, that I was afeard
you'd have forgotten the bloodkin, and let the boys had
the game their own way.
You were afraid of it, were you? said Morton, his
brow darkening as he spoke.
Ay, that I was, mightily. When I thought of the
temptations, you know;Miss Flora and her property,
and then the fine estates he got by his mother's side
and all that was like to fall to you, if once he was out
of the wayI begun to tremblefor I thought you
couldn't stand the temptation. `He's only to keep
quiet now and say nothing, and see what he'll get for
only looking on.' That was the thought that troubled
me. I was afeard, as I tell you, that you'd forget
blood-kin
and every thing when you come to consider these
temptations.
The outlaw rose and strode the floor impatiently.
No, no, Muggs, you had little cause to fear. He
had just saved my lifesheltered me from my enemies
nay, would have yielded me his own commission as
a protection, which he supposed would be effectual for
his own or my safety. No, no! I could not suffer it.
Yet, as you say, great, indeed, would have been the
gaingreat was the temptation.
True, cappin, but what's the gain that a man gits
by bloodying his hands agin natur'? Now, it's not
onreasonable
or onnatural, when you have tumbled an
open enemy in a fair scratch, to see after his consarns,
and empty his fob and pockets. But I don't think any
good could go with the gain that's spotted with the
blood of one's own brother
He's but a half-brother, Muggs, said Morton,
hastily. Different mothers, you recollect.
Well, I don't see that there's a-much difference,
cappin. He's a full brother by your father's side.
Yes, yes!but Muggs, had he been slain by
Barton
and the rest, the deed would have been none of
mine. It was a chance of war, and he's a soldier.
Well, cappin, I'm not so certain about that. There's
a difference I know, but
It matters not! He lives! He is spared, Muggs
spared, perhaps, for the destruction of his preserver. I
have saved his life; but he knows my secret. That
secret!That fatal secret! Would to God!
He broke off the exclamation abruptly, while he
struck his head with his open palm.
11*
My brain is sadly addled, Muggs. Give me
something
something
which will settle it and compose my
nerves. You are happy, old fellowyou are happy,
andsafe! The rebels have forgiven youhave they
not?
Well, we have forgiven each other, cappin, and I
have found them better fellows nigh, than they were at
a distance; replied the landlord, while he concocted
for the outlaw a strong draught of punch, the favourite
beverage of the time and country. If I aint happy,
cappin, it's nobody's fault but my own. I only wish
you were as safe with all your gettings as I think
myself
with mine; and you might be
A look of much significance concluded the sentence.
How,what would you say, Muggs? demanded
the outlaw, with some increase of anxiety in his
manner
.
The reply of the landlord was whispered in his ears.
Would to heaven I could!but how?How,
Muggs, is this to be done?
The answer was again whispered.
No, no! replied the other, with a heavy shake of
the head. I would not, and I dare not. They have
stood by me without fear or faithlessness, and I will not
now desert them. But enough of this for the present.
Get me your lantern, while I seek this brother of mine
in private. There must be some more last words
between
us.
CHAPTER XI.
THE TRUE ISSUE.
Preceded
by the landlord, Muggs, who carried a dark
lantern, Morton took his way to the secluded
block-house
in which his kinsman was a prisoner. The only
entrance to this rude fabric was closely watched by the
two persons to whom Clarence was given in charge.
These found shelter beneath a couple of gigantic oaks
which stood a little distance apart from one another,
yet sufficiently nigh to the block-house to enable the
persons in their shadow, while themselves perfectly
concealed, to note the approach of any intruder.
Dismissing
them to the tavern, the chief of the Black
Riders assigned to Muggs the duty of the watch, and
having given him all necessary instructions, he entered
the prison, the door of which was carefully fastened
behind
him by the obedient landlord.
The lantern which he bore, and which he set down
in one corner of the apartment, enabled Clarence to
distinguish his brother at a glance; but the youth
neither stirred nor spoke as he beheld him. His mind,
in the brief interval which had elapsed after their violent
separation in the tavern, had been busily engaged in
arriving at that stage of stern resignation, which left
him comparatively indifferent to any evils which might
then occur. Unable to form any judgment upon the
course of his brother's future conduct, he was not
prepared
to say how far he might be willing to go, and
how soon, in permitting to his sanguinary troop the
indulgence of their bloody will. Wisely, then, he had
steeled his mind against the worst, resolved, if he had
to suffer death in an obscurity so little desired by the
youthful and ambitious heart, to meet its bitter edge
with as calm a countenance as he should like to display
under a similar trial, in the presence of a thousand
spectators.
Edward Morton had evidently made great efforts to
work his mind up to a similar feeling of stern
indifference
;
but he had not been so successful, although,
at the moment, untroubled by any of those
apprehensions
which were sufficiently natural to the situation of
his brother. His face might have been seen to vary in
colour and expression as his eye turned upon the spot
where Clarence was sitting. The moral strength was
wanting in his case which sustained the latter. The
consciousness of guilt enfeebled, in some degree, a
spirit, whose intense selfishness alone, were he
unpossessed
of any other more decisive characteristics, must
have been the source of no small amount of firmness
and courage. As if ashamed, however, of his
feebleness
,
and determined to brave the virtue which he still
felt himself compelled to respect, he opened the
conference
by a remark, the tone and tenor of which were
intended to seem exulting and triumphant.
So, Colonel Conway, you find your wisdom has
been at fault. You little fancied that you were half so
intimate with that fierce banditthat renowned
chieftain
,
of whom report speaks so loudly. It does not
need that I should introduce you formally to the captain
of the Black Riders of Congaree.
The youth looked up and fixed his eye steadily on
that of the speaker. Severe, indeed, but full of a manly
sorrow, was the expression of that glance.
Edward Conway, he replied, after a brief delay,
you do not deceive me by that tonenay, you do not
deceive yourself. Your heart, instead of exultation,
feels at this moment nothing but shame. Your eye
gazes not steadily on mine. Your spirit is not that of
a fearless man. You shrink, Edward Conway, in spite
of your assumed boldness, with all the cowardice of a
guilty soul.
Cowardice!do you charge me with cowardice?
Ay, what else than cowardice has made you
descend
to the subterfuge and the trickto the base
disguise
and the baser falsehood? These, too, to your
brother, even at the moment when he was risking his
own life to rescue that which you have dishonoured
for ever.
I will prove to you, in due season, that I am no
coward, Clarence Conway, replied the other, in hoarse
and nearly undistinguishable accents; you, at least,
are seeking to convince me that you are none, in thus
bearding the lion in his den.
The lion! Shame not that noble beast by any such
comparison. The fox will better suit your purpose and
performance.
With a strong effort the outlaw kept down his
temper
,
while he replied:
I will not suffer you to provoke me, Clarence
Conway
.
I have sought you for a single object, and that I
will perform. After thatthat overand the
provocation
shall be met and welcomed. Now!
The other fiercely interrupted him, as he exclaimed:
Now, be it if you will. Free my handscut
asunder
these degrading bonds which you have fixed upon
the arms whose last offices were employed in freeing
yours, and in your defence, and here, in this dungeon,
breast to breast, let us carry out that strife to its fit
completion, which your evil passion, your cupidity, or
hate, have so dishonestly begun. I know not, Edward
Conway, what perversity of heart has brought you to
this wretched conditionto the desertion of your
friends, your countrythe just standards of humanity
the noble exactions of truth. You have allied
yourself
to the worst of ruffians, in the worst of practices,
without even the apology of that worst of causes which
the ordinary tory pleads in his defence. You cannot
say that your loyalty to the king prompts you to the
side you have taken, for I myself have heard you
declare
against him a thousand times; unless, indeed, I
am to understand that even ere we left the hearth and
burial-place of our father, you had begun that career of
falsehood in which you have shown yourself so
proficient
.
But I seek not for the causes of your present
state; for the wrongs and the dishonour done me. If
you be not utterly destitute of manhood, cut these
bonds, and let the issue for life or death between us
determine which is right.
There! You have your wish, Clarence Conway.
And as he spoke, he separated the cords with his
hunting-knife
,
and the partisan extended his limbs in all the
delightful consciousness of recovered freedom.
You are so far free, Clarence Conway! your limbs
are unbound, but you are unarmed. I restore you the
weapon with which you this day provided me. It
would now be easy for you to take the life of him whom
you so bitterly denounce. I have no weapon to defend
myself; my bosom is without defence.
What mean you? Think you that I would rush on
you unarmedthat I seek unfair advantage?
No, Clarencefor your own sake and safety, I
would not fight you now.
Why for my safety? demanded the partisan.
For the best of reasons. Were you to succeed in
taking my life, it would avail you nothing, and your
own would be forfeit. You could not escape from this
place, and fifty weapons would be ready to avenge my
death.
Why, then, this mockerythis cutting loose my
bondsthis providing me with weapons? demanded
Clarence.
You shall see. You know not yet my desire.
Hear me. My purpose is to acquit myself wholly of
the debt I owe you, so that, when we do meet, there
shall be nothing to enfeeble either of our arms, or
diminish their proper execution. Once to-night I have
saved you, even at the peril of my own life, from the
fury of my followers. I have already severed your
bonds. I have restored your weapon, and before the
dawn of another day, the fleet limbs of your own
charger shall secure your freedom. This done,
Clarence
Conway, I shall feel myself acquitted of all those
burdensome obligations which, hitherto, have made me
suppress the natural feelings of my heartthe objects
of my mindthe purposes of interest, ambition, love
all of which depend upon your life. So long as you
live, I live notso long as you breathe, my breath is
drawn with doubt, difficulty, and in danger. Your life
has been in my hands, but I could not take it while I
was indebted to you for my own. By to-morrow's
dawn I shall be acquitted of the debtI shall have
given you life for life, and liberty for liberty. After
that, when we next meet, my gifts shall be scorn for
scorn and blow for blow. You have my purpose.
Clarence Conway heard him with patience, but with
mixed feelings. He was about to reply in a similar
spirit, but a nobler sentiment arose in his bosom with
the momentary pause which he allowed himself for
thought. He kept down the gushing blood which was
about to pour itself forth in defiance from his labouring
breast, and spoke as follows:
I will not say, Edward Conway, what I might
safely utter, of my own indifference to your threats.
Nay, were I to obey the impulses which are now
striving
within me for utterance, I should rather declare how
happy it would make me were the hour of that struggle
arrived. But there are reasons that speak loudly
against the wish. For your sake, for our father's sake,
Edward Conway, I would pray that we might never
meet again.
Pshaw,these are whining follies! The cant of
the girl or the puritan. They do not impose on me.
Thy father's sake and mine, indeed! Say nothing for
yourselffor your own sakeoh, no! no! you have
no considerations of selfnone. Philanthropic, patriotic
gentleman!
The keen eye of Clarence flashed scornfully as he
listened to this sneer. He bit his lip to restrain his
emotion, and once more replied, but it was no longer in
the language of forbearance.
I am not unwilling to say for my sake also,
Edward
Conway. Even to you, I need not add, that no
mean sentiment of fear governs me in the expression.
Fear I have of no man. Fear of you, Edward Conway,
you, in your present degraded attitude and base
condition
the
leagued with ruffians and common stabbers
a traitor and a liar!Fear of you I could not have!
Nor do you need that I should tell you this. You feel
it in your secret soul. You know that I never feared
you in boyhood, and cannot fear you now. My
frequent
experience of your powers and my own, makes
me as careless of your threats, as that natural courage
which belongs to my blood and mind makes me
insensible
to the threats of others. Go toyou cannot bully
me. I scornI utterly despise you.
Enough, enough, Colonel Conway. We understand
each other, cried the outlaw, almost convulsed with
his emotions. We are quits from this hour.
Henceforward
I fling the ties of blood to the winds. As I do
not feel them, I will not affect them. I acknowledge
them no more. I am not your father's sonnot your
brother. I forswear, and from this moment I shall for ever
deny the connexion. I have no share in the base
puddle
which fills your veins. Know me, henceforth, for a
nobler spirit. I glory in the name which scarces your
puny legions. I am the chief of the Black Riders of
Congareethat fell banditti which makes your women
shiver and your warriors shake,upon whom you
invoke and threaten vengeance equally in vain. I care
not to be distinguished by any other name or
connexion
.
You I shall only know as one to whom I am
pledged for battle, and whom I am sworn to destroy.
You know not, forsooth, what has driven me to this
position! I will tell you here, once for all, and the
answer
,
I trust, will conclude your doubts for ever. Hate
for youfor you only! I hated you from your cradle
with an instinct which boyhood hourly strengthened,
and manhood rendered invincible. I shall always hate
you; and if I have temporized, heretofore, and
forborne
the declaration of the truth, it was only the more
effectually to serve and promote purposes which were
necessary to that hate. That time, and the necessity
of forbearance are at an end. I can speak, and speak
freely, the full feeling of my soul. Accident has revealed
to you what, perhaps, I should have wished for a while
longer to withhold; but that known, it is now my pride
to have no farther concealments. I repeat, therefore,
that I loathe you from my soul, Clarence Conway, and
when I have fairly acquitted myself of the debt I owe
you, by sending you to your swamp in safety, I shall
then seek, by every effort, to overcome and destroy
you. Do you hear meam I at last understood?
I hear you, replied Clarence Conway, with a tone
calm, composed, even; and with looks unmoved, and
even sternly contemptuous. I hear you. Your
violence
does not alarm me, Edward Conway. I look
upon you as a madman. As for your threats! Pshaw,
man! You almost move me to deal in clamours like
your own. Let us vapour here no longer. I accept your
terms. Give me my freedom, and set all your ruffians
on the track. I make no promiseI utter no threat
but if I fail to take sweet revenge for the brutal
outrages
to which I have this night been subjected by
you and all, then may Heaven fall me in my dying
hour.
We are pledged, Clarence Conway, said the
outlaw
;
before daylight I will conduct you from this
place. Your horse shall be restored to you. You
shall be free. I then know you no moreI fling from
me the name of kinsman.
Not more heartily than I. Black Rider, bandit,
outlaw, or ruffian! I shall welcome you to the combat
by any name sooner than that which my father has
made sacred in my ears.
Morton bestowed a single glance on the speaker, in
which all the hellish hate spoke out which had so long
VOL. I. 12
been suppressed, yet working in his bosom. The latter
met the glance with one more cool and steady, if far
less full of malignity.
Be it then as he wills it! he exclaimed, when the
outlaw had retired; he shall find no foolish
tenderness
hereafter in my heart, working for his salvation!
If we must meetif he will force it upon me, then God
have mercy upon us both, for I will have none! It is
his own seeking. Let him abide it! And yet, would
to God that this necessity may pass me by! Some
other armsome other weapon than mine may do me
justice, and acquit me of this cruel duty!
Long and earnest that night was the prayer of
Clarence
,
that he might be spared from that strife which,
so far, threatened to be inevitable. Yet he made not
this prayer because of any affectionwhich, under the
circumstances, must have been equally misplaced and
unnaturalwhich he bore his kinsman. They had
never loved. The feelings of brotherhood had been
unfelt by either. Their moods had been warring from
the firstit does not need that we should inquire why.
The sweet dependencies of mutual appeal and
confidence
were unknown to, and unexercised by, either;
and, so far as their sympathies were interested, Clarence,
like the other, would have felt no more scruple at
encountering
Edward Conway in battle, than in meeting
any indifferent person who was equally his own and
the foe of his country. But there was something
shocking to the social sense in such a conflict which
prompted the prayers of the youth that it might be
averted; and this prayer, it may be added, was only
made when the excitement which their conference had
induced, was partly over. His prayer was one of
reflection and the mind. His blood took no part in the
entreaty. At moments, when feeling, moved by
memory
,
obtained the ascendencyeven while he strove
in prayerthe boon which he implored was forgotten,
and, rising from his knees, he thought of nothing but
the sharp strife and the vengeance which it promised.
Perhaps, indeed, this mood prevailed even after the
supplication was ended. It mingled in with the
feelings
which followed it, and whenever they became
excited, the revulsion ceased entirely, which a more
deliberate thought of the subject necessarily
occasioned
.
CHAPTER XII.
THINGS IN EMBRYO.
Edward Morton
kept his promise. Before the dawn
of the following day he released his kinsman from his
prison. He had previously sent his followers out of
the wayall save the landlord, Muggswho could
scarcely be counted one of themand some two or
three more upon whom he thought he could rely. He
was not without sufficient motive for this caution.He
had his apprehensions of that unruly and insubordinate
spirit which they had already shown, and which, baffled
of its expected victim, he reasonably believed might
once more display itself in defiance. A strange idea of
honour prompted him at all hazards to set free the
person
,
the destruction of whom would have been to him
a source of the greatest satisfaction. Contradictions of
this sort are not uncommon among minds which have
been subject to conflicting influences. It was not a
principle, but pride, that moved him to this
magnanimity
.
Even Edward Conway, boasting of his
connexion
with the most atrocious ruffians, would have
felt a sense of shame to have acted otherwise.
The noble animal which Clarence rode was restored
to him at his departure. Morton, also mounted,
accompanied
him, in silence, for a mile beyond the secluded
spot which the robbers had chosen for their temporary
refuge. He then spoke at parting.
Colonel Conway, your path is free, and you are
also! Before you lies the road to the Wateree, with
which you are sufficiently acquainted. Here we
separate
.
I have fulfilled my pledges. When next we meet
I shall remind you of yours. Till then, farewell.
He did not wait for an answer, but striking his rowel
fiercely into the flanks of his horse, he gallopped rapidly
back to the place which he had left. The eye of Clarence
followed him with an expression of stern defiance, not
unmingled with sadness, while he replied:
I will not fail thee, be that meeting when it may.
Sad as the necessity is, I will not shrink from it. I, too,
have my wrongs to avenge, Edward Conway. I, too,
acknowledge that instinct of hate from the beginning,
which will make a labour of love of this work of
vengeance
.
I have striven, but fruitlessly, for its
suppression
,now
let it have its way. The hand of fate is in
it. We have never loved each other. We have both
equally doubted, distrusted, dislikedand these instincts
have strengthened with our strength, grown with our
growth, and their fruits are here. Shall I, alone, regret
them? Shall they revolt my feelings only? No! I
have certainly no fearI shall endeavour to free myself
from all compunction! Let the strife come when it may,
be sure I shall be the last to say, `hold offare we not
brethren?' You fling away the ties of blood, do you?
Know from me, Edward Conway, that in flinging away
these ties, you fling from you your only security. They
have often protected you from my anger beforethey
shall protect you no longer.
And slowly, and solemnly, while the youth spoke,
did he wave his open palm toward the path taken by
his brother. But he wasted no more time in soliloquy.
Prudence prompted him, without delay, to avail himself
of the freedom which had been given him. He knew
not what pursuers might be upon his path. He was
not satisfied that his kinsman would still be true,
without
evasion, to the assurances which he had given in a
mood of unwonted magnanimity. He plied his spurs
freely, therefore, and his steed acknowledged the
governing impulse. Another moment found him
pressing
toward the swamp. But he had scarcely
commenced
12*
his progress, when a well-known voice reached
his ears, in a friendly summons to stop; while, on one
hand, emerging from the forest came riding out his
faithful friend and adherent, Jack Bannister.
Ah, true and trusty, Jack. Ever watchful. Ever
mindful of your friendworth a thousand friendsI
might well have looked to see you as nigh to me in
danger as possible. I owe you much, Jackvery much.
It was you, then, as I thought, whose rifle
Worked that chap's buttonhole, was the answer
of the woodman, with a chuckle, as, shaking the long,
ungainly, but unerring instrument, aloft, with one hand,
he grasped with the other the extended hand of his
superior. I couldn't stand to see the fellow handle
you roughly, no how. It made the gall bile up within
me; and though I knowed that 'twould bring the whole
pack out upon me, and was mighty dub'ous that it
would make the matter worse for you; yet I couldn't
work it out no other way. I thought you was gone
for good and all, and that made me sort of desp'rate.
I didn't pretty much know what I was a-doing, and
'tmought be that Polly Longlips (here he patted the rifle
affectionately) went off herself, for I don't think I sighted
her. If I had, Clarence, I don't think the drop would
ha' been on the button of him that tumbled. I'm a
thinking 'twould ha' drawn blood that was a mighty
sight more nigh to your'n, if there was any good reason
that your father had for giving Edward Conway the
name he goes by. I suppose, Clarence, you're pretty
nigh certain now that he's no ra'al, proper kin of your'n,
for you to be keeping him out of harm's way, and
getting
into it yourself on account of him.
And yet, he saved me from those ruffians, Jack.
Dog's meat! Clarence, and what of that? Wa'nt
it him that got you into their gripe; and wouldn't he
been worse than any sarpent that ever carried p'ison
at the root of his tongue, if he hadn't ha' saved you,
after what you'd done for him jest afore? Don't talk
to me of his saving you, Clarencedon't say any thing
more in his favour, or I'll stuff my ears with moss and
pine gum whenever you open your lips to speak. You've
stood by him long enough, and done all that natur'
called for, and more than was nateral. Half the men I
know, if they had ever been saved by any brother, as
you've been saved by him, would ha' sunk a tooth into
his heart that wouldn't ha' worked its way out in one
winter, no how. But you've done with him now, I
reckon; and if you aint, I'm done with you. There'll
be no use for us to travel together, if you aint ready to
use your knife agen Edward Conway the same as agen
any other tory.
Be satisfied, Jack. I'm sworn to itnay, pledged
to him by oathwhen we next meet to make our battle
final. It was on this condition that he set me free.
Well, he's not so mean a skunk after all, if he's
ready to fight it out. I didn't think he was bold enough
for that. But it's all the better. I only hope that when
the time comes, I'll be the one to see fair play. I'll
stand beside you, and if he flattens you,which, God
knows, I don't think its in one of his inches to do
why, he'll only have to flatten another. It's cl'ar to
you now, Clarence, that you knows all about him.
Yes! He is the leader of the Black Riders. He
declared it with his own lips.
When he could'nt help it no longer. Why,
Clarence
,
he 'twas that sent them fellows a'ter you that tuk
you. I didn't see it, but I knows it jest the same as if
I did. But, though you know that he's a tory and a
Black Rider, there's a thousand villanies he's been
doing ever since we played together that you know
nothing about; and I'm 'minded of one in preticular
that happened when you was at college in England, by
the coming of old Jacob Clarkson!You 'member Jake
Clarkson that planted a short mile from your father's
place, don't you?he had a small patch of farm, and
did boating along the river, like myself.
Yes, very wellI remember him.
Well, him I mean. Old Jake had a daughterI
reckon you don't much remember her, Mary Clarkson
as spry and sweet a gal as ever man set eyes on.
I had a liking for the galI own it, Clarenceand if
so be things hadn't turned out as they did, well, I mought
ha' married her. But it's a God's blessing I didn't; for
you see Edward Conway got the better of her, and
'fore Jake know'd any thing about it, poor Mary was
a-carrying a bundle she had no law to carry. When
they pushed the gal about it, she confessed 'twas
Edward
Conway's doings; and she told a long gal's story
how Edward had promised to marry her, and swore it
on Holy Book, and all that sort of thing, which was
pretty much out of reason and nature,not for him to
speak it, but for her to be such a child as to believe it.
But no matter. The stir was mighty great about it.
Old Jake carried a rifle more than three months for
Edward Conway, and he took that time to make his
first trip to Florida, where, I'm thinking, bad as he was
before, he larn'd to be a great deal worse. It was there
that he picked up all his tory notions from having too
much dealing with John Stuart, the Indian agent, who,
you know, is just as bad an inimy of our liberties as
ever come out of the old country. Well, but the worst
is yet to come. Poor Mary couldn't stand the desartion
of Edward Conway and the discovery. Besides, old
Jake was too rough for the poor child, who, you know,
Clarence, was a'most to be pitied; for it's mighty few
women in this world that can say no when they're axed
for favours by a man they have a liking for. Old Jake
was mighty cross; and Molly, his wife, who, by nature,
was a she-tiger, she made her tongue wag night and
day about the sad doing of the poor gal, 'till her heart
was worn down in her bosom, and she didn't dare to
look up, and trembled whenever any body came nigh
to her, and got so wretched and scary at last, that she
went off one night, nobody knows where, and left no
tracks. Well, there was another stir. We were all
turned out on the sarch, and it was my misfortune,
Clarence, to be the first to find out what had become
of her. Dickens! it makes my eyes water to this day!
And where did you find her, Jack?
Didn't find her, Clarence; but found out the
miserable
end she made of herself. We found her bonnet
and shawl on the banks of the river, but the body we
didn't find. The rocks at the bottom of the Congaree
know all about it, I reckon.
I have now a faint recollection of this story,
Bannister
.
I must have heard it while in England, or soon
after my return.
'Twas a bad business, Clarence; and I didn't feel
the smallest part of it. I didn't know till I come across
the gal's bonnet how great a liking I had for her. I
reckon I cried like a baby over it. From that day I
mistrusted Edward Conway worse than p'ison. There
was a-many things long before that, that made me
suspicion
him; but after that, Clarence, I always felt, when
I was near him, as if I saw a great snake, a viper, or a
mockasin, and looked all round for a chunk to mash its
head with.
And what of her old father, Jack?
Why, he's come up to join your troop. I was so
full of thinking 'bout other matters yesterday, when I
saw you, that I quite forgot to tell you. He's been
fighting below with Marion's men, but he wanted to
look at the old range, and so he broke off to go under
Sumter;but the true story is, I'm thinking, that he's
hearn how Edward Conway is up here somewhere,
a-fighting, and he comes to empty that rifle at his head.
He'll say his prayers over the bullet he uses at him,
and I reckon will make a chop in it, so that he may
know, when his inimy is tumbled, if the shot that does
the business was the one that had a commission for it.
And Clarkson is now with us? In the swamp?
I left him at the `Big Crossings.' But, Clarence,
don't you say nothing to him about this business. It's
a sore truth for him still, though the matter is so long
gone by. But every thing helps to keep it alive in his
heart. His old woman's gone to her long home; and
though she had a rough tongue and a long one, yet he
was used to her; and when he lost little Mary, and
then her, and the tories burnt his house, it sort-a cut
him up, root and branch, and made him fretful and
vexatious. But he'll fight, Clarence, like old Blazes
there's no mistake in him.
I will be careful, Jack; but a truce to this. We
have but little time for old histories, and such
melancholy
ones as these may well be forgotten. We have
enough before us, sufficiently sad to demand all our
attention and awaken our griefs. To business now,
Jack. We have idled long enough.
Ready, Colonel. Say the word.
Take the back track, and see after these Black
Riders. We are fairly pledged now to encounter them
to beat themto make the cross in blood on the
breast of the very best of them.
Edward Conway at the head of them!
Edward Conway no longer, John Bannister. He
himself disclaims the name with scorn. Let him have
the name, with the doom which is due to the chief of
the banditti which he leads. That name has saved him
too long already. I rejoice that he now disclaims it,
with all its securities. After him, John Bannister. If
you have skill as a scout, use it now. After what has
passed between us, he will be on my heels very shortly.
He may be even now, with all his band. I must be
prepared for him, and must distrust him. It is therefore
of vast importance that all his movements should be
known. To your discretion I leave it. Away. Find
me in the swamp to-morrow at the Little Crossings.
We must leave it for the Congaree in three days more.
Away. Let your horse find his heels.
A brief grasp of the hand, and a kind word, terminated
the interview between the youthful partisan and his
trusty follower. The latter dashed abruptly into the
woods bordering the swamp, while the former, taking
an upper route, pursued the windings of the river, till
he reached the point he aimed at. We will not follow
the course of either for the present, but return to the
house of Muggs and the proceedings of the outlawed
captain.
There, every thing had the appearance of a rapid
movement. The troopers, covered by a thick wood,
were preparing to ride. Horses, ready caparisoned, were
fastened beneath the trees, while their riders, singly or
in groups, were seeking in various ways to while away
the brief interval of time accorded them in the delay of
their chief officer. He, meanwhile, in the wigwam of
Muggs, seemed oppressed by deliberations which baffled
for the time his habitual activity. He sat upon the same
bulk which he had occupied while a prisoner the night
before, and seemed willing to surrender himself to that
fit of abstraction which the landlord, though he watched
it with manifest uneasiness, did not seem bold enough to
interrupt. At length the door of the apartment opened,
and the presence of a third person put an end to the
meditations of the one and the forbearance of the other
party. The intruder was a youth, apparently not more
than seventeen years of age. Such would have been the
impression on any mind, occasioned by his timid bearing
and slender figure; indeed, he would have been called
undersized for seventeen. But there was that in his pale,
well defined features, which spoke for a greater maturity
of thought, if not of time, than belongs to that early
period in life. The lines of his cheeks and mouth were
full of intelligencethat intelligence which results from
early anxieties and the pressure of serious necessities.
The frank, free, heedless indifference of the future, which
shines out in the countenance of boyhood, seemed utterly
obliterated from his face. The brow was already touched
with wrinkles, and seemed strangely at variance with the
short, closely cropped black hair, the ends of which were
apparent beneath the slouched cap of fur he wore. The
features pensive, rather pretty, but awfully pale. Though
they expressed great intelligence and the presence of an
active thought, yet this did not seem to have produced
its usual result in conferring confidence. The look of
the youth was downcast, and when his large dark eyes
ventured to meet those of the speaker, they seemed to
cower and to shrink within themselves; and this desire
appeared to give them an unsteady, dancing motion,
which became painful to the beholder, as it seemed to
indicate apprehension, if not fright, in the proprietor.
His voice faltered too when he spoke, and was only
made intelligible by his evident effort at deliberateness.
Like that of the rest of the troop, the costume of the
youth was black. A belt of black leather encircled his
waist, in which pistols and a knife were ostentatiously
stuck. Yet how should one so timid be expected to use
them. Trembling in the presence of a friend, what
firmness
could he possess in the encounter with a foe?
Where was the nerve, the strength, for the deadly issues
of battle? It seemed, indeed, a mockery of fate, to send
forth so feeble a frame and so fearful a spirit, while the
thunder and the threatening storm were in the sky. But
no such scruples seemed to afflict the chief; nor did he
seem to recognize the timidity of the boy's approach.
Perhaps he ascribed it to the natural effect of his own
stern manner, which was rather increased than softened
as he listened to the assurance which the boy made that
all was ready for a movement.
You have lingered, sir.
Barton and the ensign were not with the rest, sir,
and I had to look for them!
So!plotting again, were they? But they shall
find their match yet! Fools! Blind and deaf fools,
that will not content themselves with being knaves to
their own profit, and press on till they become knaves
to their utter ruin. But go, boysee that your own
horse is ready; and hark ye, do not be following too
closely at my heels. I have told you repeatedly, keep
the rear when we are advancing, the front only when we
are retreating. Remember.
The boy bowed humbly and left the room.
And now, Muggs, you are bursting to speak. I
know why, wherefore, and on what subject. Now, do
you know that I have but to reveal to the troop the
suggestion
you made to me last night, to have them tear you
and your house to pieces. Do you forget that desertion
is death, according to your own pledges?
I am no longer one of the troop, replied the
landlord
hastily.
Ay, that may be in one sense, but is scarcely so in
any other. You are only so far released from your oath
that no one expects you to do active duty. But, let them
hear you speak, even of yourself, as last night you spoke
to me of my policy, and they will soon convince you
that they hold you as fairly bound to them now as you
were when all your limbs were perfect. They will only
release you by tearing what remains asunder.
Well, but cappin, suppose they would, as you say.
There's no reason why they should know the advice I
give to you; and there's no reason why you shouldn't
take that advice. We're besot, as I said before, with
dangers. There's Greene with his army, a-gaining ground
every day. There's Sumter, and Marion, and Pickens,
and Mayhew, and
`Psha! Muggs, what a dd catalogue is this; and
what matters it all. Be it as you say, do I not know?
Did I not know at the beginning, of all these dangers.
They do not terrify me now any more than then! These
armies that you speak of are mere skeletons.
They give mighty sound knocks for skeletons.
There's that affair at Hobkirk's
Well, did not Rawdon keep the field?
Not over long, captain, and now
Look you, Muggs, one word for all. I am sworn to
the troop. I will keep my oath. They shall find no
faltering in me. Living or dead, I stand by them to the
last; and I give you these few words of counsel, if you
would be safe. I will keep secret what you have said to
me, for I believe, you meant all kindly; but let me hear
no more of the same sort of counsel. Another word to
the same effect, and I deliver you over to the tender
mercies
of those with whom the shortest prayer is a span too
long for an offender whose rope is ready and whose tree
is near.
These words were ended as the boy reappeared at the
door and informed the chief that the troop was in motion.
The latter rose and prepared to follow. He shook hands
with the landlord at parting, contenting himself with
saying the single word, remember!in a tone of
sufficient warningin reply to the other's farewell. In
VOL. I. 13
this, Edward Morton displayed another sample of the
practised hypocrisy of his character. His first mental
soliloquy after leaving the landlord, was framed in such
language as the following:
I like your counsel, Master Muggs, but shall be no
such fool as to put myself in your power by showing
you that I like it. I were indeed a sodden ass, just
at this moment, when half of my troop suspect me of
treachery, to suffer you to hear from my own lips that
I actually looked with favour upon your counsel. Yet the
old fool reasons rightly. This is no region for me now.
It will not be much longer. The British power is
passing
away rapidly. Rawdon will not sustain himself
much longer. Cornwallis felt that, and hence his
pretended
invasion of Virginia. Invasion, indeed!a cover
only to conceal his own flight. But what care I for him
or them? My own fame is of sufficient importance, and
that is well nigh up. I deceived myself when I fancied
that the rebels could not sustain themselves through the
campaign, and if I wait to see the hunt up, I shall have
a plentiful harvest from my own folly. No! no! I must
get out of the scrape as well as I can, and with all
possible
speed. But no landlords for confidants. A wise
man needs none of any kind. They are for your weak,
dependent, adhesive people; folks who believe in
friendships
and loves, and that sort of thing. Loves!Have
I then noneno love!Ay, there are a thousand in that
one. If I can win her, whether by fair word or fearless
deed, well!It will not then be hard to break from these
scoundrels. But here they are! Such was the train
of Edward Morton's thoughts as he left the landlord.
Followed by the boy of whom we have already spoken,
he cantered forth to the wood where the troop had
formed, aud surveyed them with a keen, searching,
soldierly
eye.
Morton was not without military ambition, and
certainly
possessed, like his brother, a considerable share of
military talent. His glance expressed pleasure at the
trim, excellent dress and aspect of his troop. Beyond
this, and those common purposes of selfishness which
had prompted the evil deeds as well of men as leader, he
had no sympathies with them. Even as he looked and
smiled upon their array, the thought rapidly passed
through his mind
Could I run their heads into the swamp now, and
withdraw my own, it were no bad finish to a doubtful
game. It must be tried; but I must use them something
farther. They can do good service yet, and no man
should throw away his tools till his work is ended.
Brief time was given to the examination. Then
followed
the instructions to his subordinates, which were
uttered in private, and to each singly. Morton made his
arrangements with some reference to the rumours of
disaffection
among his men which had reached his ears.
He took care to separate the suspected officers, in such a
way as to deprive them, for the present, of all chance of
communion;then, taking the advance, he led them
forward, and was soon found pursuing the track lately
taken by Clarence Conway.
CHAPTER XIII.
NEW PRINICIPLES DISCUSSED BY OLD LAWS.
The
last words of the Chief of the Black Riders, as he
left the presence of the landlord, had put that worthy into
a most unenviable frame of mind. He had counselled
Morton for his own benefithe himself had no selfish
considerations. He flattered himself that the relation in
which he stood to the parties between which the country
was divided, not to speak of his mutilated condition,
would secure him from danger, no matter which of them
should finally obtain the ascendency. That he should
be still held responsible to his late comrades, though he
no longer engaged in their pursuits and no longer shared
their spoils, was a medium equally new and disquieting in
which he was required to regard the subject. The stern
threat with which Morton concluded left him in little
doubt of the uncertain tenure of that security which he
calculated to find among his old friends; and, at the same
time, awakened in his heart new feelings in reference to
the speaker. Hitherto, from old affinities, and because of
some one of those nameless moral attachments which
incline us favourably to individuals to whom we
otherwise
owe nothing, he had been as well disposed towards
Edward Morton as he could have been towards any
individual
not absolutely bound to him by blood or interest.
He had seen enough to like in him, to make him
solicitous
of his successes, and to lead him, in repeated
instances, as in that which incurred the late rebuke, to
volunteer his suggestions, and to take some pains in
acquiring information which sometimes proved of
essential
benefit to the outlaw. It was partly in consequence
of this interest that he acquired that knowledge of the
private concerns of Morton, which prompted the latter,
naturally enough, to confer with him, with tolerable
freedom
,
on a number of topics, strictly personal to himself,
and of which the troop knew nothing. Conscious of no
other motive than the good of the outlaw, and not
dreaming
of that profounder cunning of the latter, which could
resolve him to adopt the counsel which he yet seemed to
spurn with loathing, the landlord, reasonably enough,
felt indignant at the language with which he had been
addressed; and his indignation was not lessened by the
disquieting doubts of his own safety which the threats of
Morton had suggested. It was just at the moment when
his conclusions were most unfavourable to the outlaw,
that the door of his wigwam was quietly thrown open,
and he beheld, with some surprise, the unexpected face
of our worthy scout, Jack Bannister, peering in upon
him. The latter needed no invitation to enter.
Well, Isaac Muggs, said he, as he closed and bolted
the door behind himyou're without your company
at last. I was a'most afear'd, for your sake in pretic'lar,
that them bloody sculpers was a-going to take up lodging
with you for good and all. I waited a pretty smart
chance to see you cl'ar of them, and I only wish I was
sartin, Muggs, that you was as glad as myself when they
concluded to make a start of it.
Ahem!To be sure I was, friend Supple, replied
the other with an extra show of satisfaction in his
countenance
which did not altogether conceal the evident
hesitation of his first utterance.To be sure, I was:
they'd ha' drunk me out of house and home if they had
stopped much longer. A peck of lemons, a'mostmore
than two papers of sugar, best Havana, and there's no
measuring the Jamaica, wasted upon them long swallows.
I a'nt glad of their going, Jack, I have a most
onnateral
way of thinking on such matters.
The keen eyes of Supple Jack never once turned from
the countenance of the landlord, as he detailed the
consumption
of his guests; and when the latter had finished,
he coolly replied:
13*
I'm afear'd, Isaac Muggs, you aint showing clean
hands under the table. That's a sort of talking that don't
stop my eyes, if it stops my ears. Don't I know it
would be mighty onnateral if you wa'n't glad enough to
sell your pecks of lemons and your papers of sugar, and
your gallons of rum, pretic'larly when in place of them
you can count me twenty times their valley in British
gould? No, Muggs, that sort o' talking won't do for me.
Take the cross out of your tongue and be pretic'lar in
what you say, for I'm going to s'arch you mighty close
this time, I tell you.
Well but, Supple, you wouldn't have me take nothing
from them that drinks my substance.
Who talks any such foolishness but yourself, Muggs?
I don't. I'm for your taking all you can get out of the
inimyfor it's two ways of distressing them to sell 'em
strong drink and take their gould for it. The man that
drinks punch is always the worse for it; and it don't
better his business to make him pay for it in guineas.
That's not my meaning, Muggs. I'm on another track,
and I'll show you both eends of it before I'm done.
Why, Supple, you talks and looks at me
suspiciously
,
said the landlord, unable to withstand the keen
inquiring glances of the scout, and was as little able to
conceal his apprehensions lest some serious discovery
had been made to his detriment.
Look you, Isaac Muggs, do you see that peep-hole
there in the walloh, therejest one side of the
window
the
peep-hole in the logs.
Yes, I see it, said the landlord, whose busy fingers
were already engaged in thrusting a wadding of dry moss
into the discovered aperture.
Well, it's too late to poke at it now, Muggs, said
the other. The harm's done already, and I'll let you
know the worst of it. Through that peep-hole last night
I saw what was a going on here among youand through
that peep-hole, it was this same Polly Longlips
tapping his rifle as he spokethat went off of her own
liking, and tumbled one big fellow; and was mighty
vexatious now when she found herself onable to tumble
another.
Yes, yesPolly Longlips was always a famous
shot; murmured the landlord flatteringly, and moving
to take, in his remaining hand, the object of his eulogium.
But Supple Jack evidently recoiled at so doubtful a
liberty in such dangerous times, and drew the instrument
more completely within the control of his own arm.
She's a good critter, Muggs, but is sort o' bashful
among strangers; and when she puts up her mouth, it
isn't to be kissed or kiss, I tell you. She's not like other
gals in that pretic'lar. Now, don't think I mistrust you,
Muggs, for 'twould be mighty timorsome was I to be
afeard of any thing you could do with a rifle like her,
having but one arm to go upon. It's only a jealous way
I have, that makes me like to keep my Polly out of the
arms of any other man. It's nateral enough, you know,
to a person that loves his gal.
Oh, yes, very natural, Supple; but somehow, it
seems to me as if you did suspicion me, Suppleit
does, I declar'.
To be sure I do, replied the other promptly. I
suspicions you've been making a little bit of a fool of
yourself; and I've come to show you which eend of the
road will bring you up. You know, Muggs, that I
know all about youfrom A to izzard. I can read you
like a book. I reckon you'll allow that I have larn'd
that
lesson, if I never larn'd any other.
Well, Supple, I reckon I may say you know me
pretty much as well as any other person.
Better, better, Muggs!I know you from the jump,
and I know what more of our boys know, that you did
once ride with these Black
Yes, Supple, but and the landlord jumped up
and looked out of the door, and peered, with all his eyes,
as far as possible into the surrounding wood. The scout,
meanwhile, with imperturbable composure, retained the
seat which he had originally taken.
Don't you be scarey, said he, when the other had
returned, I've sarcumvented your whole establishment,
looked in at both of your blocks, and all of your
cypress
hollows, not to speak of a small ride I took after
your friends
No friends of mine, Supple, no more than any other
people that pay for what they git, exclaimed the
apprehensive
landlord.
That's the very p'int I'm driving at, Muggs. You
know well enough that if our boys had a guess that you
ever rode with that 'ere troop, it wouldn't be your stump
of an arm that 'd save you from the swinging limb.
But I never did hide that I fout on the British side,
Supple! said the other.
In the West Indies, Isaac Muggs. That's the story
you told about your hurts, and all that. If you was to
tell them, or if I was to tell them, any other now, that
had the least smell of the truth in it, your shop would be
shut up for ever in this life, andwho knows?maybe
never opened in the next. Well, now, I'm come here
this blessed day to convart you to rebellion. Through
that very peep-hole, last night, I heard you with my own
ears talking jest as free as the rankest tory in all the
Wateree country.
Oh, Lord, Supple, wa'nt that natural enough, when
the house were full of tories?
'Twa'nt nateral to an honest man at any time,
replied the other indignantly; and let me tell you,
Muggs, the house wa'nt fullonly Ned Conway was
here, with his slippery tongue that's a wheedling you,
like a blasted blind booby, Muggs, to your own
destruction
.
That same fellow will put your neck in the noose
yet, and laugh when you're going up.
A prediction so confidently spoken, and which tallied
so admirably with the savage threat uttered by the
outlaw
at his late departure, drove the blood from the cheeks
of the landlord, and made him heedless of the harsh
language
in which the scout had expressed himself. His
apology was thus expressed:
But 'twas pretty much the same thing, Supplehe
was their captain, you know.
Captain! And what does he care about them, and
what do they care about him, if they can get their eends
sarved without each other? It wouldn't be a toss of a
copper, the love that's atween them. He'll let them
hang, and they'll hang him, as soon as it's worth while
for either to do so. Don't I know, Muggs? Don't I
know that they're conniving strong agin him even now,
and don't I calculate that as soon as the Congaree
country
gits too hot to hold Rawdon, this Ned Conway will
be the first to kill a colt to 'scape a halter. He'll ride a
horse to death to get to Charlestown, and when there,
he'll sink a ship to git to the West Indies. He knows
his game, and he'll so work it, Isaac Muggs, as to leave
your neck in the collar without waiting to hear the
crack.
You're clean mistaken, Supple, for 'twas only this
morning that I cautioned the captain 'bout his men, and
I gin him my counsel to take the back track and find his
way to the seaboard; but he swore he'd never desart the
troop, and he spoke mighty cross to me about it, and
even threatened, if I talked of it another time to him, to
set the troopers on me.
More knave he, and more fool you for your pains,
said the other irreverently; but this only makes me
the more sartin that he means to finish a bad game by
throwing up his hand. He's made his Jack, and he
don't stop to count,but look you, Isaac Muggs, all this
tells agin you. Here you're so thick, hand and glove,
with the chief of the Black Riders, that you're advising
him what to do; and by your own words, he makes
out that you're still liable to the laws of the troop. Eh?
But that's only what he said, Supple, and its what
was a-worrying me when you come in.
Look you, Muggs, it ought to worry you! I'm
mighty serious in this business. I'm going to be mighty
strick with you. I was the one that spoke for you among
our boys, and 'twas only because I showed them that I
had sort o' convarted you from your evil ways, that they
agreed to let you stay here in quiet on the Wateree.
Well, I thought I had convarted you. You remember
that long summer day last August, when Polly Longlips
gin a bowel-complaint to Macleod, the Scotch officer.
You was with him in the boat, and helped to put him
across the Wateree. Well, when we was a-burying
himfor he died like a gentleman bredI had a gift to
ax you sartin questions, and we had a long argyment
about our liberties, and George the Third, and what
business Parlyment had to block up Boston port, and
put stamps on our tea before they let us drink it. Do
you remember all them matters and specifications, Isaac
Muggs?
Well, Supple, I can't but say I do. We did have
quite a long argyment when the lieutenant was a dying,
and jest after the burial.
No, 'twas all the while we was a-laying in the
trench, for I recollect saying to you when you was a
pitying him all the time, that I was sorry for the poor
man's death, I wasn't sorry that I killed him, and I would
shoot the very next one that come along, jest the same,
for it made the gall bile up in me to see a man that I
had never said a hard word to in all my life, come here,
over the water, a matter, maybe, of a thousand miles, to
force me, at the p'int of the bagnet, to drink stamped
tea. I never did drink the tea, no how. For my own
drinking, I wouldn't give one cup of coffee, well biled,
for all the tea that was ever growed or planted. But,
'twas the freedom of the thing that I was argying for,
and 'twas on the same argyment that I was willing to
fight. Now, that was the time, and them was the
specifications
which made us argyfy, and it was only then,
when I thought I had convarted you from your evil
ways, that I tuk on me to answer for your good conduct
to our boys. I spoke to the colonel for you, jest the
same as if I had know'd you for a hundred years. It's
true I did know you, and the mother that bore you, and
a mighty good sort of woman she was; but it was only
after that argyment that I felt a call to speak in your
behalf
.
Now, Isaac Muggs, I aint conscience-free about
that business. I've had my suspicions a long time that
I spoke a little too much in your favour, and what I heard
last nightand what I seedmakes me fearful that
you've been a sort o' snake in the grass. I doubt your
convarsion, Isaac Muggs; but before I tell you my
mind about the business, I'd jest like to hear from your
own lips what you think about our argyment, and what
you remember, and what you believe.
The landlord looked utterly bewildered. It was
evident
that he had never devoted much time to
metaphysics
,
and the confusion and disorder of the few words
which he employed in answer, and the utter consternation
of his looks, amply assured the inflexible scout that the
labour of conversion must be entirely gone over again.
I see, Isaac Muggs, that you're in a mighty bad fix,
and it's a question with me whether I ought raly to give
you a helping hand to git out of it. If I thought you
wanted to git at the truth
Well, Supple, as God's my judge, I sartinly do.
I'd go over the argyment agin for your sake, but
I'd thank you mightily, Supple.
But 'twon't do to go on forgetting, Muggs. The
thing is to be understood, and if it's once understood, it's
to be believed; and when you say you believe, there's
no dodging after that. There's no saying you're a tory
with tories, and a whig with whigs, jest as it seems
needful
.
The time's come for every tub to stand on its own
bottom, and them that don't must have a tumble. Now,
there's no axing you to fight for us, Muggsthat's out of
natur', and I'm thinking we have more men now than
we can feed; but we want the truth in your soul, and
we want you to stick to it. If you're ready for that,
and really willing, I'll put it to you in plain argyments
that you can't miss, onless you want to miss 'em; and
you'll never dodge from 'em, if you have only half a
good-sized man's soul in you to go upon. You've only
to say now, whether you'd like to know
The landlord cut short the speaker by declaring his
anxiety to be re-enlightened, and Supple Jack rose to
his task with all the calm deliberation of a practised
lecturer. Coiling up a huge quid of tobacco in one jaw,
to prevent its interfering with the argument, he went to
the door.
I'll jest go out for a bit and hitch `Mossfoot,'the
name conferred upon his pony, as every good hunter
has a tender diminutive for the horse he rides and the
gun he shootsI'll only go and hitch `Mossfoot'
deeper in the swamp, and out of harm's way for a spell,
and then be back. It's a three minutes' business only.
He was not long gone, but during that time rapid
transitions of thought and purpose were passing through
the mind of the veteran landlord. Circumstances had
already prepared him to recognize the force of many of
the scout's arguments. The very counsel he had given
to Edward Morton originated in a conviction that the
British cause was going downthat the whigs were
gaining ground upon the tories with every day's
movement
,
and that it would be impossible for the latter much
longer to maintain themselves. The policy of the
publican
usually goes with that of the rising party. He is
not generally a bad political thermometer, and Muggs
was a really good one. Besides, he had been stung by
the contemptuous rejection of his counsel by the chief
whom he was conscious of having served unselfishly,
and alarmed by the threats which had followed his
uncalled-for
counsel. The necessity of confirming his
friends among the successful rebels grew singularly
obvious
to his intellect, if it had not been so before, in the
brief absence of the scout; and when he returned, the
rapidly quickening intelligence of the worthy landlord
made the eyes of the former brighten with the
satisfaction
which a teacher must naturally feel at the wonderful
progress and ready recognition of his doctrines. These
it will not be necessary for us entirely, or even in part,
to follow. The worthy woodman has already given us
a sufficient sample of the sort of philosophy in which he
dealt; and farther argument on the tyranny of forcing
stamped tea down the people's throats, will they,
will they, may surely be dispensed with. But,
flattering
as his success appeared to be at first, Supple Jack
was soon annoyed by some doubts and difficulties which
his convert suggested in the progress of the argument.
Like too many of his neighbours, Isaac Muggs was
largely endowed with the combative quality of
self-esteem
.
This, as the discussion advanced, was
goaded
into exercise; and his fears and his policy were
equally forgotten in the desire of present triumph. A
specimen of the manner in which their deliberations
warmed into controversy may be passingly afforded.
It's agin natur' and reason, and a man's own seven
senses, said Supple Jack, to reckon on any man's
right to make laws for another, when he don't live in the
same country with him. I say, King George, living in
England, never had a right to make John Bannister,
living on the Congaree, pay him taxes for tea or any
thing.
But it's all the same country, England and America,
Jack Bannister.
Jimini!if that's the how, what makes you give
'em different names, I want to know?
Oh, that was only because it happened so, said the
landlord, doubtfully.
Well, it so happens that I won't pay George the
Third any more taxes. That's the word for all; and
it's good reason why I shouldn't pay him, when, for all
his trying, he can't make me. Here he's sent his
regiments
regiment
after regimentand the Queen sent her
regiment, and the Prince of Wales his regimentI
reckon we didn't tear the Prince's regiment all to
flinders
at Hanging Rock!Well, then, there was the
Royal Scotch and the Royal Irish, and the Dutch
Hessians
;
I suppose they didn't call them royal, 'cause they
couldn't ax in English for what they wanted:well,
what was the good of it?all these regiments together
couldn't make poor Jack Bannister, a Congaree boatmen,
drink stamped tea or pay taxes. The regiments, all I've
named and a hundred more, are gone like last autumn's
dry leaves; and the only fighting that's a-going on now,
worth to speak of, is American born `gainst American
born. Wateree facing WatereeCongaree facing
Congaree
Santee
facing Santeeand cutting each other's
throats to fill the pockets of one of the ugliest old men
for a white manthat ever I looked on. It spiles the
VOL. I. 14
face of a guinea where they put his face. Look you,
Isaac Muggs, I would ha' gathered you, as Holy Book
has it, even as a hen gathers up her chickens. I'd ha'
taken you 'twixt my legs in time of danger, and seed
you safe throughbut you wouldn't! I've tried to
drive reason into your head, but it's no use; you can't
see what's right, and where to look for it. You answer
every thing I say with your eyes sot, and a
cross-buttock
.
Now, what's to be done? I'm waiting on you
to answer.
Swounds, Supple, but you're grown a mighty hasty
man o' late, replied the landlord, beginning to be
sensible
of the imprudence of indulging his vanity at a
moment
so perilous to his fortunes. I'm sure I've tried
my best to see the right and the reason. I've hearn what
you had to say
Only to git some dd crooked answer ready, that
had jist as much to do with the matter as my great
grand-daughter has. You hearn me, but it wa'n't to see
if the truth was in me; it was only to see if you couldn't
say something after me that would swallow up my
saying
.
I don't see how you're ever to get wisdom, with
such an onderstanding, unless it's licked into you by
main force of tooth and timber.
I could ha' fou't you once, John Bannister, though
you are named Supple Jack, replied the landlord with
an air of indignant reproach, which, in his own
self-absorption
,
escaped the notice of the scout.
It's no bad notion
that
, he continued, without
heeding
the language of the landlord. Many's the time, boy
and man, I have fou't with a fellow when we couldn't
find out the right of it, any way; and, as sure as a gun,
if I wan't right I was sartain to be licked. Besides,
Isaac Muggs, it usen to be an old law, when they couldn't
get at the truth any other way, to make a battle, and
cry on God's mercy to help the cause that was right.
By Jimini, I don't see no other way for us. I've given
you all the reason I know on this subjectall that
I can onderstand, I meanfor to confess a truth, there's
a-many reasons for our liberties that I hear spoken, and
I not able to make out the sense of one of them. But
all that I know I've told you, and there's more than
enough to make me sartin of the side I take. Now, as
you aint satisfied with any of my reasons, I don't see
how we're to finish the business unless we go back to
the old-time law, and strip to the buff for a fight. You
used to brag of yourself, and you know what I am, so
there's no use to ax about size and weight. If you
speak agreeable to your conscience, and want nothing
better than the truth, then, I don't see but a regular fight
will give it to us; for, as I told you afore, I never yet
did fight on the wrong side, that I didn't come up
undermost
.
The scout, in the earnestness with which he
entertained
and expressed his own views and wishes, did not
suffer himself to perceive some of the obstacles which
lay in the way of a transaction such as he so deliberately
and seriously proposed. He was equally inaccessible to
the several attempts of his companion to lessen his
regards
for a project to which the deficiency of a limb on the
part of one of the disputants seemed to suggest a most
conclusive objection. When, at length, he came to a
pause, the landlord repeated his former reproachful
reminiscence
of a period when the challenge of the scout
would not have gone unanswered by defiance. But
now! and he lifted the stump of his remaining arm, in
melancholy answer.
It's well for you to talk big, John Bannister; I know
you're a strong man, and a spry. You wa'n't called
Supple Jack for nothing. But there was a time when
Isaac Muggs wouldn't ha' stopped to measure inches
with you in a fair up and down, hip and hip, hug
together
.
I could ha' thrown you once, I'm certain. But
what's the chance now with my one arm, in a hug with
a man that's got two. It's true, and I believe it, that
God gives strength in a good cause; but it's quite
onreasonable
for me to hope for any help, seeing as how I
can't help myself, no how. I couldn't even come to the
grip, however much I wanted to.
Sure enough, Muggs, and I didn't think of that, at
all. It was so natural to think that a man that let his
tongue wag so free as your'n had two arms at least to
back it. I'm mighty sorry, Muggs, that you aint, for it's
a great disapp'intment.
This was spoken with all the chagrin of a man who
was discomfited in his very last hope of triumph.
Well, you see I aint, said the other sulkilyso
there's no more to be said about it.
Yes; but you aint come to a right mind yet. It's
cl'ar to me, Isaac Muggs, that one thing or t'other must
be done. You must cut loose from the Black Riders, or
cut loose from us. You knows the risk of the one, and
I can pretty much tell you what's the risk of the other.
Now, there's a notion hits me, and it's one that comes
nateral enough to a man that's fou't, in his time, in a
hundred different ways. One of them ways, when I had
to deal with a fellow that was so cl'ar behind me in
strength that he couldn't match me as we stood, was to
tie a hand behind my back, or a leg to a pine sapling,
and make myself, as it were, a lame man till the fight
was over. Now, look you, Muggs, if it's the truth your
really after, I don't care much if I try that old-fashion
way with you. I'm willing to buckle my right arm to
my back.
Swounds, Supple, how you talk. Come, take a
drink.
I'll drink when the time comes, Isaac Muggs, and
when it's needful, but just now, when it's the truth I'm
after, I don't suffer no diversions. I stick as close to it,
I tell you, as I does to my inimy;I don't stop to drink
or rest, 'till it's a-lying fair before me. Now, it's needful
for your sake, Muggs, that you come to a right sense of
the reason in this business. It's needful that you give
up Black Riders, Tories, British, Ned Conway, ugly
faces, and the old sarpent. My conscience is mightily
troubled because I stood for you, and it's needful that you
come to a right understanding afore I leave you. I've
sworn it, Isaac Muggs, by Polly Longlips, as we rode
along together, and Mossfoot pricked up his ears as if he
onderstood it all, and was a witness for us both. Now,
you know what an oath by Polly Longlips means, Isaac.
It means death to the inimysartin death, at any
reasonable
distance. I don't want your life, man;by the
Hokey, I don't, and that's why I want to put the reason
in you, so that you might say to me at once, that you're
done with these black varmintsfor ever. They can
do you no goodthey can't help you much longer; and
the time's a-coming, Isaac Muggs, when the Whigs will
sweep this country, along the Wateree, and the Congaree,
and Santee, with a broom of fire, and wo to the skunk,
when that time comes, that can't get clear of the brush
wo to the 'coon that's caught sticking in his hollow.
There's no reason you shouldn't onderstand the
liberty-cause
,
and there's every reason why you should. But
as you can't onderstand my argyment
Well, but Supple, you're always in such a hurry!
No hurrynever hurried a man in argyment in all
my life; but when he's so tarnal slow to onderstand
That's it, Supple, I'm a slow man;but I begin to
see the sense of what you say.
Well, that's something like, Muggs, but a good gripe
about the ribs, a small tug upon the hips, partic'larly if
we ax the blessing of Providence upon the argyment,
will be about as good a way as any to help your
onderstanding
to a quicker motion. It'll put your slow pace
into a smart canter.
Psha, Supple, you're not serious in thinking that
there's any thing in that?
Aint I then! By Gum, you don't know me, Isaac
Muggs, if you think as you say. Now, what's to hinder
the truth from coming out in a fair tug between us.
Here we stand, both tall men, most like in height and
breadth, nigh alike in strength by most people's count;
about the same age and pretty much the same
experience
.
We've had our tugs and tears, both of us, in
every way; though, to be sure, you got the worst of it,
so far as we count the arm;but as I tie up mine, there's
no difference. Now I say, here we stand on the banks
of the Wateree. Nobody sees us but the great God of
all, that sees every thing in natur'. He's here, the
14*
Bible sayshe's here, and there, and every where, and
he sees every thing every where. You believe all that,
don't you, Isaac Muggs, for if you don't believe that,
why, there's no use in talking at all. There's an eend
of the question.
The landlord, though looking no little mystified,
muttered
assent, and this strange teacher of a new, or rather,
reviver of an old faith, proceeded with accustomed
volubility.
Well, then, here, as we are, we call upon God, and
tell him how we stand. Though, to be sure, as he
knows all, the telling wouldn't be such a needcessity.
But, never mindwe tell him. I say to him, here's
Isaac Muggsit aint easy for him to understand this
argyment, and unless he onderstands, it's a matter of life
and death to himyou recollect, Muggs, about the oath
I tuk on Polly Longlips.He wants to l'arn and its
needful to make a sign which 'll come home to his
onderstanding
more cl'arly than argyment by man's word of
mouth. Now then we prayand you must kneel to it
beforehand, MuggsI'll go aside under one tree and do
you take another; and we'll make a hearty prayer after
the proper sign. If the Lord says I'm right, why you'll
know it mighty soon by the sprawl I'll give you;but
if I'm wrong, the tumble will be the other way, and I'll
make the confession, though it 'll be a mighty bitter
needcessity, I tell you. But I aint afeard. I'm sartin
that my argyment for our rights is a true argyment, and
I'll say my prayers with that sort of sartinty, that it
would do your heart good if you could only feel about
the same time.
If I thought you was serious, Jack Bannister, but
I'm dub'ous about it.
Don't be dub'ous. I'm ser'ous as a sarpent. I b'lieve
in GodI b'lieve he'll justify the truth, whenever we
axes him, in airnest, for it! My old mother, God rest
her bones, and bless her sperrit!she's told me of more
than twenty people, that's tried a wrestle for the truth.
There was one man in partic'lar that she knows in
Georgia
.
His name was Bostick;he used to be a drummer
in General Oglethorpe's Highland regiment. Well,
another
man, a sodger in the same regiment, made an
accusation agin Bostick for stealing a watch-coat, and
the sarcumstances went mighty strong agin Bostick.
But he stood it out, and though he never shot a rifle in
his life before, he staked the truth and his honesty on a
shot; and, by the Hokey, though, as I tell you he never
lifted rifle to his sight before, he put the bullet clean
through the mouth and jaw of the sodger and cut off a
small slice of his tongue, which was, perhaps, as good a
judgment agin a man for false swearing as a rifle-shot
could make. Well, 'twa'n't a month after that when
they found it was an Ingin that had stole the cost, and
so Bostick was shown to be an honest man, by God's
blessing, in every way.
There was something so conclusive on the subject, in
this, and one or two similar anecdotes, which Supple
Jack told, and which, having heard them from true
believers in his youth, had led to his own adoption of
the experiment, that the landlord, Muggs, offered no
further
doubts or objections. The earnestness of his
companion
became contagious, and, with far less enthusiasm
of character, he was probably not unwillingin order to
the proper adoption of a feeling which was growing
momently
in favour in his eyesto resort to the wager of
battle as an easy mode of making a more formal
declaration
in behalf of the dominant faction of the state. The
novelty of the suggestion had its recommendation also;
and but few more words were wasted, before the two
went forth to a pleasant and shady grass-plat, which lay
some two hundred yards farther in the hollow of the
wood, in order that the test so solemnly recommended
on such high authority, should be fairly made in the
presence of that High Judge only, whose arbitrament,
without intending any irreverence, was so earnestly
invoked
by the simple woodman of Congaree.
CHAPTER XIV.
THE TRIAL FOR THE TRUTH.
No change could have been suddenly greater than that
which was produced upon the countenance and conduct of
John Bannister when he found himself successful in
bringing
the landlord to the desired issue. His seriousness was
all discarded,his intense earnestness of air and tone,
and a manner, even playful and sportive, succeeded to that
which had been so stern and sombre. He congratulated
Muggs and himself, equally, on the strong probability,
so near at hand, of arriving at the truth by a process so
direct, and proceeded to make his arrangements for the
conflict with all the buoyancy of a boy traversing the
playground with `leap-frog' and `hop o' my thumb.'
The landlord did not betray the same degree of eagerness,
but he was not backward. He might have had his doubts
of the issue, for Supple Jack had a fame in those days
which spread far and wide along the three contiguous
rivers. Wherever a pole-boat had made its way, there
had the name of Jack Bannister found repeated echoes.
But Muggs was a fearless man, and he had, besides, a
very tolerable degree of self-assurance, which led him to
form his own expectations and hopes of success. If he
had any scruples at all, they arose rather from his doubt
whether the proposed test of truth would be a fair one
a doubt which seemed very fairly overcome in his mind,
as, indeed, it should be in that of the reader, if full justice
is done to the final argument which the scout addressed
to his adversary on this subject.
There never was a quarrel and a fight yet that didn't
come out of a wish to l'arn or to teach the truth. What's
King George a-fighting us for this very moment? Why, to
make us b'lieve in him. If he licks us, why we'll b'lieve
in him; and if we licks him, 'gad, I'm thinking he'll have
to b'lieve in us. Aint that cl'ar, Muggs? So, let's fall
toif I licks you, I reckon you'll know where to look
for the truth for ever after; for I'll measure your back
on it, and your breast under it, and you'll feel it in all
your sides.
The ground was chosena pleasant area beneath a
shadowing grove of oaks, covered with a soft
greensward
,
which seemed to lessen, in the minds of the
combatants, the dangers of discomfiture. But when the
parties began to strip for the conflict, a little difficulty
suggested itself which had not before disturbed the
thoughts of either. How was the superfluous arm of
Supple Jack to be tied up. Muggs could evidently
perform
no such friendly office; but a brief pause given to
their operations enabled the scout to arrange it easily.
A running noose was made in the rope, into which he
thrust the unnecessary member, then gave the end of the
line to his opponent, who contrived to draw it around
his body, and bind the arm securely to his sidean
operation easily understood by all schoolboys who have
ever been compelled to exercise their wits in securing a
balance of power in a like way among ambitious rivals.
As they stood, front to front opposed, the broad chest,
square shoulders, voluminous muscle, and manly compass
of the two, naturally secured the admiration of both.
Supple Jack could not refrain from expressing his
satisfaction
.
It's a pleasure, Isaac Muggs, to have a turn with
a man of your make. I ha'n't seen a finer bosom for a
fight this many a day. I think, if any thing, you're a
splinter or two fuller across the breast than me;it may
be fat, and if so, it's the worse for you,but if it's the
solid grain and gristle, then it's only the worse for me.
It makes me saddish enough when I look on sich a
bosom, to think that you're cut off one half in a fair
allowance of arm. But I don't think that'll work agin
you in this 'bout, for, you see, you're used to doing
without it, and making up in a double use of t'other;
and I'm beginning a'ready to feel as if I warnt of no use
at all in the best part of my body. Let's feel o' your
heft, old fellow.
A mutual lift being taken, they prepared to take hold
for the grand trial, and Supple Jack soon discovered, as
he had suspected, that the customary disuse of the arm
gave to his opponent an advantage in this sort of
conflict
,
which, taken in connexion with his naturally strong
build of frame, rendered the task before him equally
serious and doubtful. But, with a shake of the head as
he made this acknowledgment, he laid his chin on the
shoulder of the landlord, grasped him vigorously about
the body; and Muggs, having secured a similar grasp,
gave him the word, and they both swung round, under a
mutual impulse, which, had there been any curious
spectator
at hand, would have left him very doubtful, for a
long time, as to the distinct proprietorship of the several
legs which so rapidly chased each other in the air. An
amateur in such mattersa professional lover of the
fancywould make a ravishing picture of this
conflict
.
The alternations of seeming success; the hopes,
the fears, the occasional elevations of the one party, and
the depressions of the otherthe horizontal tendency of
this or that head and shoulderthe yielding of this frame
and the staggering of that legmight, under the pencil
of a master, be made to awaken as many sensibilities in
the spectator as ever did the adroit deviltries of the
modern
Jack Sheppard. But these details must be left to
artists of their ownto the Cruikshanks!or that more
popular, if less worthy, fraternity, the Quiz, Phiz,
Biz, Tiz, &c., whose sober industry keeps the
jaws of modern wonder for ever on the stretch. We
shall content ourselves with simply assuring our readers
that in the struggle both of our champions behaved
manfully
.
The conflict was protracted; the turf, forming a
ring of twenty feet round, or more, was beaten smooth,
and still the affair was undecided. Neither had yet
received a fall. But Supple Jack, for reasons of his own,
began to feel that the argument was about to be settled
in favour of right principles.
Your breath's coming
re
ther quick now, Isaac Muggs!
I'm thinking you'll soon be convarted! But it's a
mighty strong devil you had in you, and I'm afeard he'll
make my ribs ache for a week. I'll sprawl him, though,
I warrant you.
Don't be too sartin, Jack, gasped the other.
Don't!Why, love you, Muggs, you couldn't say
that short speech over again for the life of you.
Couldn't, eh!
No, not for King George's axing.
Think so, eh?
Know so, man. Now, look to it. I'll only ax three
tugs more. Therethere's one.
Nothing done, Jack.
Two,three! and where are you now! cried the
exulting scout, as he deprived his opponent of grasp and
footing at the same moment, and whirled him, dizzy and
staggering, heels up and head to the earth. But he was
not suffered to reach it by that operation only. His
course was accelerated by other hands; and three men,
rushing with whoop and halloo from the copse, near
which the struggle had been carried on, grappled with
the fallen landlord, and plied him with a succession of
blows, the least of which was unnecessary for his
overthrow
.
It seemed that Supple Jack recognised these
intruders almost in the moment of their appearance; but
so sudden was their onset and so great their clamour, that
his fierce cry to arrest them was unheard, and he could
only make his wishes known by adopting the summary
process of knocking two of them down by successive
blows from the only fist which was left free for exercise.
How now! Who ax'd you to put your dirty fingers
into my dish, Olin Masseyor you, Bob Jonesor you,
Peyton Burns? This is your bravery, is it, to beat a
man after I've down'd him, eh?
But we didn't know that 'twas over, Sergeant. We
thought you was a-wanting help; replied the fellow
who was called Masseyit would seem in mockery
only. He was a little, dried up, withered atomy,a
jaundiced sand-lapper, or clay-eater, from the
Wassamasaw
country, whose insignificant size and mean
appearance did very inadequate justice to his resolute,
fierce, and implacable character.
And if I was a-wanting help, was you the man to
give it? Go 'long, Olin Masseyyou're a very young
chap to be here. What makes you here, I want to
know?
Why, didn't you send us on the scout, jist here, in
this very place? said the puny, but pugnacious person
addressed, with a fierceness of tone and gesture, and a
fire in his eye, which the feebleness of his form did not
in the least qualify.
Yes, to be sure; but why didn't you come? I've
been here a matter of two hours by the sun; and as you
didn't come, I reckoned you had taken track after some
tory varmints, and had gone deeper into the swamp.
You've dodged some tories, eh?
No, ha'n't seed a soul.
Then, by the Hokey, Olin Massey, you've been
squat on a log, playing old sledge for pennies!
The scouting party looked down in silence. The little
man from Wassamasaw felt his anger subside within him.
Corporal Massey, give me them painted bits, before
they're the death of you. By old natur, betwixt cards
and rum, I've lost more of my men than by
Cunningham's
bullets or Tarleton's broadswords. Give me them
cards, Olin Massey, and make your respects to my good
natur, that I don't blow you to the colonel.
The offender obeyed. He drew from his pocket in
silence a pack of the dirtiest cards that ever were thumbed
over a pine log, and delivered them to his superior with
the air of a schoolboy from whom the master has cruelly
taken, at one fell swoop, top, marbles, and ball.
There, said Supple Jack, as he thrust them into
his pocketI'll put them up safely, boys, and you
shall have 'em again, for a whole night, after our next
brush with the tories. Go you now and get your nags
in readiness, while I see to Muggs. I'll j'in you directly
at the red clay.
When they had disappeared, he turned to the landlord,
who had meanwhile risen, though rather slowly, from
the earth, and now stood a silent spectator of the
interview
.
Now, Muggs, I reckon we'll have to try the tug over
agin. These blind boys of mine put in jest a moment
too soon. They helped to flatten you, I'm thinking;
and so, if you aint quite satisfied which way the truth is,
it's easy to go it over again.
The offer was more liberal than Muggs expected or
desired. He was already sufficiently convinced.
No, no, Supple, you're too much for me!
It's the truth that's too much for you, Muggsnot
me! I reckon you're satisfied now which way the truth
is. You've got a right onderstanding in this business.
The landlord made some admissions, the amount of
which, taken without circumlocution, was, that he had
been whipped in a fair fight; and, according to all the
laws of war, as well as common sense, that he was now
at the disposal of the victor. His acknowledgments
were sufficiently satisfactory.
We've prayed for it, Muggs, and jest as we prayed
we got it. You're rubbing your legs and your sides, but
what's a bruise and a pain in the side, or even a broken
rib, when we've got the truth. After that, a hurt of the
body is a small matter; and then a man don't much fear
any sort of danger. Let me know that I'm in the right
way, and that justice is on my side, and I don't see the
danger, though it stands in the shape of the biggest
gun-muzzle
that ever bellowed from the walls of Charlestown
in the great siege. Now, Muggs, since you say now
that you onderstand the argyment I set you, and that you
agree to have your liberties the same as the rest of us,
I'll jist open your eyes to a little of the risk you've been
a-running for the last few days. Lookread this here
letter, and see if you can recollect the writing.
The blood left the cheeks of the landlord the instant
that the scout handed him the letter.
VOL. I. 15
Where did you fine it, Supple? he gasped
apprehensively
.
Find it! I first found the sculp of the chap that
carried it, was the cool reply. But you answer to
the writing, don't youit's your'n.
Well, I reckon you know it, Supple, without my
saying so.
Reckon I do, Muggs,it's pretty well known in
these parts; and s'pose any of our boys but me had got
hold of it? Where would you be, I wonder? Swinging
on one of the oak limbs before your own door, dangling
a good pair of legs of no sort of use to yourself or any
body else. But I'm your friend, Muggs; a better friend
to you than you've been to yourself. I come and argy
the matter with you, and reason with you to your
onderstanding
,
and make a convarsion of you without
trying to frighten you into it. Now that you see the
error of your ways, I show you their danger also. This
letter is tory all over, but there's one thing in it that
made me have marcy upon youit's here, jist in the
middle, where you beg that bloody tory, Ned Conway,
to have marcy on his brother. Any body that speaks
friendly, or kind, of Clarence Conway, I'll help him if I
can. Now, Muggs, I'll go with you to your house, and
there I'll burn this letter in your own sight, so that it'll
never rise up in judgment agen you. But you must
make a clean breast of it. You must tell me all you
know, that I may be sure you feel the truth according
to the lesson, which, with the helping of God, I've been
able to give you.
The landlord felt himself at the mercy of the scout;
but the generous treatment which he had received from
the worthy fellowtreatment so unwonted at that
period
of wanton bloodshed and fierce crueltyinclined
him favourably to the cause, the arguments for which
had been produced by so liberal a disputant. His own
policy, to which we have already adverted more than
once, suggested far better; and, if the landlord relented
at all in his revelations, it was with the feelingnatural,
perhaps, to every mind, however lowlywhich makes
it revolt at the idea of becoming treacherous, even to
the party which it has joined for purposes of treachery.
The information which the scout obtained, and which
was valuable to the partisans, he drew from the relator
by piecemeal. Every item of knowledge was drawn
from him by its own leading question, and yielded with
broken utterance, and the half vacant look of one who
is only in part conscious, as he is only in part willing.
Pretty well, Muggs, though you don't come out like
a man who felt the argyment at the bottom of his
onderstanding
.
There's something more now. In this bit
of writing there's a line or two about one Peter Flagg,
who, it seems, carried forty-one niggers to town last
January, and was to ship 'em to the West Indies. Now,
can you tell if he did ship them niggers?
I can't exactly now, Suppleit's onbeknown to
me.
But how come you to write about this man and
them niggers?
Why, you see, Peter Flagg was here looking after
the captain?
Ah! he was here, was he?
Yeshe j'ined the captain jest before Butler's men
gin him that chase.
He's with Ned Conway then, is he?
No, I reckon not. He didn't stay with the captain
but half a day.
Ah! ha!and where did he go then?
Somewhere across the river.
Below, I'm thinking.
Yes, he took the lower routeI reckon he went
towards
the Santee.
Isaac Muggs, don't you know that the business of
Pete Flagg is to ship stolen niggers to the West India
Islands?
Well, Supple, I believe it is, though I don't know.
That's enough about Pete. Now, Muggs, when
did you see Watson Gray last? You know the man
I mean. He comes from the Congaree near Granby.
He's the one that watches Briar Park for Ned Conway,
and brings him in every report about the fine bird that
keeps there. You know what bird I mean, don't you?
Miss Flora, I reckon.
A very good reckon. Well! you know Gray?
Yeshe's a great scoutthe best, after you, I'm
thinking, on the Congaree.
Before me, Muggs, said the scout, with a sober
shake of the head. He's before me, or I'd ha' trapped
him many's the long day ago. He's the only outlyer
I acknowledge on the river: but he's a skunka bad
chap about the heart. His bosom's full of black places.
He loves to do ugly things, and to make a brag of 'em
afterward, and that's a bad character for a good scout.
But that's neither here nor there. I only want you now
to think up, and tell me when he was here last.
Well!
Ah, don't stop to `well' about it, cried the other
impatientlyspeak out like a bold man that's jest got
the truth. Wan't Watson Gray here some three days
agobefore the troop came downand didn't he leave a
message by word of mouth with you? Answer me that,
Muggs, like a good whig as you ought to be.
It's true as turpentine, Supple; but, Lord love you,
how did you come to guess it?
No matter that!up now, and tell me what that
same message was.
That's a puzzler, I reckon, for I didn't onderstand it
all myself. There was five sticks and two bits of paper
on one was a long string of multiplication and
'rithmetic
figures
and all that;on the other was a sort of
drawing that looked most like a gal on horseback.
Eh!The gal on horseback was nateral enough.
Perhaps I can make out that; but the bits of stick and
'rithmetic is all gibberish. Wan't there nothing that
you had to say by word of mouth to Ned Conway?
Yes, to be sure. He left word as how the whigs
was getting thicker and thickerhow Sumter and Lee
marked all the road from Granby down to Orangeburg
with their horse-tracks, and never afeard; and how
Greene was a-pushing across toward Ninety-Six, where
he was guine to 'siege Cruger.
Old news, Muggs, and I reckon you've kept back
the best for the last. What did he have to say 'bout
Miss Flora? Speak up to that!
Not a word. I don't think he said any thing more,
onless it was something about boats being a-plenty, and
no danger of horse-tracks on the river.
There's a meaning in that; and I must spell it out,
said the scout; but now, Muggs, another question or
two. Who was the man that Ned Conway sent away
prisoner jest before day?
Lord, Supple, you sees every thing! ejaculated the
landlord. Pressed by the wily scout, he related, with
tolerable correctness, all the particulars of the affray the
night before between the captain of the Black Riders and
his subordinate; and threw such an additional light upon
the causes of quarrel between them as suggested to the
scout a few new measures of policy.
Well, Muggs, said he, at the close, I'll tell you
something in return for all you've told me. My boys
caught that same Stockton and trapped his guard in one
hour after they took the road; and I'm glad to find, by
putting side by side what they confessed and what you
tell me, that you've stuck to the truth like a gentleman
and a whig. They didn't tell me about the lieutenant's
wanting to be captain, but that's detarmined me to parole
the fellow that he may carry on his mischief in the
troop. I'm going to leave you now, Muggs, but you'll
see an old man coming here to look after a horse about
midday. Give him a drink, and say to him, that you
don't know nothing about the horse, but there's a hound
on track after something, that went barking above, three
hours before. That'll sarve his purpose and mine too:
and now, God bless you, old boy, and, remember, I'm
your friend, and I can do you better sarvice now than
any two Black Riders of the gang. As I've convarted
you, I'll stand by you, and I'll never be so far off in the
swamp that I can't hear your grunting, and come out to
15*
your help. So, good bye, and no more forgitting of that
argyment.
And where are you going now, Supple?
Psha, boy, that's telling. Was I to let you know
that, Watson Gray might worm it out from under your
tongue, without taking a wrastle for it. I'll tell you
when I come back. And with a good-humoured chuckle
the scout disappeared, leaving the landlord to meditate,
at his leisure, upon the value of those arguments which
had made him in one day resign a faith which had been
cherished as longas it had proved profitable. Muggs
had no hope that the new faith would prove equally so;
but if it secured to him the goodly gains of the past, he
was satisfied. Like many of the tories at this period, he
received a sudden illumination, which showed him in
one moment the errors for which he had been fighting
five years. Let not this surprise our readers. In the
closing battles of the Revolution in South Carolina,
many were the tories converted to the patriot cause, who,
at the eleventh hour, displayed the most conspicuous
bravery fighting on the popular side.
CHAPTER XV.
GLIMPSES OF PASSION AND ITS FRUITS.
Supple Jack
soon joined his commander, bringing
with him, undiminished by use or travel, all the various
budgets of intelligence which he had collected in his
scout. He had dismissed the insubordinate lieutenant
of the Black Riders on parole; not without suffering
him to hear, as a familiar
on dit
along the river, that
Captain Morton was about to sacrifice the troop at the
first opportunity, and fly with all his booty from the
country.
I've know'd, said he to himself, after Stockton took
his departure, I've know'd a smaller spark than that
set off a barrel of gunpowder.
To his colonel, having delivered all the intelligence
which he had gained of the movements as well of the
public as private enemy, he proceeded, as usual, to give
such counsel as the nature of his revelations seemed to
suggest. This may be summed up in brief, without
fatiguing the reader with the detailed conversation which
ensued between them in their examination of the subject.
From what I see, colonel, Ned Conway is gone
below
.
It's true he did seem to take the upper route, but
Massey can't find the track after he gits to Fisher's Slue.
There, I reckon, he chopped right round, crossed the
Slue, I'm thinking, and dashed below. Well, what's he
gone below for, and what's Pete Flagg gone for across
to the Santee?Pete, that does nothing but ship niggers
for the British officers. They all see that they're got to
go, and they're for making hay while the sun is still
a-shining
.
Now, I'm thinking that Ned Conway is after
your mother's niggers. He'll steal 'em and ship 'em by
Pete Flagg to the West Indies, and be the first to follow,
the moment that Rawdon gits licked by Greene. It's
cl'ar to me that you ought to go below and see about the
business.
The arguments of the woodman were plausible enough,
and Clarence Conway felt them in their fullest force.
But he had his doubts about the course alleged to be
taken by his kinsman, and a feeling equally selfish,
perhaps
,
but more noble intrinsically, made him fancy that
his chief interest lay above. He was not insensible to
his mother's and his own probable loss, should the
design of Edward Conway really be such as Bannister
suggested, but a greater stake, in his estimation, lay in
the person of the fair Flora Middleton; and he could not
bring himself to believe, valuing her charms as he did
himself, that his kinsman would forego such game for
the more mercenary objects involved in the other
adventure
.
The tenor of the late interview between himself
and the chief of the Black Riders, had forced his mind to
brood with serious anxiety on the probable fortunes of
this lady; and his own hopes and fears becoming equally
active at the same time, the exulting threats and bold
assumptions of Edward Conwayso very different from
the sly humility of his usual deportmentawakened all
his apprehensions. He resolved to go forward to the upper
Congaree, upon the pleasant banks of which stood the
princely domains of the Middleton family; persuaded,
as he was, that the rival with whom he contended for
so great a treasure, equally wily and dishonourable, had
in contemplation some new villany, which, if not
seasonably
met, would result in equal loss to himself and
misery to the maiden of his heart. Yet he did not
resolve thus, without certain misgivings and
self-reproaches
.
His mother was quite as dear to him as ever
mother was to the favourite son of her affections. He
knew the danger in which her property stood, and was
not heedless of the alarm which she would experience, in
her declining years and doubtful health, at the inroad of
any marauding foe. The arguments of a stronger
passion
,
however, prevailed above these apprehensions, and
he contented himself with a determination to make the
best of his way below, as soon as he had assured himself
of the safety and repose of every thing above. Perhaps,
too, he had a farther object in this contemplated visit to
Flora Middleton. The counsel of Bannister on a
previous
occasion, which urged upon him to bring his
doubts to conviction on the subject of the course which
her feelings might be disposed to take, found a
corresponding
eagerness in his own heart to arrive at a
knowledge
always so desirable to a lover, and which he seeks
in fear and trembling as well as in hope.
I will but see her, was his unuttered determination,
I will but see her, and see that she is safe, and hear at
once her final answer. These doubts are too painful for
endurance! Better to hear the worst at once, than live
always in apprehension of it.
Leaving the youthful partisan to pursue his own course,
let us now turn for a while to that of Edward Morton,
and the gloomy and fierce banditti which he commanded.
He has already crossed the Wateree, traversed the
country
between that river and the Congaree; and after
various small adventures, such as might be supposed
likely to occur in such a progress, but which do not
demand from us any more special notice, we find him
on the banks of the latter stream, in the immediate
neighbourhood of a spot where it receives into its
embrace
the twin though warring waters of the Saluda and
the Broada spot, subsequently, better distinguished as
the chosen site of one of the loveliest towns of the State
the seat of its capital, and of refinement, worth, courtesy,
and taste, which are not often equalled in any region, and
are certainly surpassed in none. Columbia, however, at the
period of our story, was not in existence; and the
meeting
of its tributary waters, their striving war, incessant
rivalry, and the continual clamours of their strife, formed
the chief distinction of the spot; and conferred upon it
no small degree of picturesque vitality and loveliness.
A few miles below, on the opposite side of the stream,
stood then the flourishing town of Granbya place of
considerable magnitude and real importance to the wants
of the contiguous country, but now fallen into decay and
utterly deserted. A garrisoned town of the British, it
had just before this period been surrendered by Colonel
Maxwell to the combined American force under Sumter
and Leean event which counselled the chief of the
Black Riders to an increased degree of caution as he
approached
a neighbourhood so likely to be swarming with
enemies. Here we may as well communicate to the
reader such portions of the current history of the time,
as had not yet entirely reached this wily marauder.
While he was pursuing his personal and petty objects of
plunder on the Wateree, Lord Rawdon had fled from
Camden, which he left in flames; Sumter had taken
Orangeburg; Fort Motte had surrendered to Marion;
the British had been compelled to evacuate their post at
Nelson's Ferry, and the only fortified place of which
they now kept possession in the interior was that of
Ninety-Six; a station of vast importance to their
interests
in the back country, and which, accordingly,
they resolved to defend to the last extremity. But
though ignorant of some of the events here brought
together, Edward Morton was by no means ignorant of
the difficulties which were accumulating around the
fortunes
of the British, and which, he naturally enough
concluded
,
must result in these, and even worse disasters.
Of the fall of Granby he was aware; of the audacity
and number of the American parties, his scouts hourly
informed him, even if his own frequent and narrow
escapes
had failed to awaken him to a sense of the
prevailing
dangers. But, governed by an intense selfishness, he
had every desire to seek, in increased caution, for the
promotion of those interests and objects, without which
his patriotism might possibly have been less prudent, and
of the proper kind. He had neither wish nor motive to go
forward rashly; and, accordingly, we find him advancing
to the Saluda, with the slow, wary footsteps of one who
looks to behold his enemy starting forth, without
summons
of trumpet, from the bosom of every brake along
the route.
It was noon when his troop reached the high banks of
the river, the murmur of whose falls, like the distant
mutterings of ocean upon some island-beach, were heard,
pleasantly soothing, in the sweet stillness of a forest
noon. A respite was given to the employments of the
troop. Scouts were sent out, videttes stationed, and the
rest surrendered themselves to repose, each after his own
fashion: some to slumber, some to play, while others,
like their captain, wandered off to the river banks, to
angle or to meditate, as their various moods might
incline
.
Morton went apart from the rest, and found a
sort of hiding-place upon a rock immediately
overhanging
the river, where, surrounded by an umbrageous
forest-growth, he threw his person at length, and yielded
himself up to those brooding cares which he felt were
multiplying folds about his mind, in the entangling grasp
of which it worked slowly and without its usual ease and
elasticity. The meditations are inevitably mournful with
a spirit such as his. Guilt is a thing of isolation always,
even when most surrounded by its associates and
operations
.
Its very insecurity tends to its isolation as
completely
as its selfishness. Edward Morton felt all this.
He had been toiling, and not in vain, for a mercenary
object. His spoils had been considerable. He had
hoarded up a secret treasure in another country, secure
from the vicissitudes which threatened every fortune in
that where he had won it; but he himself was insecure.
Treachery, he began to believe, and not a moment too
soon, was busy all around him. He had kept down fear,
and doubt, and distrust, by a life of continual action; but
it was in moments of repose like this, that he himself
found none. It was then that his fears grew busythat
he began to distrust his fate, and to apprehend that all
that future, which he fondly fancied to pass in serenity
of fortune, if not of mind and feeling, would yet be
clouded and compassed with denial. His eye, stretching
away on either hand, beheld the two chafing rivers
rushing
downward to that embrace which they seem at once
to desire and to avoid. A slight barrier of land and
shrubbery interposes to prevent their too sudden
meeting
.
Little islands throw themselves between, as if
striving to thwart the fury of their wild collision, but in
vain! The impetuous waters force their way against
every obstruction; and wild and angry, indeed, as if
endued
with moral energies and a human feeling of hate, is
their first encountertheir recoiltheir return to the
conflict, in foam and roar, and commotion, until
exhaustion
terminates the strife, and they at length repose
together in the broad valleys of the Congaree below.
The turbulence of the scene alone interested the
dark-bosomed
spectator whose fortunes we contemplate. He
saw neither its sublime nor its gentle featuresits fair
grovesits sweet islands of rock and tufted vegetation,
upon which the warring waters, as if mutually struggling
to do honour to their benevolent interposition, fling over
their flashing, and transparent wreaths of whitish foam.
His moody thought was busy in likening the prospect
to that turbulence, the result of wild purposes and wicked
desires, which filled his own bosom. A thousand
impediments
,
like the numerous rocks and islands that rose to
obstruct the passage of the streams which he surveyed,
lay in his course, baffling his aim, driving him from his
path, resisting his desires, and scattering inefficiently all
his powers. Even as the wates which he beheld,
complaining
in the fruitless conflict with the rude masses
from which they momently recoiled, so did he,
unconsciously
,
break into speech, as the difficulties in his own
future progress grew more and more obvious to his
reflections.
There must soon be an end to this. That old fool
was right. I should be a fool to wait to see it. Once,
twice, thrice, already, have I escaped, when death seemed
certain. Let me not provoke fortunelet me not task
her too far. It will be impossible to baffle these
bloodhounds
much longer! Their scent is too keen, their
numbers too great, and the spoil too encouraging.
Besides
,
I have done enough. I have proved my loyalty.
Loyalty indeed!a profitable pretextand there will
be no difficulty now in convincing Rawdon that I ought
to be the last to linger here in waiting for the end.
That endwhat shall it be?A hard fighta bloody
fielda sharp pain and quiet! Quiet!that were
something
,
too, might almost reconcile one to linger. Could
I be secure of that, at the risk of a small pain only; but
it may be worse. Captivity were something worse
than death. In their hands, alive, and no Spanish
tortures
would equal mine. No! no! I must not
encounter
that danger. I must keep in reserve one weapon
at least, consecrated to the one purpose. Thisthis!
must secure me from captivity!
He drew from his bosom, as he spoke these words, a
small poniard of curious manufacture, which he
contemplated
with an eye of deliberate study; as if the
exquisite Moorish workmanship of the handle, and the
rich and variegated enamel of the blade, served to
promote
the train of gloomy speculation into which he had
fallen. A rustling of the leavesthe slight step of a
foot immediately behind himcaused him to start to
his feet;but he resumed his place with an air of
vexation, as he beheld, in the intruder, the person of
the boy whom we have seen once before in close
attendance upon him.
How now! he exclaimed impatiently, can I have
no moment to myselfwhy will you thus persist in
following me.
I have no one else to follow, was the meek reply
the tones falling, as it were, in echo from a weak and
withered heart. I have no one else to follow, and
and
The lips faltered into silence.
Speak outand what?
You once said to me that I should go with none
but youoh, Edward Conway, spurn me notdrive
me not away with those harsh looks and cruel accents;
let me linger beside youthough if you please it,
still out of your sight, for I am desolateoh! so desolate,
when you leave me!you, who, alone, of all the world,
VOL. I. 16
I may have some right to look to for protection and for
life.
The sex of the speaker stood revealedin the heaving
breastthe wo-begone countenancethe heart-broken
despondency of look and gesturethe tear-swollen and
down-looking eye. She threw herself before him as
she spoke, her face buried in her hands and prone upon
the ground. Her sobs succeeded her speech and in
fact silenced it.
No more of this, Mary Clarkson, you disturb and
vex me. Rise. I have seen, for some days past, that
you had some new tribulationsome new burden of
wo to deliverout with it nowsay what you have to
say;and, look you, no whinings. Life is too seriously
full of real evils, dangers and difficulties, to suffer me to
bear with these imaginary afflictions.
Oh, God, Edward Conway, it is not imaginary with
me. It is realit is to be seento be felt. I am dying
with it. It is in my pale cheekmy burning brain, in
which there is a constant fever. Oh, look not upon me
thusthus angrilyfor, in truth I am dying. I feel it!
I know that I cannot live very long;and yet, I am so
afraid to die. It is this fear, Edward Conway, that
makes me intrude upon you now.
And what shall I do, and what shall I say to lessen
your fears of death? And, why should I do itwhy,
yet more, should you desire it? Death is or ought to
be a very good thing for one who professes to be so
very miserable in life as yourself. You heard me as
you approached?if you did you must have heard my
resolution to seek death, from my own weapon,
under
certain circumstances. Now, it is my notion that
whenever life becomes troublesome, sooner than
grumble
at it hourly, I should make use of some small
instrument
like this. A finger-prick onlyno greater pain
will suffice, and put an end to life and pain in the same
instant.
Would it could! would it could! exclaimed the
unfortunate victim of that perfidy which now laughed
her miseries to scorn.
Why, so it can! Do you doubt? I tell you, that
there is no more pain, Mary, in driving this dagger into
your heartinto its most tender and vital placesthan
there would be, burying it in your finger. Death will
follow, and there's the end of it.
Not the end, not the endif it were, Edward
Conway
,
how gladly would I implore from your hand the
blessing of that lasting peace which would follow from
its blow. It is the hereafterthe awful hereafter
which I fear to meet.
Pshaw! a whip of the hangmana bugbear of the
priests, for fools and women! I'll warrant you, if you
are willing to try the experiment, perfect security from
all pain hereafter! And the heartless wretch extended
toward her the hand which contained the glittering
weapon
.
She shuddered and turned awaygiving him, as
she did so, such a look as even he, callous as he was,
shrunk to behold. A glance of reproach, more keen,
deep, and touching than any word of complaint which
her lips had ever ventured to utter.
Alas! Edward Conway, has it really come to this!
To you I have yielded every thingvirtue, peace of
mindthe love of father, and of mother, and of friends
all that's most dearall that the heart deems most
desirableand you offer me, in return, for these
death, death!the sharp, sudden poniardthe cold,
cold grave! If you offer it, Edward Conwaystrike!
the death is welcome! Even the fear of it is
forgotten
.
Strike, set me free;I will vex you no longer
with my presence.
Why, what a peevish fool you are, Mary Clarkson!
though, to be sure, you are not very different from the
rest. There's no pleasing any of you, do as we may.
You first came to me to clamour about your distaste
of life, and by your perpetual grumblings you seek to
make it as distasteful to me as to yourself. Well, I tell
youthis is my remedy!this sudden, sharp dagger
whenever I shall come to regard life as a thing of so
much misery as you do, I shall end it; and I also add,
in the benevolence of my heart`here is my
medicament
I
share it with you!'and lo! what an uproar
what a howling. Look you, Mary, you must trouble
me no longer in this manner, and just now, in the
worst possible mood to bear with the best friend under
the sun.
Oh, Edward Conway, and this too!this, after
your promise! Do you remember your promise to me,
by the Poplar Spring, that hour of my shame!that
awful hour! Oh, what was that promise, Edward
Conway
?
Speak, Edward Conway! Repeat that promise
and confess I was not all guilty. No! no!I was only
all credulous! You beguiled me with a promisewith
an oatha solemn oath before Heavendid you not?
that I should be your wife. Till then, at least, I was
not guilty!
Did I really make such a promise to youeh?
he asked with a scornful affectation of indifference.
Surely, you will not deny that you did? she
exclaimed
with an earnestness which was full of
amazement
.
Well, I scarcely remember. But it matters not
much, Mary Clarkson. You were a fool for believing.
How could you suppose that I would marry you?
Ha! Is it so customary for pride and poverty to unite
on the Congaree that you should believe? Is it
customary
for the eldest son of one of the wealthiest
families
to wed with the child of one of the poorest? Why,
you should have known by the promise itself, that I
was amusing myself with your credulitythat my only
object was to beguile youto win you on my own
termsnot to wear you!I simply stooped for
conquest
,
Mary Clarkson, and you were willing to believe
any lie for the same object. It was your vanity that
beguiled you, Mary Clarkson, and not my words.
You wished to be a fine lady, and you are
Oh, do not stop. Speak it all out. Give to my
folly and my sin its true name. I can bear to hear it
now, without shrinking, for my own thoughts have
already spoken to my heart the foul and fearful truth.
I am, indeed, loathsome to myself, and would not care
to live but that I fear to die. 'Tis not the love of life
that makes me turn in fear from the dagger which you
offer. This, Edward Morton'tis this which brings
me to you now. I do not seek you for guidance or
for counselno! no!no such folly moves me now.
I come to you for protectionfor safetyfor security
from sudden deathfrom the judgefrom the avenger.
He
is pursuing usI have seen him!and as she
spoke these almost incoherent words, her eye looked
wildly among the thick woods around, and full of
apprehension, as if the danger she spoke of was in
reality at hand. Surprise was clearly expressed in the
features of her callous paramour.
He! Of whom speak you, child! Who is it you
fear? and his glance followed the wild direction of her
eyes.
My father!Jacob Clarkson! He is in search of
meof you!and oh! Edward Conway, I know him
so well, that I tell you, it will not be your high
connexions
and aristocratic birth that will save you on the
Congaree from a poor man's rifle, though these may
make it a trifling thing for you to ruin a poor man's
child. He is even now in search of usI have seen
him!I have seen the object of his whole soul in his
eye, as I have seen it an hundred times before. He
will kill youhe will kill us both, Edward Conway,
but he will have revenge!
Pshaw, girl! You are very foolish. How can your
father find us out? How approach us? The thought
is folly. As an individual he can only approach us by
coming into the line of our sentinelsthese disarm
him, and he then might look upon us, in each other's
arms, without being able to do us any injury.
Do not speak so, Edward, for God's sakein each
each other's arms no longerno more!and a sort
of shivering horror passed over her frame as she spoke
these words.
As you please! muttered the outlaw, with an
air and smile of scornful indifference. The girl
proceeded
:
But, even without weapons, the sight of my father
16*
the look of his eyes upon minewould kill me
would be worse than any sort of death. Oh, God! let
me never see him more. Let him never see methe
child that has lost him, lost herself, and is bringing his
gray hairs in sorrow to the grave.
Mary Clarkson, who do you think to cheat with all
this hypocrisy of sentiment. Don't I know that all
those fine words and phrases are picked out of books.
This talk is too customary to be true.
They may be!they were books, Edward
Conway
,
which you brought me, and which I loved to read
for your sake. Alas! I did not follow their lessons.
Enough of this stuff, and now to the common
sense of this business. You have seen your father,
you saywhere?
On the Wateree;the day before you came back
from your brother in the swamp!
Brother me no brothers! exclaimed the outlaw
fiercely, and look you, girl, have I not told you a
thousand times that I wish not to be called Conway.
Call me Morton, Cunningham, John Stuart, or the
devilor any of the hundred names by which my
enemies
distinguish me and denominate my deeds; but
call me not by the name of Conway. I, too, have
something filial in my nature; and if you wish not to
see the father you have offended, perhaps, it is for the
same reason that I would not hear the name of mine.
Let that dutiful reason content youit may be that I
have others; but these we will forbear for the present.
What of Jacob Clarkson, when you saw him? Where
was he?how employed?and where were you, and
who with you?
Oh, God! I was fearfully nigh to him, and he saw
me!He fixed his keen, cold, deathly eye upon me,
and I thought I should have sunk under it. I thought
he knew me; but how could he in such a guise as this,
and looking, as I do, pale, withered, and broken down
with sin and suffering.
Pshawwhere was all this?
At Isaac's tavern. There was none there beside
myself and Isaac. He came in and asked for a
calabash
of water. He would drink nothing, though Muggs
kindly offered him, but he would not. He looked at
me only for an instant, but it seemed to me, in that
instant, that he looked through and through my soul.
He said nothing to me, and hardly any thing to Isaac
though he asked him several questions;and when he
drank the water, and rested for a little while, he went
away. But while he stayed I thought I should have
died. I could have buried myself in the earth to escape
his sight; and yet how I longed to throw myself at his
feet and beg for mercy. Could I have done that, I think
I should have been happy. I should have been willing
then to die. But I dared not. He hadn't a human look
he didn't seem to feel;and I feared that he might
kill me without hearkening to my prayer.
Muggs should have told me of this, said the other
musingly.
He must have forgot it, on account of the uproar
and great confusion afterwards.
That is no good reason for a cool fellow like him.
I must see into it. It was a strange omission.
But what will you do, Edwardwhere shall we
fly?
Fly! where should we flyand why? Because of
your father? Have I not already told you that he
cannot
approach us to do harm; and, as for discovering us,
have you not seen that he looked upon his own child
without knowing her, and I'm sure he can never
recollect
me as the man who once helped him to provide for
the only undutiful child he had.
Spare me! Be not so
cruel
in your words, Edward,
for, of a truth, though I may escape the vengeance of
my father, I feel certain that I have not longnot very
long to live.
Nor I, Mary;so while life lasts, let us be up and
doing! was the cold-blooded reply, as, starting to his
feet, as if with the desire to avoid farther conference on
an annoying subject, he prepared to leave the spot
where it had taken place. Her lips moved, but she
spoke not. Her hands were clasped, but the entreaty
which they expressed, were lost equally upon his eyes
and heart; and if she meant to pray to him for a farther
hearing, her desire was unexpressed in any stronger
form. By him it remained unnoticed. Was it
unnoticed
by the overlooking and observant God!for to
him, when the other had gone from sight and hearing,
were her prayers then offered, with, seemingly, all the
sincerity of a broken and a contrite spirit.
CHAPTER XVI.
A GLIMPSE OF BRIAR PARK: THE OATH OF THE BLACK RIDERS.
By
evening of the same day, the scouts made their
appearance, and their reports were such as to
determine
the captain of the Black Riders to cross the
Congaree
and pursue his objects, whatever they might be,
along its southern banks. Sufficient time for rest had
been allotted to his troop. He believed they had
employed
it as assigned, little dreaming how busy some
of them had been, in the concoction of schemes, which,
if in character not unlike his own, were scarcely such
as were congenial with his authority or his desires.
But these are matters for the future.
Though resolved on crossing the river, yet, as the
chosen ferry lay several miles below, it became
necessary
to sound to horse; and about dusk the troop was
again put in motion, and continued on their route till
midnight. They had compassed but a moderate
distance
in this space of time, moving as they did with
great precautionslowly, of course, as was necessary
while traversing a country supposed to be in the full
possession of an enemy, and over roads, which, in those
days, were neither very distinct, nor fairly open, nor in
the best condition. They reached the ferry, but halted
for the remainder of the night without making any
effort to cross. At the dawn of day, Mary Clarkson,
still seemingly a boy, was one of the first, stealing
along the bank of the river, to remark the exquisite
beauty of the prospect which on every side opened
upon her eye. The encampment of the Black Riders
had been made along the river bluff, but sufficiently
removed from its edge to yield the requisite degree of
woodland shelter. The spot chosen for the purpose
was a ridge unusually elevated for that portion of the
stream, which is commonly skirted by an alluvial
bottom
of the richest swamp undergrowth. This, on either
hand, lay below, while the river, winding upon its way
in the foreground, was as meek and placid as if it never
knew obstacle or interruption. Yet, but a few miles
above, how constant had been its strife with the rocks
how unceasing its warring clamours. But a few of
these obstructions, and these were obstructions in
appearance
only, occurred immediately at the point
before
us; and these, borne down by the violence of the
conflict carried on above, might seem rather the
trophies
of its own triumph which the river brought away
with it in its downward progress; serving rather to
overcome the monotony of its surface, and increase the
picturesque of its prospect, than as offering any new
obstacle, or as provoking to any farther strife. Its
waters broke with a gentle violence on their rugged
tops, and passed over and around them with a slight
murmur, which was quite as clearly a murmur of
merriment
as one of annoyance. Around, the foliage grew
still in primitive simplicity. There, the long-leafed
pine, itself the evidence of a forest undishonoured by
the axe, reared its lofty brow, soaring and stooping, a
giant surveying his domain. About him, not inferior in
pride and majesty, though perhaps inferior in height, were
a numerous growth of oaks, of all the varieties common
to the region;tributary, as beauty still must ever be
to strength, were the rich and various hues of the bay,
the poplar, the dogwood, and the red bud of the
sassafras
all
growing and blooming in a profligate
luxuriance
,
unappreciated and unemployed, as if the tastes
of the Deity, quite as active as his benevolence, found
their own sufficient exercise in the contemplation of
such a treasure, though man himself were never to be
created for its future enjoyment. But beyond lay a
prospect in which art, though co-operating with nature
to the same end, had proved herself a dangerous rival.
Stretching across the stream, the eye took in, at a
glance, the territory of one of those proud baronial
privileges
of Carolinathe seat of one of her short-lived
nobilitybroad fields, smooth-shaven lawns, green
meadows
melting away into the embrace of the brown
woodsfair gardensmoss-covered and solemn groves;
and, in the midst of all, and over allstanding upon the
crown of a gently slopinghill, one of those stern, strong,
frowning fabrics of the olden time, which our ancestors
devised to answer the threefold purposes of the dwelling,
the chapel, and the castle for defence. There, when
the courage of the frontier-men first broke ground, and
took possession, among the wild and warlike hunters
of the Santee, the Congaree, and the Saluda, did the
gallant General Middleton plant his towers, amidst a
region of great perils, but of great natural beauty. With
a fearless soul, he united an exquisite taste, and for its
indulgence he was not unwilling to encounter the perils
of the remote wilderness to which he went. Perhaps,
too, the picturesque of the scenery was heightened to
his mind by the dangers which were supposed to
environ
it; and the forest whose frowning shades discouraged
most others, did not lose any of its attractions in his
sight, because it sometimes tasked him to defend his
possessions by the strong arm and the ready weapon.
The bear disputed with him the possession of the
honey-tree; and the red man, starting up, at evening,
from the thicket, not unfrequently roused him with his
fearful halloo, to betake himself to those defences, which
made his habitation a fortress no less than a dwelling.
But these, which are difficulties to the slothful, and
terrors to the timid, gave a zest to adventure, which
sweetens enterprise in the estimation of the brave; and
it did not lessen the value of Briar Park to its first
proprietor because he was sometimes driven to stand a
siege from the red men of the Congaree. But the red
men disappeared, and with them the daring adventurer
who planted his stakes, among the first, in the bosom
of their wild possessions. He, too, followed them at the
appointed season; and his proud old domains fell into
the hands of gentler proprietors. Under the
countenance
of her venerable grandmother, Flora Middleton
truly a rose in the wildernessblossomed almost
alone; at a time when the region in which the barony
stood, was covered with worse savages than even the
Congarees had been in the days of their greatest license.
But the besom of warwhich swept the country as
with flame and swordhad paused in its ravages at
this venerated threshold. With whig and tory alike,
the name of old General Middleton, the patriarch of the
Congaree country, was held equally sacred;and the
lovely granddaughter who inherited his wealth, though
celebrated equally as a belle and a rebel, was suffered
to hold her estates and opinions without paying those
heavy penalties which, in those days, the possession of
either was very likely to incur. Some trifling
exceptions
to this general condition of indulgence might
occasionally take place. Sometimes a marauding party
trespassed upon the hen-roost, or made a bolder foray
into the cattle-yard and store-houses; but these petty
depredations sunk out of sight in comparison with the
general state of insecurity and robbery which prevailed
every where else. The more serious annoyances to
which the inhabitants of Briar Park were subject, arose
from the involuntary hospitality which they were
compelled
to exercise towards the enemies of their
country
.
Flora Middleton had been forced to receive with
courtesy the amiable Cornwallis, and the brutal
Ferguson
;
and to listen with complacency to words of
softened
courtesy and compliment from lips which had just
before commanded to the halter a score of her
countrymen
,
innocent of all offence, except that of defending,
with the spirit of manhood and filial love, the soil which
gave them birth. The equally sanguinary and even
more stern Rawdonthe savage Tarleton, and the
fierce and malignant Cunningham, had also been her
uninvited guests, to whom she had done the honours
of the house with the grace and spirit natural to her
name and education, but never at the expense of her
patriotism. My fair foe, Flora, was the phrase with
whichwith unaccustomed urbanity of temper, Lord
Cornwallis was wont to acknowledge, but never to
resent, in any other waythe boldness of her spoken
sentiments. These she declared, with equal modesty
and firmness, whenever their expression became
necessary
;
and keen as might be her sarcasm, it bore with
it its own antidote, in the quiet, subdued, ladylike tone
in which it was uttered, and the courteous manner
which accompanied it. Grace and beauty may violate
many laws with impunity, and praise, not punishments,
will still follow the offender. Such was the happy
fortune
of Flora Middletonone of those youthful beauties
of Carolina, whose wit, whose sentiment, pride and
patriotism, acknowledged equally by friend and foe,
exercised a wondrous influence over the events of the
war, which is yet to be acknowledged in a becoming
manner.
The poor outcast, Mary Clarksona beauty, also, at
one time, in her rustic sphere, and one whose
sensibilities
had been unhappily heightened by the very arts
employed by her seducer to effect her ruingazed,
with a mournful sentiment of satisfaction, at the sweet
and picturesque beauty of the scene. Already was she
beginning to lose herself in that dreamy languor of
thought which hope itself suggests to the unhappy as a
means to escape from wo, when she found her reckless
betrayer suddenly standing by her side.
Ha, Mary, you are on the look-out, I seeyou have
a taste, I know. What think you of the plantations
opposite. See how beautifully the lawn slopes up from
the river to the foot of the old castle, a glimpse of whose
gloomy, frowning visage, meets your eye through that
noble grove of water oaks that link their arms across
the passage and conceal two-thirdsno lessof the
huge fabric to which they lead. There now, to the right,
what a splendid field of cornwhat an ocean of green
leaves. On the left do you see a clump of oaks and
sycamores,there, to itself, awaya close dense clump,
on a little hillock, itself a sort of emerald in the clearing
around it. There stands the vaultthe tomb of the
Middleton family. Old Middleton himself sleeps there,
if he can be said to sleep at all, for they tell strange
VOL. I. 17
stories of his nightly rambles after wolves and
copper-skins
.
You may see a small gray spot, like a chink of
light, peeping out of the grovethat is the tomb. It is
a huge, square apartment,I have been in it more than
once,partly beneath and partly above the ground, and
has hid many more living than it will ever hold dead
men. I owe it thanks for more than one concealment
myself.
You?
Yes! I have had a very comfortable night's rest
in it, all things considered; and the probability is not
small that we shall take our sleep in it to-night. How
like you the prospect?
The girl shuddered. He did not care for any other
answer, but proceeded.
In that old cage of Middleton there is a bird of
sweetest song, whom I would set free. Do you guess
what I mean, Mary?
The girl confessed her ignorance.
You are dull, Mary, but you shall grow wiser
before
long. Enough for the presentwe must set the
troop in motion. A short mile below and we find our
crossing place, and thenhark you, Mary, you must
keep a good look-out to-night. If there was mischief
yesterday, it is not yet cured. There is more to-day.
I shall expect you to watch to-night, while I
prey
.
He chuckled at the passing attempt at a sort of wit,
in which, to do him justice, he did not often indulge,
and the point of which his companion did not perceive,
then continued:
Perhaps it should be `prowl' rather than watch.
Though, to prowl well requires the best of watching.
You must do both. You
prowl
while I
prey
do you
understand?
He had given a new form to his phrase, by which he
made his humour obvious; and, satisfied with this, he
proceeded more seriously.
Give up your dumps, girl. It will not be the worse
for you that things turn out to please me. These
rascals
must be watched, and I can now trust none to
watch them but yourself.
At this confession, her reproachful eyes were turned
full and keenly upon his. He had betrayed the trust
of the only being in whom he could place his own.
What a commentary on his crimeon his cruel
indifference
to the victim of it! He saw in her eyes the
meaning which her lips did not declare.
Yes, it is even so, he said,and women were
made for this, and they must expect it. Born to be
dependants, it is enough that we employ you; and if
your expectations were fewer and humbler, your chance
for happiness would be far greater. Content yourself
now with the conviction that you have a share in my
favour, and all will go well with you. The regards of
a man are not to be contracted to the frail and
unsatisfying
compass of one girl's heart; unless, indeed, as
you all seem to fancy, that love is the sole business of
a long life. Love is very well for boys and girls, but
it furnishes neither the food nor the exercise for
manhood
.
If you expect it, you live in vain. Your food
must be the memories of your former luxuries. Let it
satisfy you, Mary, that I loved you once.
Never, Edwardyou never loved me;not even
when my confidence in your love lost me the love of
all other persons. This knowledge I have learned by
knowing how I have myself loved, and by comparing
my feelings with the signs of love in you. In learning
to know how little I have been loved, I made the
discovery
of your utter incapacity to love.
And why, pray you? he demanded with some
pique; but the girl did not answer. He saw her
reluctance
,
and framed another question.
And why, then, after this discovery, do you still
love me, and cling to me, and complain of me?
Alas! I know not why I love you. That, indeed,
is beyond me to learn. I have sought to knowI have
tried to thinkI have asked, but in vain, of my own
mind and heart. I cling to you because I can cling
nowhere else; and you have yourself said that a woman
is a dependantshe must cling somewhere! As for
complaint, God knows I do not come to make itI do
not wish, but I cannot help it. I weep and moan for
weakness only, I believe, and I shall soon be done
moaning.
EnoughI see which way you tend now. You
are foolish, Mary Clarkson, and war with your own
peace. Can you never be reconciled to what is
inevitable
what
you can no longer avoid? Make the best
of your conditionwhat is done can't be amended;
and the sooner you show me that you can yield
yourself
to your fate with some grace, the more certain and
soon will be the grace bestowed in turn. You are
useful
to me, Mary; and as women are useful to men
grown men, mark meso do they value them. When
I say `useful,' remember the word is a comprehensive
one. You may be useful in love, in the promotion of
fortune, revenge, ambition, hope, enterprisea thousand
things and objects, in which exercise will elevate equally
your character and condition. Enough, now. You
must show your usefulness to-night. I go on a business
of peril, and I must go alone. But I will take you with
me a part of the way, and out of sight of the
encampment
.
To the encampment you must return, however,
and with such precaution as to keep unseen. I need
not counsel you any furtheryour talents clearly lie
that way. Love is a sorry businessa sort of
sickness
,perhaps
the natural complaint of overgrown
babies of both sexes, who should be dosed with caudle
and put to bed as soon after as possible. Do you hear,
child? Do you understand?
Thus substantially ended this conferencethe
singular
terms of which, and the relation between the
parties, can only be understood by remembering that
sad condition of dependence in which the unhappy girl
stood to her betrayer. She was hopeless of any change
of fortuneshe knew not where to turnshe now had
no other objects to which she might presume to cling.
She remembered the humbler love of John Bannister
with a sighthe roof and the affections of her father
with a thrill, which carried a cold horror through all
her veins. A natural instinct turned her to the only
one upon whom she had any claima claim still
indisputable
,
though it might be scorned or denied by
him; and without being satisfied of the truth of his
arguments, she was willing, as he required, to be
useful
,
that she might not be forgotten.
While the troop was preparing to cross the river,
it was joined, to the surprise of every body and the
chagrin of its commander, by the refractory lieutenant,
Stockton. He related the events which occurred to him
somewhat differently from the truth. According to his
version
of the story, the guard to whom he had been
entrusted
was attacked by a superior force, beaten, and
probably
slainhe himself seasonably escaping to tell the story. It was fancied by himself and friends that his narrow
escape and voluntary return to his duty would lessen
his offence in the eye of the chief, and probably relieve
him from all the consequences threatened in his recent
arrest. But the latter was too jealous of the
disaffection
prevailing among his men, and too confident in
the beneficial influence of sternness among inferiors, to
relax the measure of a hair in the exercise of his
authority. He at once committed him a close prisoner,
to the care of two of his most trusty adherents; and
resolutely rejected the applications offered in his behalf
by some of the temporizersa class of persons of whom
the Black Riders, like every other human community,
had a fair proportion. The river was crossed a few
miles below the Middleton Barony. A deep thicket in
the forest, and on the edge of the river swamp, was
chosen for their bivouac; and there, closely concealed
from casual observation, the chief of the Black Riders,
with his dark banditti, awaited till the approach of
night, in a condition of becoming quiet. He then
prepared
to go forth, alone, on his expedition to the barony;
and it was with some surprise, though without
suspicion
of the cause, that Mary Clarkson perceived, on
his setting out, that he had discarded all his customary
disguises, and had really been paying some little
unusual
17*
attention to the arts of the toilet. The black and
savage beard and whiskers, as worn by the troopers
generallya massive specimen of which had fallen into
the hands of Supple Jack on a previous occasion, had
disappeared from his face; his sable uniform had given
place to a well-fitting suit of becoming blue; and, of
the costume of the troop, nothing remained but the
dark belt which encircled his waist. But Mary
Clarkson
was not naturally a suspicious person, nor of a
jealous temper; and the first observation which noticed
these changes occasioned not even a surmise in relation
to their object. She obeyed his intimation to follow
him as he prepared to take his departure, and availing
herself of the momentary diversion of such of the band
as were about her at the moment, she stole away, and
joined him at a little distance from the camp, where
she received his instructions as to the game which he
required her to play.
The quiet in which Morton had left his followers did
not long continue after his departure. The
insubordinates
availed themselves of his absence to try their
strength in a bolder measure than they had before
attempted; and a body of them, rising tumultuously,
rushed upon the guard to whom Stockton had been
given in charge, and, overawing all opposition by their
superior numbers, forcibly rescued him from his bonds.
Ensign Darcy was the leader of this party. He had
found it no difficulty to unite them in a measure which
they boldly assumed to be an act of justice, levelled at
a species of tyranny to which they ought never to
submit. Disaffection had spread much farther among
his troop than Edward Morton imagined. Disasters
had made them forgetful of ancient ties, as well as
previous successes. Recently, their spoils had been
few and inconsiderable, their toils constant and severe,
and their dangers great. This state of things inclined
them all, in a greater or less degree, to be dissatisfied;
and nothing is so easy to the vulgar mind as to ascribe
to the power which governs all the evils which afflict
them. The leaders of the meeting availed themselves
of this natural tendency with considerable art. The
more ignorant and unthinking were taught to believe
that their chief had mismanaged in a dozen instances,
where a different course of conduct would have
burdened
them with spoils. He had operated on the
Wateree
and Santee, when the Congaree and the Saluda
offered the best field for the exercise of their peculiar
practices. That frail masquer, to whom the
cold-blooded
Morton had given in charge the whole
espionage
which he now kept upon his troop, came upon
their place of secret consultation at a moment auspicious
enough for the objects of her watch. They hadthat
is, such of the band (and this involved a majority) as
were disposed to rebel against their present leader
assembled in a little green dell, beside a rivulet which
passed from the highlands of the forest into the swamp.
Here they had kindled a small fire, enough to give
light to their deliberationshad lighted their pipes, and
from their canteens were seasoning their deliberations
with the requisite degree and kind of spirit. With that
carelessness of all precautions which is apt to follow
any decisive departure from the usual restraints of
authority, they had neglected to place sentries around
their place of conference, who might report the
approach
of any hostile footstep,or, if these had been
placed at the beginning, they had been seduced by the
temptations of the debate and the drink to leave their
stations and take their seats along with their comrades.
Mary Clarkson was thus enabled to steal within easy
hearing of all their deliberations. Stockton, with
exemplary forbearance and a reserve that was meant
to be dignified, did not take much part in the
proceedings
.
Ensign Darcy, however, was faithful to his old
professions, and was the principal speaker. He it was
who could best declare what, in particular, had been
the omissions of the chief; and by what mistakes he
had led the troop from point to point, giving them no
rest, little food, and harassing them with constant
dangers and alarms. The extent of his information
surprised the faithful listener, and informed her also of
some matters which she certainly did not expect to
hear. Darcy was supported chiefly by the huge fellow
already known by the name of Bartonthe same
person
who had led the insubordinates in Muggs' cabin,
when Edward Morton, at the last moment, sprang up
to the rescue of his kinsman. This ruffian, whose
violence then had offered opposition to his leader, and
could only be suppressed by the show of an equal
violence
on the part of the latter, had never been entirely
satisfied with himself since that occasion. He was one
of those humble-minded persons of whom the world is
so full, who are always asking what their neighbours
think of them; and being a sort of braggart and bully,
he was annoyed by a consciousness of having lost
some portion of the esteem of his comrades by the
comparatively easy submission which he then rendered
to his leader. This idea haunted him, and he burned
for some opportunity to restore himself in their wonted
regards. Darcy discovered this, and worked upon the
fool's frailty to such a degree, that he was persuaded
to take the lead in the work of mutiny, and to address
his specious arguments to those doubtful persons of
the gang whom the fox-like properties of the ensign
would never have suffered him directly to approach.
Their modes of convincing the rest were easy enough,
since their arguments were plausible, if not true, and
there was some foundation for many of the objections
urged against their present commander.
Here, for example, said Darcy; here he comes
to play the lover at Middleton Place. He dodges about
the young woman when it suits him; and either we
follow him here, and hang about to keep the rebels
from his skirts, or he leaves us where we neither hear
nor see any thing of him for weeks. Meanwhile, we
can do nothingwe dare not to move without him;
and if we do any creditable thing, what's the
consequence
?
Lieutenant Stockton there can tell you. He's
knocked over like a bullock, and arrestedis attacked
by the rebels, makes a narrow escape, comes back like
a good soldier, and is put under arrest again, as if no
punishment was enough for showing the spirit of a
man.
Ah, yes, that wa'nt right of the captain; said one,
with a conclusive shake of the head.
Yes, and all that jist after the lieutenant had been
busy for five days, through storm and rain, looking
after him only, said another.
It's a God's truth, for sartinthe captain's a mighty
changed man now-a-days, said a third.
He aint the same person, that's cl'ar, was the
conviction
of a fourth; and so on through the tale.
And who's going to stand it? cried the fellow
Barton, in a voice of thunder, shivering the pipe in his
hand by a stroke upon the earth that startled more than
one of the doubtful. I'll tell you what, menthere's
no use to beat about the bush when the thing can be
made plain to every man's onderstanding. Here it is,
We're in a mighty bad fix at present, any how; and
the chance is a great deal worse, so long as we stand
here. Here, the whigs are quite too thick for us to
deal with. It's either, we must go up to the mountains
or get down towards the seaboard. I'm told there's
good pickings any way. But here we've mighty nigh
cleaned the crib;there's precious little left. What's
to keep us here, I can't see; but it's easy to see what
keeps Captain Morton here. He's after this gal of
Middleton's; and he'll stay and peep, and dodge, and
come and go, until he gits his own neck in the halter,
and may-be our'n too. Now, if you're of my mind,
we'll leave him to his gal and all he can get by her,
and take horse this very night, and find our way along
the Saludah, up to Ninety-Six. That's my notion;
and as a beginning, I'm willing to say, for the first, let
Harry Stockton be our captain from the jump.
Softly, softly, Barton, said the more wily Darcy;
that can hardly be, unless you mean to put the
garrison
of Ninety-Six at defiance also. You'll find it no
easy matter to show a king's commission for the
lieutenant
;
and it'll be something worse if Ned Morton
faces you just at the moment when Balfour, or Rawdon,
or Stuart, or Cruger, has you under examination. No,
no! There's no way of doing the thing, unless you
can show that Ned Morton's a dead man or a traitor.
Now, then, which shall it be?
Both! roared Barton. I'm for the dead man first.
We can go in a body and see for ourselves that he's
done up for this world, and we can go in the same
body to Cruger at Ninety-Six and show that we want
a captain, and can't find a better man than Harry
Stockton.
But he aint dead, said one of the more simple of
the tribe.
Who says he aint? growled the ruffian Barton
when I say he is? He's dead,dead as a door nail;
and we'll prove it before we go to Cruger. Do you
suppose I'm going with a lie in my mouth? We must
make true what we mean to say.
You're right, Barton, quietly continued Darcy;
but perhaps 'twould be well, men, to let you know
some things more. Now, you must know that
Middleton
Place has been let alone, almost the only house,
since the beginning of the war. Old Middleton was a
mighty great favourite among the people of all these
parts when he was living; and Lord Cornwallis
hearing
that, he gave orders not to do any harm to it or
the people living there. Well, as they were women
only, and had neither father, brother nor son engaged
in the war, there was no provocation to molest them;
and so things stand there as quietly as they did in
`seventy-five.' In that house, men, there's more good
old stamped plate than you'll find in half the country.
I reckon you may get barrels of it, yet not have room
for all. Well, there's the jewels of the womenit's a
guess of mine only, but I reckon a safe one, when I
say that I have no doubt you'll find jewels of Flora
Middleton enough to help every man of us to the West
Indies, and for six months after. Now, it's a question
whether we let the captain carry off this girl with all
her jewels, or whether we come in for a share. It's
my notion it's that he's aiming at. He don't care a
fig what becomes of us if he can carry off this plunder,
and this is the secret of all his doings. I know he's
half mad after the girl, and will have her, though he
takes her with his claws. I move that we have a hand
in the business. It's but to steal up to Briar Park, get
round the place, sound a rebel alarm, and give him a
shot while he's running. After that, the work's easy.
We can then pass off upon the women as a rebel
troop, and empty the closets at our leisure.
The temptations of this counsel were exceeding great.
It was received without a dissenting voice, though there
were sundry doubts yet to be satisfied among the more
prudent or the more timid.
But the boythat strange boy, Henry. He's with
him. What's to be done with him?
Mary Clarkson had been a breathless listener during
the whole of this conference. Her emotions were new
and indescribable. Heretofore, strange to say, she had
never entertained the idea, for a single instant, of
Edward
Morton loving another woman. She had never,
during the marauding life of danger which he pursued,
beheld him in any situation which might awaken her
female fears. Now, the unreserved communication and
bold assertion of Darcy, awakened a novel emotion of
pain within her heart, and a new train of reflection in
her mind.
This, then, she mused to herself, as she
recollected
the conversation that morning with her seducer,
this, then, is the bird that he spoke ofthe sweet
singing bird in that gloomy castle, which he determined
to release. Strange that I had no fear, no thought of
this! But he cannot love herNo! no! he has no
such nature. It is not possible for him to feel as I have
felt.
She strove to listen again, but she heard little more.
Her mind had formed a vague impression of his
danger
,
but it was associated with images equally vague
in form, but far more impressive in shadow, of the fair
woman whose beauty and whose wealth were alike
supposed to be potential over the rugged chief of that
fierce banditti. She began to think, for the first time,
that there was some reason in the complainings of the
troop; but their suggestion to murder the criminal,
revived in all its force, if not her old passion, at least
her habitual feeling of dependence upon him. The idea
of losing for ever the one who, of all the world, she
could now seek, was one calculated to awaken all her
most oppressive fears; and with a strong effort at
composure, she now bent all her attention to ascertain
what were the precise means by which they proposed
to effect their objects. The details of Darcy enlightened
her, and she was about to rise from her lowly position
and hiding place, and steal away to Briar Place, in
order to awaken Morton to his danger, when the
inquiry
touching her own fate commanded her attention.
What of the boy, Henrywhat shall be done with
him? I'm thinking he's the one that reports every
thing to the captain? What shall we do with him?
Cut his throat, to be sure. He is no use to any of
us; and if we silence the captain, we must do for him
also. I reckon they're together now.
The getting rid of the boy is a small matter, said
Darcy; let's settle about the principal first, and the
rest is easily managed. We must set about this affair
seriouslythere must be no traitors. We must swear
by knife, bullet, tree and halterthe old oath!there
must be blood on it! Whose blood shall it be?
Mine! exclaimed Barton, as he thrust forth his
brawny arm to the stroke and drew up the sleeve.
Mary Clarkson was still too much of a woman to wait
and witness the horrid ceremonial by which they bound
themselves to one another; but she could hear the
smooth, silvery voice of Darcy, while she stole away
on noiseless feet, as he severally administered the oath,
upon the gashed arm of the confederate, to each of the
conspirators.
Swear!
And the single response of the first ruffian, as he
pledged himself, struck terror to her heart and gave
fleetness to her footsteps.
By knife, cord, tree and bullet, I swear to be true
to you my brothers in this business;if I fail or betray
you, then let knife, cord, tree or bullet do its work!
I swear!
The terrible sounds pursued her as she fled; but
even then she forgot not what she had heard before, of
that sweet singing bird, in that gloomy cage, to
both of which she was now approaching with an equal
sentiment of curiosity and terror.
VOL. I. 18
CHAPTER XVII.
SOME LOVE PASSAGES AT BRIAR PARK.
Meanwhile
, the chief of the Black Riders pursued
his noiseless way to the scene of his projected
operations
.
Familiar with the neighbourhood, it was not a
difficult matter for him to make his progress with
sufficient
readiness through the gloomy forests. The route
had been often trodden by him beforeoften, indeed,
when the fair Flora Middleton little dreamed of the
proximity of her dangerous loveroften, when not a
star in the sky smiled in encouragement upon his
purposes
.
The stars were smiling nowthe night was
without a cloud, unless it were a few of those light,
fleecy, transparent robes, which the rising moon seems
to fling out from her person, and which float about her
pathway in tributary beauty; and she, herself, the
maiden queen, making her stately progress through
her worshipping dominions, rose with serene aspect
and pure splendour, shooting her silver arrows on
every side into the thicket, which they sprinkled, as
they flew, with sweet, transparent droppings, of the
same glimmering beauty with her own. The winds
were soft or sleeping. The sacred stillness of the
sabbath
prevailed in the air and over the earth, save when
some nightbird flapped a drowsy wing among the
branches which overhung its nest, or, with sudden
scream, shrunk from the slanting shafts of light now
fast falling through the forests. Were these aspects
propitious to the purposes of the outlaw? Were those
smiles for him only? No! While he pursued the
darker passages of the woods, studiously concealing
his person from the light, other and nobler spirits were
abroad enjoying it. Love, of another sort than his,
was no less busy; and, attended by whatever success,
with a spirit far more worthy of the gentler influences
which prevailed equally above the path of both.
The outlaw reached the grounds of the ancient barony.
He had almost followed the course of the river, and he
now stood upon its banks. His path lay through an
old field, now abandoned, which was partly overgrown
by the lob-lolly, or short-leaf pine. The absence of
undergrowth made his progress easy. He soon found
himself beside the solemn grove which had grown up,
from immemorial time, in hallowed security around the
vaulted mansion in which slept the remains of the
venerable
cassique. He penetrated the sacred enclosure,
and, as he had frequently done before, examined the
entrance of the tomb, which he found as easy as usual.
The dead in the wilderness need no locks or bolts for
their security. There are no resurrectionists there to
annoy them. Here he did not long remain. Pressing
forward, he approached the park and grounds lying
more immediately about the mansion; but here a new
occasion for caution presented itself. He found soldiers
on dutysentinels put at proper distances; and,
fastened
to the swinging limbs of half a dozen trees, as
many dragoon horses. He changed his course and
proceeded on another route, with the hope to approach
the dwelling without observation; but here again the
path was guarded. The watch seemed a strict one.
The sentinels were regular, and their responses so
timed, as to leave him no prospect of passing through
the intervals of their rounds. Yet, even if this had
been allowed him, what good could be effected by it?
He could not hope to make himself known to the
person
he sought. He could only hope to see by whom
she was attended. What guest did she entertain?
To know this, his curiosity became intense. He would
probably have risked something to have attained this
knowledge; but, under the close watch which environed
the habitation, endeavour would have been utterly
hopeless
.
This conviction drove him back to the tomb,
with curses on his lips and fury in his heart. He was
not one of those men who had known much, or had
learned to endure any disappointment; and his anger
and anxiety grew almost to fever when, after successive
and frequent attempts to find an open passage to the
house, he was compelled to give up the prospect in
despair. The guests seemed in no hurry to withdraw
the lights in the dwelling were bright and numerous.
He fancied, more than once, as he continued his
survey
,
that he could hear the tones of Flora's harpsichord,
as the winds brought the sounds in the required
direction
.
The twin instincts of hate and jealousy informed
him who was the guest of the maiden. Who could it
be but Clarence Conwaythat kinsman who seemed
born to be his baneto whom he ascribed the loss of
property and position; beneath whose superior virtue
his spirit quailed, and to a baseless jealousy of whom
might in truth be ascribed much of the unhappy and
dishonourable practices which, so far, he had almost
fruitlessly pursued. His was the jealousy rather of
hate than love. Perhaps such a passion as the latter,
according to the opinion of Mary Clarkson, could not
fill the bosom of one so utterly selfish as Edward
Morton. But he had his desires, and the denial of his
objectwhich, to himself, he dignified with the name
of lovewas quite enough to provoke his wrath to
phrenzy.
All, all, has he robbed me of, he muttered through
his closed teeth:The love of parents, the regards of
friends, the attachment of inferiors, the wealth of
kindred
and the love of woman. He drew from me the
smiles of my fatherthe playmate from my side; the
rude woodman, whose blind but faithful attachment
was that of the hound, abandoned me to cling to him;
and now!but I am not sure of this! He is not sure!
Flora Middleton has said nothing yet to justify his
presumption
,
and I have sown some bitter seeds of doubt
in her soul, which, if she be like the rest of her sex,
and if that devil, or saint, that serves him, do not root
up by some miraculous interposition, will yet bring
forth a far different fruit from any which he now hopes
to taste. Let her but be shy and haughtylet him
but show himself sensitive and indignant, and all will
be done. This meeting will prove nothing, and time
gained now is, to me, every thing. In another week,
and I ask no farther help from fortune. If I win her
not by fair word, I win her by bold deeds; and then I
brush the clay of the Congaree for ever from my feet!
The waves of the sea shall separate me for ever from
the doubts and the dangers, numerous and troublesome,
which are increasing around me. This silly girl, too,
whom no scorn can drive from my sideI shall then,
and then only, be fairly rid of her!
He threw himself on the stone coping which
surrounded
the vault, and surrendered himself up to the
bitter meditations which a reference to the past life
necessarily awakens in every guilty bosom. These,
we care not to pursue; but, with the reader's
permission
,
will proceed, without heeding those obstructions
which drove the Chief of the Black Riders to his
lurking
place, to the mansion of the lovely woman, whose
fortunes, though we have not yet beheld her person,
should already have awakened some interest in our
regard.
The instinct of hate in the bosom of Edward Morton
had informed him rightly. The guest of Flora
Middleton
was his hated kinsman. He had reached the barony
that very evening, and had met with that reception
from the inmates of Briar Park, which they were
accustomed
to show to the gentlemen of all parties in that
time of suspicion and cautious policy. The
grandmother
was kind and good-natured as ever; but
Clarence
saw or fancied that he saw in Flora an air of
haughty indifference, which her eyes sometimes
exchanged
for one of a yet more decided feeling. Could
it be anger that flashed at moments from beneath the
long dark eye-lashes of that high-browed beauty? Was
it indignation that gave that curl to her rich and rosy
18*
lips;and made her tones, always sweet as a final
strain of music, now sharp, sudden, and almost stern?
The eyes of Clarence looked more than once the inquiry
which he knew not how to make in any other way;
but only once did the dark-blue orbs of Flora encounter
his for a prolonged moment; and then he thought that
their expression was again changed to one of sorrow.
After that, she resolutely evaded his glance; and the
time, for an hour after his arrival, was passed by him
in a state of doubtful solicitude, and by Flora, as he
could not help thinking, under a feeling of restraint and
excessive circumspection, which was new to both of
them, and painful in the last degree to him. All the
freedoms of their old intercourse had given way to
cold, stiff formalities; and, in place of Flora from his
lips, and Clarence from hers, the forms of address
became as rigid and ceremonious between them as the
most punctilious Puritan of that day could insist upon.
Flora Middleton was rather remarkable than
beautiful
.
She was a noble specimen of the Anglo Saxon.
Glowing with health, but softened by grace; warmed by
love, yet not obtrusive in her earnestness. Of a temper
quick, energetic, and decisive; yet too proud to deal in
the language either of anger or complainttoo delicate
in her own sensibilities to outrage, by impudent haste,
the feelings of others. Living at a time, and in a
region, where life was full of serious purposes and
continual
trials, she was superior to those small tastes and
petty employments, which dishonour too greatly the
understandings of her sex, and diminish dreadfully its
importance to man and to society. Her thoughts were
neither too nice for, nor too superior to, the business
and the events of the time. She belonged to that
wonderful
race of Carolina women, above all praise, who
could minister, with equal propriety and success, at
those altars for which their fathers, and husbands, and
brothers foughtwho could tend the wounded, nurse
the sick, cheer the dispirited, arm the warrior for the
fieldnay, sometimes lift spear and sword in sudden
emergency, and make desperate battle, in compliance
with the requisitions of the soul, nerved by tenderness,
and love, and serious duty, to the most masculine
exertionsutterly forgetful of those effeminacies of the
sex, which are partly due to organization and partly
to the arbitrary, and, too frequently, injurious laws of
society. In such circumstances as characterized the
time of which we write, women as well as men,
became
superior to affectations of every kind. The
ordinary
occupations of life were too grave to admit of
them. The mind threw off its petty humours with
disdain, and where it did not, the disdain of all other
minds was sure to attend it. Flora never knew
affectations
she
was no fine ladyhad no humoursno
vegetable life; but went on vigorously enjoying time in
the only way, by properly employing it. She had her
tastes, and might be considered by some persons as
rather fastidious in thembut this fastidiousness was
nothing more than method. Her love of order was one
of her domestie virtues. But, though singularly
methodical
for her sex, she had no hum-drum notions;
and, in society, would have been the last to be
suspected
of being very regular in any of her habits. Her
animation was remarkableher playful humourwhich
took no exceptions to unrestraintfound no fault with
the small follies of one's neighbour; yet never
trespassed
beyond the legitimate bounds of amusement.
That she showed none of this animationthis humour
on the present occasion, was one of the chief sources
of Clarence Conway's disquietude. Restraint was so
remarkable in the case of one, whose frank, voluntary
spirit was always ready with its music, that he
conjured
up the most contradictory notions to account
for it.
Are you sick? he asked; do you feel unwell?
was one of his inquiries, as his disquiet took a new
form of apprehension.
Sickno! what makes you fancy such a thing,
Colonel Conway? Do I look so?
No; but you seem dullnot in spiritssomething
must have happened
Perhaps something has happened, cousin Clarence:
this was the first phrase of kindness which reminded
Clarence of old times. He fancied she began to soften.
Cousin Clarence, was one of the familiar forms of
address which had been adopted by the maiden some
years previously, when, mere children, they first grew
intimate together.
But I am not sick, she continued, and still less
ought you to consider me dull. Such an opinion,
Clarence, would annoy many a fair damsel of my
acquaintance.
But, on that head, Flora, you are too secure to
suffer it to annoy you.
Perhaps I ambut you have certainly lost the
knack of saying fine things. The swamps have
impaired
your politeness. That last phrase has not
bettered
your speech, since I am at liberty to take it either
as a reproach or a compliment.
Can there be a doubt which?As a compliment
surely. But let me have occasion for another, the
meaning of which shall be less liable to
misconstruction
.
Let me lead you to the harpsichord.
Excuse menot to-night, Clarence; and her
present
reply was made with recovered rigidity of manner.
If not to-night, Flora, I know not when I shall hear
you againperhaps not for monthsperhaps, never!
I go to Ninety-Six to-morrow.
Her manner softened as she replied;
Ah! do you, Clarence;and there, at present, lies
the whole brunt of the war. I should like to play for
you, Clarencebut I cannot. You must be content
with music of drum and trumpet for a while.
Why, Florayou never refused me before?
Truebut
But, one piece?
Do not ask me again. I cannotI will not play
for you to-nightnay, do not interrupt me, Clarence
my harpsichord is in tuneand I am not seeking for
apologies. I tell you I will not play for you to-night,
and, perhaps, I will never play for you again.
The young colonel of cavalry was astounded.
FloraFlora Middleton! was his involuntary
exclamation
.
The venerable grandmother echoed it, though
her tones were those of exhortation, not of surprise.
FloraFlora, my childwhat would you do? she
continued with rebuking voice and warning finger.
Nay mother, said the maiden assuringlylet
me have my own way in this. I like frankness, and if
Clarence be what he always seemed, and we always
believed himhe will like it too. I am a country girl,
and may be permitted a little of the simplicityyou call
it bluntness, perhapswhich is natural to one.
Flora, what can be the meaning of this? demanded
the lover with unaffected earnestness and astonishment.
In what have I offended you? For there is some such
meaning in your words.
The maiden looked to her grandmother, but did not
answer; and Conway, though greatly excited, could
readily perceive that she laboured under feelings which
evidently tried her confidence in herself, and tested all
her strength. A deep suffusion overspread her cheek,
the meaning of which, under other circumstances, he
might have construed favourably to his suit.
Meanwhile
,
the old lady nodded her head with a look of
mixed meaning, which one, better read in the
movements
of her mind, would have found to signifyGo
through with what you have begun, since you have
already gone so far. You cannot halt now.
So indeed did it seem to be understood by the
maiden; for she instantly recovered herself and
continued
:
Give me your arm, Clarence, and I will explain all.
I am afraid I have overtasked myself, but the orphan,
Clarence Conway, must assert her own rights and
character
,
though it may somewhat impair, in the
estimation
of the stronger sex, her pretensions to feminine
delicacy.
You speak in mysteries, Flora, was the answer of
the lover;surely the orphan has no wrong to fear
at my handsand what rights of Flora Middleton are
there, disputed or denied by me, which it becomes her
to assert with so much solemnity, and at such a fearful
risk?
Come with me, and you shall know all.
She took his arm, and motioning her head
expressively
to her grandmother, led the way to the spacious
portico, half embowered by gadding vinesalready
wanton with a thousand flowers of the budding season
which formed the high and imposing entrance to the
ancient dwelling. The spot was one well chosen for
the secrets of young loversa home of buds, and
blossoms
,
and the hallowing moonlight:quiet above in
the skyquiet on the earth;a scene such as prompts
the mind to dream that there may be griefs and strifes
at a distancerumours of war and bloodshed in
barbarian
lands, and of tempests that will never trouble ours.
Clarence paused as they emerged into the sweet natural
shadows of the spot.
How have I dreamed of these scenes, Florathis
spotthese flowers, and these only! My heart has
scarcely forgotten the situation of a single bud or leaf.
All appears now as I fancy it nightly in our long rides
and longer watches in the swamp.
She answered with a sigh:
Can war permit of this romance, Clarence? Can
it be possible that he who thinks of blood, and battle,
and the near neighbourhood of the foe, has yet a
thought to spare to ladies' bowers, vines, blossoms and
such woman fancies as make up the pleasures of her
listless moods, and furnish, in these times, her only,
and, perhaps, her best society.
I think of them as tributary to her only, Flora.
Perhaps I should not have thought of these, but that
you were also in my thoughts.
No more, Clarence; and you remind me of the
explanation
which I have to makeand to demand. Bear
with me for a momentit calls for all my resolution.
She seated herself upon a bench beneath the vines,
and motioned him to a place beside her. After a brief
delaya tribute to the weakness of her sexshe began
as follows:
Clarence Conway, before I saw you to-night, I had
resolved henceforward to regard and treat you as the
most indifferent stranger that ever challenged the
hospitality
of my father's dwelling. But I have not been
able to keep my resolution. Your coming to-night,
reminds me so much of old times, when I had every
reason to respectwhy should I not say it?to
like
you, Clarence, that I feel unwilling to put you off as a
stranger, without making such explanations as will
justify me in this course. Briefly then, Clarence
Conway
,
some things have reached my ears, as if spoken
by you, and of mesuch things as a vain young man
might be supposed likely to say of any young woman
who has suffered him to think that she had thoughts
for nothing beside himself. I will not tell you, Clarence,
that I believed all this.I could not dareI did not
wish to believe it;but, I thought it not impossible that
you had spoken of me, perhaps too familiarly;
without
contemplating the injury you might do me. Now,
if you know any thing of a maiden's heart, Clarence
Conwaynay, if you knew any thing of mine, you
would readily imagine what I must have felt on hearing
this. The burning blushes on my cheeks now
painfully
as I feel themwere as nothing to the galling
sting of the moment when I heard this story.
But you did not believe it, Flora!
Believe it, no!not all, at least
None! none! repeated the youth, with stern
emphasis
,
as he laid his hand upon her arm, and looked
her in the face with such an expression as falsehood
never yet could assume. That I should speak this of
you, and that you should believe it. Flora Middleton,
are things which I should have fancied equally
impossible
!
Need I say that it is all falsethoroughly false
that your name has never passed my lips but with
feelings of the profoundest reverencethatbut I blush
too, at the seeming necessity of saying all this, and
saying it to youI thoughtI could have hoped, Flora
Middleton, that you, at least, knew me better than to
doubt. The necessity of this explanation, next to the
sorrow of having given pain to you, is the keenest pang
which you could make me suffer.
Be not angry, Clarence, she said gently
remember
what society exacts of my sexremember
how much of our position depends upon the breath of
man;our tyrant too oftenalways our sole judge
while we dwell upon the earth. His whisper of power
over us, is our death;the death of our prideof that
exclusiveness of which he, himself, is perhaps, the most
jealous being; and whether the tale of his freedom be
true or nothow great is our perilhow keen the sting
how formidable the sarcasm. I say this to account for
the promptness of my resentment. I tell you, Clarence
Conway, that a woman of my frank nature, is compelled
to be resentful, if she would subdue the slanderer to
silence. Slander is of such mushroom growth, yet
spreads over so large a surface, that it is needful at
once to check the first surmises, and doubts, and
insinuations
with which it begins its fungous, but poisonous
existence. My feeling on this subjectmy keen
jealousy
of my own positiona jealousy the more natural,
as, from the frankness of my disposition, I am frequently
liable to be misunderstood, has possibly led me to do
you injustice. Even when this reached my ears, I did
not believe it altogether. I thought it not improbable,
however, that you had spoken of me among your
friends, and
Forgive me that I interrupt you, Flora. I feel too
much pain at what you saytoo much annoyanceto
suffer you to go on. Let me finish my assurances.
I shall employ but few words, and they shall be final,
ornothing! I have no friends to whom I should
ever speak a falsehood of any kindnone to whom
I would ever utter, with unbecoming familiarity, the
name of Flora Middleton. If I have spoken of you in
the hearing of others, it has been very seldom; only,
perhaps, when it seemed needful for me to do so
perhaps
never more than once; and then never in
disparagement
of that modesty which is the noblest
characteristic
of your sex. But!
He paused! He was reminded at this moment of
the late conference which he had with Edward Conway.
In that conference he had certainly asserted a superior
right, over his kinsman, to approach Flora Middleton
with love. This assertion, however, only contemplated
the relative position of the brothers, one to the other;
and was accompanied by an express disclaimer, on the
part of Clarence, of any influence over the maiden
herself
;
but the recollection of this circumstance increased
the difficulties in the way of an explanation, unless by
the adoption of a single and very simplebut a very
direct coursewhich is always apt to be regarded as
one of great peril by all youthful lovers. Clarence
Conway was one of those men who know only the
Alexandrine method of getting through the knots of the
moral Gordius.
I
have
spoken of you, Floranay, I have spoken of
you, and in reference to the most delicate subject in the
history of a woman's heart. Thus far I make my
confession
,
and will forbear with your permission saying
moresaying what I mean to sayuntil I have craved
of you the name of him who has thus ventured to
defame me.
I cannot tell you, Clarence.
Cannot, Flora?Cannot!
Will not
, is what I should say, perhaps; but I have
used those words once already, to-night, when I felt
that they must give you pain; and I would have
forborne
their use a second time. I can, certainly, tell
you from whom I heard these things, but I will not.
And why not, Flora? Would you screen the
slanderer?
Yes!For a very simple reason;I would not
have you fight him, Clarence.
Enough, Flora, that I know the man. None could
be so base but the person whom you know as Edward
Conway, but whom I know
He pausedhe could not make the revelation.
VOL. I. 19
Ha! How! What know you of Edward Conway!
That which makes me blush to believe that he is
my father's son. But my knowledge is such, Flora,
that I will not tell it you. It differs from yours in this
respect, that, unhappily, it is trueall trueterribly
true! Know, then, that, to himto Edward Conway
long ago, did I declare what I once already presumed
to declare to youthat I loved you
Let me not hear you, Clarence, said the maiden
timidly, rising as she spoke. But, he took her hand,
and with a gentle pressure restored her to her seat
beside him.
I must. It is now necessary for my exculpation.
Before he saw you, he knew that I loved you, and was
the profligate confederate of my unsuspecting affections.
He betrayed them. He sought you thenceforward
with love himself. Words of angerblows, almost
followed between us; and though we did not actually
reach that issue, yet suspicion, and jealousy, and
hate, are now the terms on which we stand to each
other. He poured this cursed falsehood into your
ears, I have reason to think, but ten days ago.
Within the same space of time I have saved his life.
To him, only, have I spoken of you in terms liable to
misrepresentation. I did not speak of having claims
upon you, Flora, but upon him;I charged him with
treachery to my trust, though I did not then dream
that he had been the doubly-dyed traitor that I have
since found him.
Let us return to the parlour, Clarence.
No, Flora, said the youth, with mild and mournful
accents. No, Flora Middleton, let our understanding
be final. To-morrow I go to Ninety-Six, and God
knows what fate awaits me there. You, perhaps, can
assist in determining it, by the response which you
make to-night. I wrote you by John Bannister, Flora,
I know that you received that letter,yet you sent
me no answer.
Let me confess, also, Clarence:But three days
before I received your letter, I was told of this.
Ha! Has the reptile been so long at his web?
exclaimed the youthBut I will crush him in it yet.
Beware! Oh! Clarence Conway, beware of what
you say. Beware of rash vows and rash performances.
Do you forget that the man of whom you speak is your
brotherthe son of your father?
Why should I remember that which he has himself
forgotten;nay, which he repudiates with bitterest
curses, and which the black deeds of his wretched life,
of which now you know nothing,has repudiated
more effectually than all. But I would not speak of
him now, Flora. I would, if possible, exclude all
bitterness
from my thoughtas, in speaking to you, I would
exclude it from my lips. Hear me, Flora. You know
the service I am sent upon. You can imagine some
of its dangers. The employment now before me is
particularly so. The strife along the Saluda now is
one of no ordinary character. It is a strife between
brothers, all of whom have learned to hate as I do, and
to seek to destroy with an appetite of far greater anxiety.
The terms between whig and tory, now, are death only.
No quarter is demandednone is given. Horrible,
horrible!but I know it all.
The final issue is at hand, and victory is almost in
our grasp. The fury of the tories increases with their
despair. They feel that they must fly the country, and
they are accordingly drenching it with blood. I speak
to you, therefore, with the solemnity of one who may
never see you more. But if I do, Flora, dear Flora
if I survive this bloody campaign, may I hope that then
these doubts all dispersed, these slanders disproven
you will look on me with favour; you will smileyou
will be mine; mine onlyall mine!
The tremors of the soft white hand which he grasped
within his own assured the lover of the emotion in her
breast. Her bosom heaved for an instant, but she was
spared the necessity of making that answer, which,
whether it be no or yes, is equally difficult for any
young damsel's utterance. A signal whistle sounded
from without;oncetwicethrice;a bustle was
heard among the few dragoons who were stationed by
the prudent commander about the premises; and, a
moment after, the subdued tones of the faithful Supple
Jack apprised his captain that danger was at hand.
Speak!speak to me, Flora, ere I leave youere
I leave you, perhaps, for ever! Speak to me!tell me
that I have not prayed and worshipped in vain. Send
me not forth, doubtful or hopeless. If it be
Sweet, indeed, to his heart, were the tremulous
beatings
which he distinctly heard of hers. They said all
that her lips refused to say. Yet never was heart more
ready to respond in the affirmativenever were lips
more willing to declare themselves. One reflection
alone determined her not to do so. It was a feeling of
feminine delicacy that prompted her, for the time, to
withhold the confession of feminine weakness.
What!such was the reflection as it passed
through her mind,bring him to these shades to hear
such a confession! Impossible! What will he think
of me? No! no!not to-night. Not here, at least!
She was still silent, but her agitation evidently
increased
;
yet not more than that of her lover. The
summons of the faithful scout was again repeated. The
circumstances admitted of no delay.
Oh, speak to me, dearest Flora. Surely you cannot
need any new knowledge of what I am, or of the love I
bear you.
No, no! But, Clarence, I will not answer you
to-nightnot nownot
here!
The last word was
spoken with uncommon energy, as she moved to retire.
Leave me not thusbut one wordone! Say, at
least, that I may hope.
Her lips were inflexible; but if ever hand yet spoke
the meaning of its kindred heart, then did the soft,
shrinking hand which he grasped nervously in his own,
declare the meaning of hers. It said hope onlove
on! as plainly as maiden finger ever said it yet; and
this was alland, perhaps, enough, as a first answer
to a young beginnerwhich she then vouchsafed him,
as she glided into the apartment. In the next moment
the faithful Supple Jack, clearing, at a single bound,
the height from the terrace to the upper balcony, in
which the interview had taken place, breathed into the
half-oblivious senses of his commander the hurried
words
The Britishthe British are upon us! We have
not a moment to lose!
19*
CHAPTER XVIII.
A CONFERENCE IN THE TOME.
These
words at once awoke the soldier to activity.
Clarence Conway was not the man to become subdued
by amaryllis in the shade, nor meshed, fly-like, in
the tangles of any Nra's hair. A new mood
possessed
him with the communication of his faithful scout,
who, by the way, also performed the duties of his
lieutenant
.
Get your men instantly to horse, Jack Bannister,
and send them forward on the back track to the river;
was the prompt command of the superior.
Done a'ready, colonel, was the respectful answer.
Good;and, now, for your report.
The examination which followed was brief, rapid,
and comprehensive. Though fond of long speeches
usually, Jack Bannister was yet the model of a man of
business. He could confine himself, when needful, to
the very letter.
From whence came the enemy?above or below?
Below, sir.
What force do your scouts report to you?
Large!I reckon it's Rawdon's whole strength;
but the advance only is at hand.
Rawdon, ha! He goes then to the relief of `
Ninety-Six
.'
I trust he goes too late. But
our
business is
scarce with him. What cavalry has he? Did you
learn
that?
It's mighty small, I'm thinking; but we can't hear
for sartin. It's had a monstrous bad cutting up, you
know, at Orangeburg, and don't count more, I reckon,
than sixty men, all told. That's the whole force of
Coffin, I know.
We must manage that, then! It's the only mode
in which we can annoy Rawdon and baffle his objects.
Between `Briar Park' and `Ninety-Six' we should
surely pick up all of his flock,and
must!
Are the
scouts in? All?
All but FinleyI'm dub'ous he's cut off below.
They've caught him napping, I reckon.
If so, he has paid, before this, the penalty of his
nap. We must be careful not to incur like penalties.
We have nothing to do but to draw off quietly from
Briar Park, taking the back track by the river, and
plant ourselves in waiting a few miles above. There
are a dozen places along the road where we can bring
them into a neat ambush, which will enable us to empty
their saddles. What do the lower scouts say of their
order of march?
Precious little! They had to run for itCoffin's
cavalry scouring pretty considerably ahead. But they
keep up a mighty quick step. It's a forced march, and
the cavalry is half a mile or more in advance.
They march without beat of drum?
Or blast of bugle;so quiet you can hardly hear
the clatter of a sabre. Nothing but the heavy tread of
their feet.
Enough. As you have sent the troop forward, let
your scouts file off quietly after them. Keep close
along the river, and let them all be in saddle when I
reach them at the end of the Causey. Rawdon will
probably make the `Barony' his place of rest to-night.
He must have marched fifty miles since last midnight.
Pity we had not known of this! That fellow, Finley
he was a sharp fellow, too,but no matter! Go you
now, Bannister. Have my horse in readiness by the
old vault; and let your scouts, in filing off, dismount
and lead their horses, that there may be no unnecessary
clatter of hoofs. Away, nowI will but say farewell
to Mrs. Middleton and Flora.
Tell 'em good-by for me, too, colonel, if you please;
for they've always been mighty genteel in the way they've
behaved to me, and I like to be civil.
Clarence promised him, and the excellent fellow
disappeared
,
glad to serve the person whom he most
affectionately
loved. Clarence then proceeded to the
apartment
in which the ladies were sitting; and suffering
under the natural excitement produced by intelligence,
always so startling in those days, as the approach of a
British army. Brief words at parting were allowed to
the lovers; and whether Mrs. Middleton conjectured, or
had been told by Flora of what had taken place between
them, the old lady was civil enough to leave the couple
together without the restraint of her maternal presence.
Preliminaries, at such moments, among sensible people
are usually dispeused with.
You will not answer me, Flora?
Spare me, Clarencenot now.
Now, now!think, dearest Flora, of the
circumstances
under which I leave you;the force that drives
me from your presence! Remember the danger that
follows my footsteps, and the dangers which I am bound
to seek. I may never again behold youmay lose, in
the skirmish of the dawnthe hope, the fear, the
thousand
dreams and anxieties which now possess and
alternately
afflict and delight my heart. Let me not go forth
trembling with this doubt. But one wordone only
which shall fill my bosom with new spirit, strength and
courage.Speak, dearest Florabut a single word!
Ah, Clarence, urge me not! What I should say,
might have a very different effect upon you;might
subdue your spirit, disarm your strength;make your
heart to waver in its courage;might
Enough! enough!I ask for no other answer! he
exclaimed with bright eyes and a bounding spirit.
Nothing
could
do that, but the fear of losing a treasure
suddenly won and so precious, over all things, in my
sight. But I trust that this sweet conviction, dear Flora,
will have no such effect upon my spirit. If, before, I
fought only for my countryI now fight for love and
country!and the double cause should occasion double
courage. Farewellfarewell!God be with you, and
his angels watch over you, as fondly, as faithfully, and
with more ability to serve you, than your own Clarence.
Farewell, farewell!
Hastily seizing her hand, he carried it to his lips with
a fervent pressure; then, elastic with new emotions of
delight, that made him heedless and thoughtless of the
danger, he hurried downwards into the court-yard below.
The area lay in utter silence. The scouts had gone, the
sentinels withdrawn; and, with a single glance up to the
apartment where he had left the lady of his love, the
youthful partisan took his way after his lieutenant. Let
us only follow him so far as to look after other agents in
our narrative, who lie upon his route, and whom we may
no longer leave unnoticed.
Long and wearisome, indeed, had been the hour of
anxious watch which the Chief of the Black Riders had
maintained over the barony, in his gloomy hiding place.
Twenty times, in that period, had he emerged from the
tomb, and advanced towards the dwelling of the living.
But his course was bounded by the military restraints
which the timely prudence of Conway, and the
watchfulness
of Bannister, had set around the mansion. Vainly,
from the cover of this or that friendly tree, did his eyes
strain to pierce the misty intervals, and penetrate the
apartment, whose gay lights and occasional shadows
were all that were distinguishable. Disappointed each
time, he returned to his place of concealment, with
increasing
chagrin; plunging, in sheer desperation, down
into its awful and dark recesses, which to him presented
no aspects either of awe or darkness. At length,
however
,
the sound of a movement near the mansion
awakened
in him a hope that his tedious watch would
shortly end. Slight though the noises were, under the
cautious management of Bannisterthe calling in of the
sentries, and their withdrawal, necessarily reached his
ears, and prepared him for the movement of the troop
which followed. Each trooper leading his steed with
shortened rein, they deployed slowly beside the tomb,
and he was compelled, during their progress, to observe
the most singular quiet.
The vaulted habitations of the dead were no
unfrequent
hiding-places in those days for the living, and to
troopers, trained in the swamp warfare, to convert every
situation of obscurity and darkness into a place of retreat
or ambush, the slightest circumstance or movement on his
part, he well knew, would result in their sudden search
of his gloomy house of refuge. Through a chink in the
decaying door of the vault, he watched their progress;
and when they had gone from sight, swallowed up in
the deep blank of the forest along the margin of the
river, he once more ascended to the light. His path
now promised to be free. He knew the troop to be
one of his brother's regimenta small though famous
squadronThe Congaree Bluesproverbial for bold
riding, happy horsemanship, and all of that
characteristic
daring which every where marked the southern
cavalry throughout the war. The uniform he readily
distinguished, though not the persons. He fancied that
his brother was among them; and hearing no farther
sound, with that impatience which was natural to his
desires, and which was necessarily increased by the
restraints to which they had been subjected, he
prepared
to go boldly forward to the mansion. But the
coast was not yet clear. He had advanced a few
paces only, when he heard the faint, but mellow tones
of a distant bugle, rising and falling in sweet harmony
with the light zephyrs which bore them to his ears.
These sounds now furnished him with the true reason
for his brother's flight. The enemies of his kinsman,
according to his profession, were not unlikely to be his
friends; yet the business upon which the heart of
Edward
Morton was set, and the position in which he
then stood, were such as to make the presence of a
British force almost as little desirable to him as had
been that of his brother. His present objects admitted
of no friendships. Thoroughly selfish, they could only
be prosecuted at the expense of the cause in which he
was engaged, and at the sacrifice of that band with
which, for life and death, his own lifeif his oath to
them were of any valuewas solemnly and
indissolubly
connected. Bitterly, therefore, and with renewed
vexation, did he listen to the sweet but startling tones
of that sudden trumpet. Cursing the course of events
which, so far, that night, seemed destined to baffle his
purposes, he stood for a few moments, in doubt, upon
the spot where the sounds first struck his ears;
hesitating
whether to go forward boldly, or at once return
to his place of safety. To adopt the former course,
was, in his present undisguised condition, to declare to
Flora Middleton the fact, which he had hitherto
studiously
concealed from her knowledge, of his connexion
with the British cause. Such a revelation, he well
knew, would, in the mind of one so religiously devoted
to the whig party as was that maiden, operate most
unfavourably against his personal pretensions, on the
success of which, he still flattered himself, he might, in
some degree, rely. While he doubted and deliberated
on his course, he was startled by other sounds, which
warned him of the necessity of a prompt determination.
The heavy footsteps of a man, whose tread was
measured
like that of a soldier, were heard approaching
through the grove that extended from the dwelling in
the direction of the tomb; and the outlaw moved
hurriedly
back to the shelter he had left. He was scarcely
rapid enough in his movements. The person
approaching
was no other than Clarence Conway. He had just
parted, as we have seen, with Flora Middleton. Her
last words were still sounding in his ears like some
sweet, melancholy music which the language of one
heart delivers, in love, for the consolation of another.
The last pressure of her hand seemed still to make
itself felt from his own, upward, to his heart, with a
sensation which carried a thrill of joy to its deepest
recesses
.
With the bugle of the enemy sounding on the
track behind him, he had then no thought, no feeling
for the enemyand, certainly, no fear. Foes, at that
moment, if not forgotten, awakened no emotion in his
bosom which a smile of indifference upon his lips did
not sufficiently express. From musings, the dreamy
languor of which may be readily imagined, he was
awakened by the sudden glimpse he had caught of his
kinsman's person. The mere human outline was all
that he beheld, and this for an instant only. At first,
he was disposed to fancy that it was one of his own
dragoons, all of whom had gone forward in that
direction
,
and one of whom might have been left in the
hurry of his comrades, or possibly detached on some
special service. But the retreat of the outlaw had been
too precipitatetoo like a flightnot to awaken
instantly
the suspicions of the partisan. To challenge
the fugitive by the usual summons was probably to
alarm his own enemies, and was a measure not to be
thought of. To hurry in pursuit was the only mode of
ascertaining his object, and this mode was put in
execution
as promptly as resolved upon. The partisan
rushed forward, but the object of his pursuit was no
longer to be seen. The old field, on one hand, was
bare and desolatethe park, on the left, did not attract
the youth's attention. Obviously, the melancholy grove
which led to and environed the ancient vault, was that
to which the footsteps of the fugitive would most
naturally
incline. To this he pursued, until he stood beside
the tomb. Then, and not till then, did he speak,
challenging
the fugitive to stand whom he could no
longer see. The summons was heard the moment
after the outlaw had buried himself in his place of
concealment
.
The tones of his brother's voice arrested
the outlawthat voice awakened all his rage and hate,
while reminding him of his gage of battle; and when he
remembered that Clarence Conway had but that instant
left the presence of the woman whom he sought, and
whom he had not been permitted to seewhen he
remembered
that he was his hated rival, and when he thought
that his lips might even then be warm with the fresh
kisses of hersthe feelings in his heart were no longer
governable! Uniting with that gnawing impatience,
which had grown almost to a fever, and was a frenzy,
under his late constraint, they determined him against
all hazards; and, darting from the vault, he answered
the summons of his foe with a hiss of scorn and
defiance
.
Stand thou!Clarence Conwaywretch and rebel!
We are met on equal terms at last.
Ay, cried the other, no ways startled at the sudden
apparition; well met! and as the outlaw sprang
forward
from the tomb with uplifted dagger, Clarence met
him with his own. A moment's collision only had
ensued
,
when the latter struck his weapon into the mouth
of his enemy, with a blow so forceful as to precipitate
him back into the cavern which he had just left.
Clarence
sprang into the tomb after him, and there, in the
deep darkness of the scene, among the mouldering
coffins
and dry bones of the dead, they grappled in deadly
desperation. Death, and the presence of its awful
trophies, had no terrors for either. The living
passions
of the heart were triumphant over their
threatening
shadows, and the struggle was renewed between
the two with a degree of hate and fury that found
increase rather than diminution from the solemn and
dark associations by which they were encompassed.
But few words were spoken, and those only in the
breathing intervals which their struggles left them.
The language of the outlaw was that of vituperation
and hate; that of Conway, an indignation natural to
feelings which revolted at the brutal and sanguinary
rage of his enemy, tempered, at the same time, with
equal scorn, and resolution. In Clarence Conway, the
chief of the Black Riders saw only the embodied form
of all the evil influences which he had felt or fancied
from his boyhood; the long engendered envy and
malice of twenty years finding, at length, its
unqualified
expression. In his eyes, he was the hateful rival
who had beguiled from him with equal facility, the
regards of parents, the attachments of friends, the
smiles of fortune and the love of woman. Clarence,
on the other hand, no longer saw the kinsman of his
youththe son of the same fatherin the person of
the outlaw; or, if he remembered the ties of blood at
VOL. I. 20
all, it was only to warm his hostility the more against
one who had so commonly outraged, and so cruelly
dishonoured them! It was as the betrayer of his country,
and the associate of the most savage outlaws that ever
arrayed themselves against her peace and liberty, that
he struck, and struck with fatal design to destroy and
extirpate! Nor need it be denied that these motives
were stimulated by the conviction that he himself fought
for life, with a personal foe who had threatened him
with all the haunting dangers of an enduring and
bloody enmitya hatred born without cause, and
nourished without restraintwarmed by bad passions,
mean rivalry, and a suspicious selfishness which no
labour of love could render reasonable, and which could
only finally cease in the death of one or both of the
combatants. The incoherent language, the broken
words, and fiendish threatenings of the outlaw, left
nothing
on this subject to conjecture; and while the two
writhed together in their narrow apartment, the
otherwise
horrible stillness of their strife might be thought
relieved and rendered human by the bursts of passion
and invective which fell the while from the lips of both.
But these caused no interruption to the conflict. They
fought only with daggers, though both were provided
with sword and pistol. A mutual sense of the proximity
of those whom neither wished to alarm, rendered them
careful not to employ weapons which could draw a
third party to the scene of strife. Besides, the dagger
was the only weapon that might be employed in their
limited area with any propriety. This weapon, deadly
in the close struggle as it usually is, was rendered less
effectual in the imperfect light of the place, and by the
baffling readiness of their rival skill. They both felt
that the struggle must be fatal, and did not, accordingly,
suffer their rage to disarm their providence and caution.
Still, several wounds had been given and received on
either side. One of these had penetrated the right arm
of the partisan, but the point of the dagger had been
diverted, and the wound was one of the flesh only, not
deep nor disabling. The outlaw had been less
fortunate
.
That first blow, which he had received in the
mouth at the entrance of the vault, had necessarily
influenced the combat as first blows usually do; and
though not of serious hurt, for the point of the weapon
found resistance against his clenched teeth, two of
which were broken, still it seriously affected the
feelings
of the parties. The one it encouraged, the other
it provoked to increased anger, which impaired his
coolness. A second and third wound in each of his
arms had followed in the vault, and a moment came in
which a fourth promised to be final. Clarence had
grappled closely with his kinsman, had borne him
backward
,
and succeeded in prostrating him, face
upward
,
upon the pile of coffins which rose in the centre
of the tomb. Here, with his knee upon the breast of
his enemy, one hand upon his throat, and the other
bearing on high the already dripping steel, the stroke
and the death seemed equally inevitable. So, indeed,
the outlaw considered it; and the language of his lips
at that moment of his greatest peril, spoke more
decisively
for his manhood than, perhaps, it had ever done
before.
Strike! he cried; I fear you not! The devil
you have served has served you faithfully in turn! I
ask you not for mercyI loathe you, Clarence
Conway
I
loathe and curse you to the last. Strike then,
as I should have stricken you had the chance fallen to
my lot.
The weakness of a human and a social sentiment
made the youth hesitate. He shivered as he thought
upon the ties of bloodties which
he
could never
entirely forget, however much they might be
scorned
by his profligate brother. He was still his
father's sonhe would have sparedhe wished to
spare him. While he hesitated, a new and desperate
effort was made by the prostrate outlaw. Hope and
fear united for a last and terrible struggle. He half
rosehe grasped the arm with which Clarence held
him, with demoniac strength, and flinging himself
upward
,
with the exercise of all that muscle which he
possessed in almost equal degree with his brother, he
almost shook himself free from the hold which the
latter
had taken upon him. It was then that the dagger
of Clarence descended!then, when it became obvious
that no indulgence could be given to his foe without
danger to himself; but the blow, even then, was not final
not fatal! It touched no vital region. The desperate
effort of the outlaw, though it failed in its object, effected
another, which operated to his partial safety. The
mouldering
coffins upon which he was stretched, yielded
beneath
his gigantic struggles, sank under the violence and
pressure, and ere the blow reached the heart of the
threatened victim, came down, with a fearful crash, in
fragments upon the damp floor of the vault. The
dagger-point
barely grazed the breast of the falling man;
and Clarence, still grappling with his foe, and grappled
by him in turn, was dragged downward to the earth,
and the two lay together, for an instant, without strife,
among the crushed and bleached bones of a bygone
generation. Both were breathless, but there was no
mitigation of their fury. With some difficulty they
scrambled to their feet, separate, but only to renew
their terrible embrace.
Let there be an end to this! said Morton, hoarsely.
Let us go forth into the moonlightwe can do nothing
here, it seems.
Ayany where! was the reply of the other;
but let it be quickly. I have not a moment to spare.
A moment should suffice for either; and would
have done had there been sufficient light for the
business
.
So far, Clarence Conway, you have had the
matter all to yourself. But there is a day for every
dog, they tell us; and though still there be no daylight,
I trust that my day is at hand. Lead the way; I am
ready. Let the dagger still be the weapon. It is a
sure one, and not much clatter. Besides, it brings us
so much the nigher to each other, which is brotherly,
you know.
The sterner, perhaps the nobler, features of the
outlaw
stood out in bolder relief at the moment which he
himself believed was one of his greatest danger.
Morton
was not deficient in animal courage. It was only
less often apparent, because, like the Italian, he
preferred
the practice of a subtler agent. A fierce laugh
concluded his attempt at playfulness. To this the heart
of Clarence gave back no response. Though not less
fearless than his brothernay, though greatly excited
by the strife, it yet had, to his mind, the aspect of a
horror which he could not complacently behold. The
few moments consumed in this brief dialogue, had
brought him back to those reflections which the
provocation
of the strife had almost wholly banished. But
he suffered no mental nor moral scruples, at such a
moment, to impair his manhood.
I too am ready, was his only answer as he left the
vault. He was followed by the outlaw; and there, in
another moment, they stood together on the green
sward before the tomb, fiercely confronting each other
with eyes of mortal hateutterly unmoved by the pure
and placid smiles of that maiden moon whose blessed
light they were about to employ for the most unblessed
purpose.
20*
CHAPTER XIX.
THE COMBAT.
The
ancient additaments for the groundwork of the
grand or terrible, the wild or warlike, would have borne
aspects not unlike their own. Ordinarily, the painter of
the darker passions is very apt to accompany their
explosion
with a sympathetic action on the part of the
natural world. The hero, just before committing the
deed of blood, stalks upon the scene, surrounded by
the gloomy shadows of the nightstorm and thunder
attend upon his footsteps, and the fiery eyes of the
rebuking heaven glare along his path in flashes of
impetuous
lightning. A voice of warning is heard to mutter
in the sky!The bloody daggerthe awful sign of
the crime which is already acted in the mind of the
criminalhangs in the air above him, and marshals
him the way that he must follow; while the ghosts of
the past reappear, shaking their gory locks, to impede
or to precipitate the ghost-like progress of the future.
All things are made to act in harmony with that terrible
passion which has already thrown over the heart of the
possessor the uniform brown horror which
distinguishes
its own unvarying aspect. There is no blue in
the transparent softness of the noonday skythere is
no living green in the fresh sward of the luxuriant
earththe songs of the one, and the mellow voices of
the other, receive their savage or sad tones wholly from
the desolate or depraved soul which speaks in the
bosom of the fated actor. All forms and features,
sights and sounds, are made to correspond with his
prevailing passion; and the hues of sky and land
become
naturally incarnadined by the bloody mood which
governs in his soul. The voices which he hears,
whether
of earth or sky, are only such as rise from the
groaning victims, who start, perhaps, from the embrace
of slumber, to sleep in that of death.
But very different from these were the auxiliary
aspects
of that scene upon which the rival kinsmen were
about to contend. Never was night more beautiful
more uniformly beautiful and tender, in any one of its
thousand attributes and agents. The moon, almost at
her full, was high above the forest tops, and hallowing
its deep and dim recesses with innumerable streams of
glory from her own celestial fountain. Few were the
clouds that gathered about her path, and these, sharing
in her gifts of beauty, became tributary to her lustrous
progress. A gentle breeze, rising from the east,
accompanied
her march, and the tall pines swayed to and fro
beneath its pressure, yielding a whispering music like
those faint utterances of a sweet complaint which are
made by the curling billows of the sea when they break
and die away in a languid struggle with the shore. These
breathings found fit fellowship in the gentle murmurs of
the Congaree, as it rippled away on its sleepless path, at
a little distance from the scene of strife. Lighted by the
moon above, its winding form might be seen, in silvery
glimpses, where the vistas of the woods had been opened
by that tasteful art which had presided over the barony
from its first settlement. Nothing was dark, nothing
sad, stern, or terrible, but the human agents of the scene.
There they stood, frowning defiance upon each other,
and looking grim and ghastly, in the pure, sweet
atmosphere
of light by which they were enveloped. The
aspect of the outlaw was particularly terrible, in
consequence
of the wound which he had received in the
mouth at the beginning of the conflict. The upper lip
was divided by the stroke, the teeth shattered, and,
smeared and clotted with blood, his face presented the
appearance of one already stamped with all the features
of the grave, marked with an expression of hate and
passion which increased its terrors. That of the partisan
was stern, but unruffledpale, but inflexible. His eyes
were full of that fiery energy which, perhaps,
distinguished
equally the characters of the brothers. The
lips were closely compressed, and resembled that sweet
serenity, that resigned and noble melancholy, which
peculiarly distinguishes the same feature in the instance
of nearly every Indian warrior that we have ever seen.
There was no faltering in his soulhe was as firm of
purpose as his enemy; but there were other moods at
work within him which the other could not feel. He
could not feel hate alone, to the exclusion of other and
better feelings.
The outlaw unbuckled the sabre from his side, the
sable belt, and threw them down, with the pistols which
he carried, at the foot of the vault. He seemed
resolute
that there should be no possible obstruction to his
movements in the struggle which was about to take
place. Clarence Conway, on the other hand, took no
such precaution. He calmly surveyed the movements
of his opponent without changing muscle or position.
His eye glanced, however, with a momentary anxiety,
to the clear blue vault, and the pale, pure presence
looking
down upon him from above, and turned involuntarily,
though for a single instant only, to the distant dwelling
of Flora Middleton. But this was not a moment to
betray the weakness of the sentimentalist or lover. His
enemy stood before him. The outlaw had witnessed the
direction of his foeman's eye, and the words of
provocation
gushed from him in increasing bitterness.
Ay, look, Clarence Conwaylook! It may be for
the last time! For that matter we may both look; for
I tell you, there shall be no child's play between us.
Here, on this green turf, and under that smiling heaven,
shall I be stretched in death, ere I yield up a single
sentiment
of that hate which makes it necessary that one or
both of us should die for the peace and security of the
other.
And is it necessary, either for your peace or mine,
that such should be the case? demanded Clarence
Conway.
Ay! absolutely necessary. We cannot breathe the
same atmosphere. Come!
Their arms were raised, their feet planted in
opposition
their
eyes fixed upon each other, and riveted in
glassy, serpent-like watchfulness and calm.
Are you ready? was the question of the outlaw.
Stay! replied Clarence, while he continued to
regard
his enemy with a face of increased deliberation.
Stay!and why should we stay? retorted the
other. Are you so soon quieted? Does your
stomach
revolt at the idea of a final struggle which shall
end the strife between us?
It does!
Ha! Has it then come to that? was the ironical
speech of the outlaw; but Clarence interrupted him with
a cool firmness of tone and look which disarmed the
intended
sarcasm.
You may spare your irony, Edward Morton. That
I fear you not, you should know. That I am your
superior in strength you have long since discovered
that I am, at least, your match with any weapon known
to either of us, you cannot deny; and you know that I
have no dread of death.
To what does all this tend? It means every thing
or nothing. Grant what you have said, still it does not
follow that you shall triumph over me. You may slay
me, but I can grapple with you, Clarence ConwayI
can rush upon your weapon, and, sacrificing myself,
succeed in killing you! Ha! is not that undeniable
also?
Perhaps so; was the deliberate answer. But even
this does not influence me in what I say. There is a
consideration of far more weight which would make me
avoid this conflict.
Ah! it is that, eh? But you shall not avoid it! I
am a desperate man, Clarence Conway, and such a man
always has the life of his enemy at the point of his
dagger!
Be it so; but hear me. For all your crimes, all
your hate and hostility to meall your treachery to
your countrystill I shall find no pleasure in being your
executioner.
Indeed! But be not too sure. It has not yet come
to that! cried the other. There are two to play at
this game, and I flatter myself that I shall turn the
tables upon you in this bout. We have some light now
on the subject, and these pricks which you gave me in
the dark, have rather warmed me for the conflict. They
rather better my chancesso, come on. We cannot too
soon make a finish now.
You deceive yourself, Edward Conwayfatally
deceive yourself if you have such a fancy; replied
Clarence solemnly. If we encounter again I shall
kill you. Nothing can save you. I feel itI know it.
I cannot help but kill you.
Insolent braggart! But, come on!
This is vain. Hear me but an instant more, and
judge. I shall find no pleasure in taking your life. I
cannot forget many things, and I am not desperate.
However you may deride and despise the claims of
blood and the opinions of society, it is impossible for
me to do so. For this reason I would forego the
indulgence
of those passions, Edward Conway
Not ConwayMorton, Cunningham!any thing
but Conway!
A smile of scorn passed over the lips of Clarence.
I thank you for your correction, he said. But
this is a small matter. To return. My passions and
enmities are scarcely less active than yours; but I would
forego their enjoyment because of my greater
responsibilities
.
I now make you an offer; let us not fight; and
you shall go free. I will facilitate your progress to
Charlestownnay, ensure itand you will then be
enabled, unencumbered by the villanous banditti to
which you have been attached, to fly the country. I
know that you have a large booty stored away in
Jamaicaenough to give you competence for life. Let
that suffice you. Leave the country while the chance is
allowed youwhile you may do so in safety. Three
weeks hence, and Greene will traverse all this region!
Fool fancies! exclaimed the other rudely. Those
are Rawdon's trumpets.
You will not long hear them, except sounding the
retreat. The war is well nigh over.
Pshaw! this is mere folly. We came here to fight,
I think. The sooner the better! Come!
I would save youspare you!
I shall not spare
you!
Your conceit is insufferable,
and shall be whipped out of you, by heavens! this very
night. Come on, then; I long to give and take my
quittance. Your head is turned, I see, by that woman.
Your Flora, my Florathe Flora of Congareeyou
have been lipping, have you?and you like the taste
sweet flavour!
Ruffianwretch! cried Clarence, with a fury that
seemed as little governable as that of the outlaw, you
are doomed. I cannot spare you now.
I ask you not. Let the steel speak for both of us.
Mine has been blushing at the time you have consumed
in prating. Come oncome on! Strike as if your
heart were in it, Clarence Conway, for, by God's death,
I will have it in your heart, if hell has not grown deaf
to human prayer. Good blade, to your work! It is
some pleasure, Clarence Conway, to know that yours is
tolerably pure bloodat least it will do no dishonour to
my dagger.
The struggle followed instantaneously. The outlaw
proceeded to act his declared intentions. His object
seemed to be to get within the arm of his opponentto
close at all hazards, and sacrifice himself in the bloody
determination to destroy his enemy. But Clarence was
no ordinary foe. His anger did not deprive him of his
coolness, and his skill with the weapon was far beyond
that of most men of his time. Still, it required all his
watchfulness and circumspectionall his readiness of
eye and arm, to baffle the purpose of the other. The
blind fury of the outlaw, perhaps, served him quite as
effectually as did his own resources. It made him
fearless
,
but not fearfulfull of purposes of danger, but not
dangerousthat is, comparatively speakingfor, so
long as the partisan preserved his composure, and kept
only on the defensive, his enemy did not find it so
certainly
true as he had affirmed, that a desperate man
always carries the life of his enemy at the point of his
dagger. He had tried this more than once, and had
always been repelled, sometimes with hurts, which were
not always slight, though, as yet, in no case dangerous.
His constant failure warned him of the folly of his own
fury, and its utter ineffectiveness to achieve the object of
his desires. He recovered himself, and adopted another
policy. He renewed those coarse sneers and
insinuations
which had been always effectual in provoking
Clarence, and which had closed their previous
conference
.
He spoke of Flora Middleton, and in such
language
as was admirably calculated to throw a lover off
his guard.
You flatter yourself, he said, that you have just
made a conquest; but have you asked its value? I tell
you, Clarence Conway, if ever woman spoke falsely,
Flora Middleton spoke falsely to you when she
consented
to be yours. I know hernay, man, when you
charged me with having been to Briar Park, you knew
but half the truth. Shall I tell you that she was then as
indulgent to the chief of the Black Riders as she has
been since to his more moral kinsman. Here, by this
old vault, did we walk with her at evening, and you
know what it is, or you should know, to wander among
dim groves at sunset with a romantic damsel. The
heart will yield if ever. It softens with the hour, and
meltsha! are you touchedtouched at last? Know,
then, it was my turn to lip and taste as cordially
Liar and slave! cried Clarence, striking at him
furiously as he heard these words; know I not that
you have striven to fill her pure ears with falsehoods
almost as foul as those you would now thrust into
mine?
You have it! cried the other with a yell of delight,
as his lunge carried the point of his dagger into the
breast of the partisana flesh wound only, but one in
dangerous proximity to the angry heart that was now
boiling in its neighbourhood. The youth felt his
imprudence
,
but if he had not, there was a counselling
friend at hand, who did not suffer him to go unreminded.
This was Jack Bannister, who, in the shelter of a tree
contiguous, to which he had crawled unseen, had been
a spectator of the brief conflict, during the short time it
had lasted, on the outside of the vault.
Don't you let him fool you, Clarencehe's only
trying to blind youdon't mind himhe's a born liar,
and if you stick as you should, he'll die with a lie in his
mouth. Strike away, Clarence, as you can strike; and
only forget that you ever had a father who was so foolish
as to git a son of the wrong breed. Put it to him, and
shut up your natur' till it's all done. God ha' mercy
'pon me, but it seems so nateral for me now to want to
put in and kill him.
Ha! you have brought your bullies upon me! were
the words of Morton, as the first accents of Bannister
reached his ears. But I fear them not! and he
renewed
the assault with increased determination, if that
indeed were possible.
Keep backmeddle not, John Bannister, cried
Clarence. I need no assistance.
I know it, Clarence; but, Lord love you, don't git
into a foolish passion. Go to it like a trade, and jest hit
and stick as if you was a-managing a dug-out, or some
such foolish consarn. For sich a foul-mouth as he to
talk agin Miss Flora! Why, it's as foolish as a wolf to
bark at the moonlight. But don't let me interrupt you.
Go to it!I'm jest a-looking on to see the eend, and
obsarve fair play; only make haste, Clarenceshut him
up as soon as you can, for the bugle's a-sounding from
the head of the avenue, and there's little time to lose.
The warning was not to be disregarded, and Clarence
Conway soon brought the strife to an issue. The
resumption
of his caution seduced the outlaw into a renewal
of his rashness, and his dagger hand was caught in the
grasp of the partisan at the same moment when the
VOL. I. 21
weapon of the other sunk into his heart. Clarence
relaxed his hold upon his victim the instant that the
blow was given. He fancied that he had given him the
coup de grace
as he intended; and a strange, keen,
sudden
pang rushed like lightning through his own bosom.
The outlaw, meanwhile, felt himself about to fall. A
faintness covered his framehis sight was growing
darkened; and, with the last convulsive moment of
reflection, he threw himself forward upon the breast of
his enemy, whose dagger-point was now turned upon
the ground. His left arm was tightly clasped about the
form of Clarence, while his right, with all the remaining
consciousness of his mind, and the concentrated, but fast
failing vigour of his frame, addressed a blow at the heart
of the latter, which it needed sufficient strength alone to
render fatal. But the arm of the outlaw sank down in
the effort ere the dagger reached its mark. His hold
upon his enemy was instantly relaxed, and he fell
fainting
at the feet of Clarence, ere the latter had sufficiently
recovered from the horror which he felt, to be altogether
conscious of the danger from which he had escaped.
With every justification for the deed which necessity
could bring, he yet felt how full of pain and sorrow, if
not crime, was the shedding of a brother's blood.
END OF VOL. I.